THE BRAVO.
CHAPTER I.
Yet a few days and dream-perturbed nights,
And I shall slumber wellbut where?no matter.
Adieu, my Angiolina.
Marino Faliero
.
When
the Carmelite re-entered the apartment of
Donna Violetta, his face was covered with the hue
of death, and his limbs with difficulty supported him
to a chair. He scarcely observed that Don Camillo
Monforte was still present, nor did he note the
brightness
and joy which glowed in the eyes of the ardent
Violetta. Indeed his appearance was at first unseen
by the happy lovers, for the Lord of St. Agata had
succeeded in wresting the secret from the breast of
his mistress, if that may be called a secret which
Italian character had scarcely struggled to retain,
and he had crossed the room before even the more
tranquil look of the Donna Florinda rested on his
person.
Thou art ill! exclaimed the governess. Father
Anselmo hath not been absent without grave cause!
The monk threw back his cowl for air, and the
act discovered the deadly paleness of his features.
But his eye, charged with a meaning of horror,
rolled over the faces of those who drew around
him, as if he struggled with memory to recall their
persons.
Ferdinando! Father Anselmo! cried the Donna
Florinda, correcting the unbidden familiarity, though
she could not command the anxiety of her rebel
features
;
Speak to usthou art suffering!
Ill at heart, Florinda.
Deceive us nothaply thou hast more evil
tidingsVenice
Is a fearful state!
Why hast thou quitted us?why, in a moment of
so much importance to our pupila moment that
may prove of the last influence on her happiness
hast thou been absent for a long hour?
Violetta turned a surprised and unconscious glance
towards the clock, but she spoke not.
The servants of the state had need of me;
returned the monk, easing the pain of his spirit by
a groan.
I understand thee, father;thou hast shrived
a penitent?
Daughter, I have: and fewer depart more at
peace with God and their fellows!
Donna Florinda murmured a short prayer for the
soul of the dead, piously crossing herself as she
concluded
.
Her example was imitated by her pupil,
and even the lips of Don Camillo moved, while his
head was bowed by the side of his fair companion,
in seeming reverence.
'Twas a just end, father? demanded Donna
Florinda.
It was an unmerited one! cried the monk, with
fervor, or there is no faith in man. I have
witnessed
the death of one who was better fitted to
live, as happily he was better fitted to die, than
those who pronounced his doom. What a fearful
state is Venice!
And such are they who are masters of thy
person
,
Violetta, said Don Camillo: to those midnight
murderers will thy happiness be consigned! Tell us,
father, does thy sad tragedy touch in any manner
on the interests of this fair being? for we are
encircled
here by mysteries that are as incomprehensible,
while they are nearly as fearful, as fate itself.
A 2
The monk looked from one to the other, and a
more human expression began to appear in his
countenance.
Thou art right, he said; such are the men
who mean to dispose of the person of our pupil.
Holy St. Mark, pardon the prostitution of his
revered
name, and shield her with the virtue of his
prayers!
Father, are we worthy to know more of that
thou hast witnessed?
The secrets of the confessional are sacred, my
son; but this hath been a disclosure to cover the
living, and not the dead, with shame.
I see the hand of those up above in this! for so
most spoke of the Council of Three. They have
tampered with my right, for years, to suit their
selfish
purposes, and, to my shame must I own it, they
have driven me to a submission, in order to obtain
justice, that as ill accords with my feelings as with
my character.
Nay, Camillo, thou art incapable of this injustice
to thyself!
'Tis a fearful government, dearest, and its fruits
are equally pernicious to the ruler and the subject.
It hath, of all other dangers the greatest, the curse
of secrecy on its intentions, its acts, and its
responsibilities
!
Thou sayest true, my son; there is no security
against oppression and wrong in a state, but the fear
of God, or the fear of man. Of the first, Venice
hath none, for too many souls share the odium of
her sins; and as for the last, her deeds are hid from
their knowledge.
We speak boldly, for those who live beneath her
laws, observed Donna Florinda, glancing a look
timidly around her. As we can neither change
nor amend the practices of the state, better that we
should be silent.
If we cannot alter the power of the council, we
may elude it, hastily answered Don Camillo, though
he too dropped his voice, and assured himself of
their security, by closing the casement, and casting
his eyes towards the different doors of the room.
Are you assured of the fidelity of the menials,
Donna Florinda?
Far from it, Signore; we have those who are
of ancient service and of tried character; but we
have those who are named by the senator,
Gradenigo
,
and who are doubtless no other than the agents
of the state.
In this manner do they pry into the privacy of
all! I am compelled to entertain, in my palace,
varlets
that I know to be their hirelings; and yet do I
find it better to seem unconscious of their views, lest
they environ me in a manner that I cannot even
suspect
.
Think you, father, that my presence here hath
escaped the spies?
It would be to hazard much were we to rely on
such security. None saw us enter, as I think, for we
used the secret gate and the more private entrance;
but who is certain of being unobserved when every
fifth eye is that of a mercenary?
The terrified Violetta laid her hand on the arm of
her lover.
Even now, Camillo, she said, thou mayest be
observed, and secretly devoted to punishment!
If seen, doubt it not: St. Mark will never
pardon
so bold an interference with his pleasure. And
yet, sweetest Violetta, to gain thy favor, this risk is
nothing; nor will a far greater hazard turn me from
my purpose.
These inexperienced and confiding spirits have
taken advantage of my absence to communicate more
freely than was discreet; said the Carmelite, in the
manner of one who foresaw the answer.
Father, nature is too strong for the weak
preventives
of prudence.
The brow of the monk became clouded. His
companions
watched the workings of his mind, as they
appeared in a countenance that in common was so
benevolent, though always sad. For a few moments
none broke the silence.
The Carmelite at length demanded, raising his
troubled look to the countenance of Don Camillo
Hast thou duly reflected on the consequences of
this rashness, son? What dost thou purpose, in thus
braving the anger of the republic, and in setting at
defiance her arts, her secret means of intelligence,
and her terrors?
Father, I have reflected as all of my years
reflect
,
when in heart and soul they love. I have brought
myself to feel that any misery would be happiness
compared to the loss of Violetta, and that no risk
can exceed the reward of gaining her favor. Thus
much for the first of thy questionsfor the last I can
only say that I am too much accustomed to the wiles
of the senate to be a novice in the means of
counteracting
them.
There is but one language for youth, when
seduced
by that pleasing delusion which paints the
future
with hues of gold. Age and experience may
condemn it, but the weakness will continue to
prevail
in all, until life shall appear in its true colors.
Duke of Sant' Agata, though a noble of high lineage
and illustrious name, and though lord of many
vassals
,
thou art not a powerthou canst not declare
thy palace in Venice a fortress, nor send a herald
to the doge with defiance.
True, reverend monk; I cannot do this; nor
would it be well for him who could, to trust his
fortune
on so reckless a risk. But the states of St. Mark
do not cover the earthwe can fly.
The senate hath a long arm; and it hath a
thousand
secret hands.
None know it better than I; still it does no
violence
without motive; the faith of their ward
irretrievably
mine, the evil, as respects them, becomes
irreparable.
Think'st thou so! Means would quickly be found
to separate you. Believe not that Venice would
be thwarted of its design so easily; the wealth of
a house like this would purchase many an unworthy
suitor, and thy right would be disregarded, or haply
denied.
But, father, the ceremony of the church may
not be despised! exclaimed Violetta; it comes from
heaven and is sacred.
Daughter, I say it with sorrow, but the great and
the powerful find means even to set aside that
venerable
and holy sacrament. Thine own gold would
serve to seal thy misery.
This might arrive, father, were we to continue
within the grasp of St. Mark, interrupted the
Neapolitan
;
but once beyond his borders, 't would be
a bold interference with the right of a foreign state
to lay hand on our persons. More than this, I have
a castle, in St. Agata, that will defy their most
secret
means, until events might happen which should
render it more prudent for them to desist than to
persevere
.
This reason hath force wert thou within the walls
of St. Agata, instead of being, as thou art, among
the canals.
Here is one of Calabria, a vassal born of mine,
a certain Stefano Milano, the padrone of a
Sorrentine
felucca, now lying in the port; the man is in strict
amity with my own gondolierhe who was third
in this day's race. Art thou ill, father, that thou
appearest
troubled?
Proceed with thy expedient, answered the
monk, motioning that he wished not to be observed.
My faithful Gino reports that this Stefano is on
the canals, on some errand of the republic, as he
thinks, for though the mariner is less disposed to
familiarity
than is wont, he hath let drop hints that
lead to such a conclusionthe felucca is ready,
from hour to hour, to put upon the sea, and doubt
not the padrone would rather serve his natural lord
than these double-dealing miscreants of the senate.
I can pay as well as they, if served to my pleasure,
and I can punish too, when offended.
There is reason in this, Signore, wert thou
beyond
the wiles of this mysterious city. But in what
manner canst thou embark, without drawing the
notice of those, who doubtless watch our
movements
,
on thy person?
There are maskers on the canals at all hours,
and if Venice be so impertinent in her system of
watchfulness, thou knowest, father, that, without
extraordinary
motive, that disguise is sacred.
Without
this narrow privilege, the town would not be
habitable a day.
I fear the result; observed the hesitating monk,
while it was evident, from the thoughtfulness of his
countenance, that he calculated the chances of the
adventure. If known and arrested, we are all
lost!
Trust me, father, that thy fortune shall not be
forgotten, even in that unhappy issue. I have an
uncle, as you know, high in the favor of the pontiff,
and who wears the scarlet hat. I pledge to you the
honor of a cavalier, all my interest with this relative,
to gain such intercession from the church as shall
weaken the blow to her servant.
The features of the Carmelite flushed, and, for
the first time, the ardent young noble observed
around his ascetic mouth an expression of worldly
pride.
Thou hast unjustly rated my apprehensions,
Lord of St. Agata, he said; I fear not for myself,
but for others. This tender and lovely child hath
not been confided to my care, without creating a
parental solicitude in her behalf, andhe paused,
and seemed to struggle with himselfI have too
long known the mild and womanly virtues of Donna
Florinda, to witness, with indifference, her exposure
to a near and fearful danger. Abandon our charge,
we cannot; nor do I see in what manner, as
prudent
and watchful guardians, we may in any
manner
consent to this risk. Let us hope that they who
govern will yet consult the honor and happiness of
Donna Violetta.
That were to hope the winged lion would
become
a lamb, or the dark and soulless senate a
community
of self-mortifying and godly Carthusians!
No, reverend monk, we must seize the happy
moment
,
and none is likely to be more fortunate than
this, or trust our hopes to a cold and calculating
policy, that disregards all motives but its own object.
An hour, nay, half the time, would suffice to apprize
the mariner, and ere the morning light, we might
see the domes of Venice sinking into their own
hated Lagunes.
These are the plans of confident youth,
quickened
by passion. Believe me, son, it is not easy as
thou imaginest, to mislead the agents of the police.
This palace could not be quitted, the felucca entered,
or any one of the many necessary steps hazarded,
without drawing upon us their eyes. Hark!I
hear the wash of oarsa gondola is even now at
the water-gate!
Donna Florinda went hastily to the balcony, and
as quickly returned to report that she had seen an
officer of the republic enter the palace. There was
no time to lose, and Don Camillo was again urged
to conceal himself in the little oratory. This
necessary
caution had hardly been observed before the
door of the room opened, and the privileged
messenger
of the senate announced his own appearance.
It was the very individual who had presided at the
fearful execution of the fisherman, and who had
already announced the cessation of the Signor
Gradenigo's
powers. His eye glanced suspiciously
around the room, as he entered, and the Carmelite
trembled in every limb, at the look which
encountered
his own. But all immediate apprehensions
vanished
,
when the usual artful smile, with which he
was wont to soften his disagreeable communications,
took place of the momentary expression of a vague
and an habitual suspicion.
Noble lady, he said, bowing with deference to
the rank of her he addressed, you may learn by
this assiduity, on the part of their servant, the
interest
which the senate takes in your welfare. Anxious
to do you pleasure, and ever attentive to the wishes
of one so young, it hath been decided to give you
the amusement and variety of another scene, at a
season when the canals of our city become
disagreeable
,
from their warmth and the crowds which
live in the air. I am sent to request you will make
such preparations, as may befit your convenience
during a few months' residence in a purer
atmosphere
,
and that this may be done speedily; as your
journey, always to prevent discomfort to yourself,
will commence before the rising of the sun.
This is short notice, Signore, for a female about
to quit the dwelling of her ancestors!
St. Mark suffers his love and parental care to
overlook the vain ceremonies of form. It is thus
the parent dealeth with the child. There is little
need of unusual notice, since it will be the business
of the government to see all that is necessary
dispatched
to the residence, which is to be honored
with the presence of so illustrious a lady.
For myself, Signore, little preparation is needed.
But I fear the train of servitors, that befit my
condition
,
will require more leisure for their
arrangements
.
Lady, that embarrassment hath been foreseen,
and to remove it, the council hath decided to supply
you with the only attendant you will require, during
an absence from the city which will be so short.
How, Signore! am I to be separated from my
people?
From the hired menials of your palace, lady, to
be confided to those who will serve your person,
from a nobler motive.
And my maternal friendmy ghostly adviser?
They will be permitted to repose from their
trusts, during your absence.
An exclamation from Donna Florinda, and an
involuntary
movement of the monk, betrayed their
mutual concern. Donna Violetta suppressed the
exhibition of her own resentment, and of her
wounded
affections, by a powerful effort, in which she was
greatly sustained by her pride; but she could not
entirely conceal the anguish of another sort, that
was seated in her eye.
Do I understand that this prohibition extends to
her, who, in common, serves my person?
Signora, such are my instructions.
Is it expected that Violetta Tiepolo will do these
menial offices for herself?
Signora, no. A most excellent and agreeable
attendant has been provided for that duty. Annina,
he continued, approaching the door, thy noble
mistress
is impatient to see thee.
As he spoke, the daughter of the wine-seller
appeared
.
She wore an air of assumed humility, but
Vol. II. B
it was accompanied by a secret mien, that betrayed
independence of the pleasure of her new mistress.
And this damsel is to be my nearest confidant!
exclaimed Donna Violetta, after studying the artful
and demure countenance of the girl, a moment, with
a dislike she did not care to conceal.
Such hath been the solicitude of your illustrious
guardians, lady. As the damsel is instructed in all
that is necessary, I will intrude no longer, but take
my leave, recommending that you improve the hours,
which are now few, between this and the rising sun,
that you may profit by the morning breeze in
quitting
the city.
The officer glanced another look around the room,
more, however, through habitual caution than any
other reason, bowed, and departed.
A profound and sorrowful silence succeeded.
Then the apprehension that Don Camillo might
mistake
their situation and appear, flashed upon the mind
of Violetta, and she hastened to apprize him of the
danger, by speaking to the new attendant.
Thou hast served before this, Annina? she
asked so loud as to permit the words to be heard in
the oratory.
Never a lady so beautiful and illustrious, Signora.
But I hope to make myself agreeable to one that I
hear is kind to all around her.
Thou art not new to the flattery of thy class;
go then, and acquaint my ancient attendants with
this sudden resolution, that I may not disappoint the
council by tardiness. I commit all to thy care,
Annina
,
since thou knowest the pleasure of my
guardians
those
without will furnish the means.
The girl lingered, and her watchful observers
noted suspicion and hesitation in her reluctant
manner
of compliance. She obeyed, however, leaving
the room with the domestic Donna Violetta
summoned
from the antechamber. The instant the door
was closed behind her, Don Camillo was in the
group, and the whole four stood regarding each
other in a common panic.
Canst thou still hesitate, father? demanded
the lover.
Not a moment, my son, did I see the means of
accomplishing flight.
How! Thou wilt not then desert me!
exclaimed
Violetta, kissing his hands in joy. Nor thou,
my second mother!
Neither, answered the governess, who
possessed
intuitive means of comprehending the resolutions
of the monk; we will go with thee, love, to the
Castle of St. Agata, or to the dungeon of St. Mark.
Virtuous and sainted Florinda, receive my
thanks! cried the reprieved Violetta, clasping her
hands on her bosom, with an emotion in which piety
and gratitude were mingled.Camillo, we await
thy guidance.
Refrain, observed the monk,a footstepthy
concealment.
Don Camillo was scarce hid from view, when
Annina reappeared. She had the same suspicious
manner of glancing her eye around, as the official,
and it would seem, by the idle question she put, that
her entrance had some other object than the mere
pretence which she made of consulting her new
mistress's
humor in the color of a robe.
Do as thou wilt, girl, said Violetta, with
impatience
;
thou knowest the place of my intended
retirement
,
and canst judge of the fitness of my attire.
Hasten thy preparations, that I be not the cause of
delay. Enrico, attend my new maid to the
wardrobe
.
Annina reluctantly withdrew, for she was far too
much practised in wiles not to distrust this
unexpected
compliance with the will of the council, or not to
perceive that she was admitted with displeasure to
the discharge of her new duties. As the faithful
domestic
of Donna Violetta kept at her side, she was
fain, however, to submit, and suffered herself to be
led a few steps from the door. Suddenly pretending
to recollect a new question, she returned with so
much rapidity, as to be again in the room, before
Enrico could anticipate the intention.
Daughter, complete thy errands, and forbear to
interrupt our privacy, said the monk, sternly.I
am about to confess this penitent, who may pine long
for the consolations of the holy office, ere we meet
again. If thou hast not aught urgent, withdraw, ere
thou seriously givest offence to the church.
The severity of the Carmelite's tone, and the
commanding
,
though subdued gleaming of his eye, had
the effect to awe the girl. Quailing before his look,
and in truth startled at the risk she ran in offending
against opinions so deeply seated in the minds of all,
and from which her own superstitious habits were
far from free, she muttered a few words of apology,
and finally withdrew. There was another uneasy
and suspicious glance thrown around her, however,
before the door was closed. When they were once
more alone, the monk motioned for silence to the
impetuous Don Camillo, who could scarce restrain
his impatience until the intruder departed.
Son, be prudent, he said; we are in the midst
of treachery; in this unhappy city none know in
whom they can confide.
I think we are sure of Enrico, said the Donna
Florinda, though the very doubts she affected not to
feel, lingered in the tones of her voice.
It matters not, daughter.He is ignorant of the
presence of Don Camillo, and in that we are safe.
Duke of Sant' Agata, if you can deliver us from these
toils, we will accompany you.
A cry of joy was near bursting from the lips of
Violetta; but obedient to the eye of the monk, she
turned to her lover, as if to learn his decision. The
expression of Don Camillo's face was the pledge of
his assent. Without speaking, he wrote hastily, with
a pencil, a few words on the envelope of a letter,
and inclosing a piece of coin in its folds, he moved
with a cautious step to the balcony. A signal was
given, and all awaited in breathless silence the
answer
.
Presently they heard the wash of the water,
caused by the movement of a gondola beneath the
window. Stepping forward again, Don Camillo
dropped the paper with such precision, that he
distinctly
heard the fall of the coin in the bottom of the
boat. The gondolier scarce raised his eyes to the
balcony, but commencing an air much used on the
canals, he swept onward, like one whose duty called
for no haste.
That has succeeded! said Don Camillo, when
he heard the song of Gino. In an hour my agent
will have secured the felucca, and all now depends
on our own means of quitting the palace unobserved.
My people will await us, shortly, and perhaps
'twould be well to trust openly to our speed in
gaining
the Adriatic.
There is a solemn and necessary duty to
perform
,
observed the monk;daughters, withdraw
to your rooms, and occupy yourselves with the
preparation
necessary for your flight, which may
readily
be made to appear as intended to meet the
senate's pleasure. In a few minutes I shall summon
you hither, again.
Wondering, but obedient, the females withdrew.
The Carmelite then made a brief but clear
explanation
of his intention. Don Camillo listened eagerly,
and when the other had done speaking they retired
together into the oratory. Fifteen minutes had not
passed, before the monk reappeared, alone, and
touched the bell, which communicated with the
B 2
closet of Violetta. Donna Florinda and her pupil
were quickly in the room.
Prepare thy mind for the confessional, said the
priest, placing himself, with grave dignity, in that
chair which he habitually used, when listening to
the self-accusations and failings of his spiritual child.
The brow of Violetta paled and flushed again, as
if there lay a heavy sin on her conscience. She
turned an imploring look on her maternal monitor,
in whose mild features she met an encouraging
smile, and then, with a beating heart, though
ill-collected
for the solemn duty, but with a decision that
the occasion required, she knelt on the cushion at
the feet of the monk.
The murmured language of Donna Violetta was
audible to none but him for whose paternal ear it
was intended, and that dread Being whose just
anger
it was hoped it might lessen. But Don Camillo
gazed, through the half-opened door of the chapel,
on the kneeling form, the clasped hands, and the
uplifted
countenance of the beautiful penitent. As she
proceeded with the acknowledgment of her errors,
the flush on her cheek deepened, and a pious
excitement
kindled in those eyes, which he had so
lately seen glowing with a very different passion.
The ingenuous and disciplined soul of Violetta was
not so quickly disburthened of its load of sin as that
of the more practised mind of the Lord of Sant'
Agata. The latter fancied that he could trace in
the movement of her lips the sound of his own name,
and a dozen times during the confession, he thought
he could even comprehend sentences of which he
himself was the subject. Twice the good father
smiled, involuntarily, and at each indiscretion, he
laid a hand in affection on the bared head of the
suppliant. But Violetta ceased to speak, and the
absolution was pronounced, with a fervor that the
remarkable circumstances, in which they all stood,
did not fail to heighten.
When this portion of his duty was ended, the
Carmelite entered the oratory. With steady hands
he lighted the candles of the altar, and made the
other dispositions for the mass. During this interval
Don Camillo was at the side of his mistress,
whispering
with the warmth of a triumphant and happy
lover. The governess stood near the door,
watching
for the sound of footsteps in the antechamber.
The monk then advanced to the entrance of the
little
chapel, and was about to speak, when a hurried
step from Donna Florinda arrested his words. Don
Camillo had just time to conceal his person within
the drapery of a window, before the door opened
and Annina entered.
When the preparations of the altar and the solemn
countenance of the priest first met her eye, the girl
recoiled, with the air of one rebuked. But rallying
her thoughts, with that readiness which had gained
her the employment she filled, she crossed herself,
reverently, and took a place apart, like one who,
while she knew her station, wished to participate in
the mysteries of the holy office.
Daughter, none who commence this mass with
us, can quit the presence, ere it be completed;
observed
the monk.
Father, it is my duty to be near the person of
my mistress, and it is a happiness to be near it on
the occasion of this early matin.
The monk was embarrassed. He looked from one
to the other, in indecision, and was about to frame
some pretence to get rid of the intruder, when Don
Camillo appeared in the middle of the room.
Reverend monk, proceed, he said;  'tis but
another witness of my happiness.
While speaking, the noble touched the handle of
his sword, significantly, with a finger, and cast a
look at the half-petrified Annina, which effectually
controlled the exclamation that was about to escape
her. The monk appeared to understand the terms
of this silent compact; for with a deep voice he
commenced the offices of the mass. The singularity
of their situation, the important results of the act in
which they were engaged, the impressive dignity
of the Carmelite, and the imminent hazard which
they all ran of exposure, together with the certainty
of punishment for their daring to thwart the will of
Venice, if betrayed, caused a deeper feeling, than
that which usually pervades a marriage ceremony,
to preside at nuptials thus celebrated. The youthful
Violetta trembled at every intonation of the solemn
voice of the monk, and towards the close, she
leaned
in helplessness on the arm of the man to whom
she had just plighted her vows. The eye of the
Carmelite kindled, as he proceeded with the office,
however; and, long ere he had done, he had
obtained
such a command over the feelings of even
Annina, as to hold her mercenary spirit in awe.
The final union was pronounced, and the
benediction
given.
Maria, of pure memory, watch over thy
happiness
,
daughter! said the monk, for the first time in
his life saluting the fair brow of the weeping bride.
Duke of Sant' Agata, may thy patron hear thy
prayers, as thou provest kind to this innocent and
confiding child!
Amen!Ha!we are not too soon united, my
Violetta; I hear the sound of oars.
A glance from the balcony assured him of the truth
of his words, and rendered it apparent that it had
now become necessary to take the most decided step
of all. A six-oared gondola, of a size suited to
endure
the waves of the Adriatic at that mild season,
and with a pavilion of fit dimensions, stopped at the
water-gate of the palace.
I wonder at this boldness! exclaimed Don
Camillo. There must be no delay, lest some
spy of the republic apprize the police. Away,
dearest Violettaaway, Donna FlorindaFather,
away!
The governess and her charge passed swiftly into
the inner rooms. In a minute, they returned
bearing
the caskets of Donna Violetta, and a sufficient
supply of necessaries, for a short voyage. The
instant
they reappeared, all was ready; for Don
Camillo
had long held himself prepared for this
decisive
moment, and the self-denying Carmelite had
little
need of superfluities. It was no moment for
unnecessary
explanation or trivial objections.
Our hope is in celerity, said Don Camillo;
secrecy
is impossible.
He was still speaking, when the monk led the way
from the room. Donna Florinda and the
half-breathless
Violetta followed; Don Camillo drew the arm
of Annina under his own, and in a low voice bid her,
at her peril, refuse to obey.
The long suite of outer rooms was passed,
without
meeting a single observer of the extraordinary
movement. But when the fugitives entered the great
hall, that communicated with the principal stairs, they
found themselves in the centre of a dozen menials
of both sexes.
Place, cried the Duke of Sant' Agata, whose
person and voice were alike unknown to them.
Your mistress will breathe the air of the canals.
Wonder and curiosity were alive in every
countenance
,
but suspicion and eager attention were
uppermost
in the features of many. The foot of
Donna
Violetta had scarcely touched the pavement of
the lower hall, when several menials glided down
the flight, and quitted the palace, by its different
outlets
.
Each sought those who engaged him in the
service. One flew along the narrow streets of the
islands, to the residence of the Signor Gradenigo;
another sought his son; and one, ignorant of the
person of him he served, actually searched an agent
of Don Camillo, to impart a circumstance in which
that noble was himself so conspicuous an actor. To
such a pass of corruption had double-dealing and
mystery reduced the household of the fairest and
richest in Venice! The gondola lay at the marble
steps of the water-gate, held against the stones by
two of its crew. Don Camillo saw, at a glance,
that the masked gondoliers had neglected none of the
precautions he had prescribed, and he inwardly
commended
their punctuality. Each wore a short rapier
at his girdle, and he fancied he could trace
beneath
the folds of their garments, evidence of the
presence of the clumsy fire-arms, in use at that
period
.
These observations were made, while the
Carmelite
and Violetta entered the boat. Donna
Florinda
followed, and Annina was about to imitate her
example, when she was arrested by the arm of Don
Camillo.
Thy service ends here, whispered the
bridegroom
.
Seek another mistress; in fault of a
better
,
thou mayest devote thyself to Venice.
The little interruption caused Don Camillo to look
backward, and, for a single moment, he paused to
scrutinize the group of eyes that crowded the hall
of the palace, at a respectful distance.
Adieu, my friends! he added; Those among
ye who love your mistress shall be remembered.
He would have said more, but a rude seizure of
his arms caused him to turn hastily away. He was
firm in the grasp of the two gondoliers who had
landed. While he was yet in too much
astonishment
to struggle, Annina, obedient to a signal,
darted
past him and leaped into the boat. The oars fell
into the water; Don Camillo was repelled by a
violent
shove backward into the hall, the gondoliers
stepped lightly into their places, and the gondola
swept away from the steps, beyond the power of him
they left to follow.
Gino!miscreant!what means this
treachery
!
The moving of the parting gondola was
accompanied
by no other sound than the usual washing of
the water. In speechless agony, Don Camillo saw
the boat glide, swifter and swifter at each stroke of
the oars, along the canal, and then, whirling round
the angle of a palace, disappear.
Venice admitted not of pursuit like another city,
for there was no passage along the canal taken by
the gondola, but by water. Several of the boats
used by the family, lay within the piles on the great
canal, at the principal entrance, and Don Camillo
was about to rush into one, and to seize its oars,
with his own hands, when the usual sounds
announced
the approach of a gondola from the direction of
the bridge, that had so long served as a place of
concealment to his own domestic. It soon issued
from the obscurity, cast by the shadows of the houses
and proved to be a large gondola pulled, like the one
which had just disappeared, by six masked
gondoliers
.
The resemblance between the equipments of
the two was so exact, that at first not only-the
wondering
Camillo, but all the others present fancied the
latter, by some extraordinary speed, had already
made the four of the adjoining palaces, and was
once more approaching the private entrance of that
of Donna Violetta.
Gino! cried the bewildered bridegroom.
Signore mio! answered the faithful domestic.
Draw nearer, varlet. What meaneth this idle
trifling, at a moment like this?
Don Camillo leaped a fearful distance, and happily
he reached the gondola. To pass the men and rush
into the canopy needed but a moment; to perceive
that it was empty was the work of a glance.
Villains, have you dared to be false! cried the
confounded noble.
At that instant the clock of the city began to tell
the hour of two, and it was only as that appointed
signal sounded heavy and melancholy on the
nightair
,
that the undeceived Camillo got a certain glimpse
of the truth.
Gino, he said, repressing his voice, like one
summoning a desperate resolutionAre thy
fellows
true?
As faithful as your own vassals, Signore.
And thou didst not fail to deliver the note to my
agent?
He had it before the ink was dry, eccellenza.
The mercenary villain!He told thee where to
find the gondola, equipped as I see it?
Signore, he did; and I do the man the justice
to say that nothing is wanting, either to speed or
comfort.
Ay, he even deals in duplicates, so tender is his
care! muttered Don Camillo, between his teeth.
Pull away, men; your own safety and my
happiness
now depend on your arms. A thousand
ducats
if you equal my hopesmy just anger if you
disappoint them!
Don Camillo threw himself on the cushions as he
spoke, in bitterness of heart, though he seconded his
words by a gesture which bid the men proceed.
Gino, who occupied the stern and managed the
directing
oar, opened a small window in the canopy,
which communicated with the interior, and bent to
take his master's directions as the boat sprang ahead.
Rising from his stooping posture, the practised
gondolier
gave a sweep with his blade, which caused the
sluggish element of the narrow canal to whirl in
eddies
,
and then the gondola glided into the great
canal
,
as if it obeyed an instinct.
CHAPTER II.
Why liest thou so on the green earth?
'Tis not the hour of slumber:why so pale?
Cain
.
Notwithstanding
his apparent decision, the Duke
of Sant' Agata was completely at a loss in what
manner to direct his future movements. That he
had been duped, by one or more of the agents, to
whom he had been compelled to confide his
necessary
preparations for the flight he had meditated
several days, was too certain to admit of his
deceiving
himself with the hopes, that some
unaccountable
mistake was the cause of his loss. He
saw, at once, that the senate was master of the
person
of his bride, and he too well knew its power,
and its utter disregard of human obligations, when
any paramount interest of the state was to be
consulted
,
to doubt for an instant its willingness to use
its advantage, in any manner that was most likely to
contribute to its own views. By the premature
death of her uncle, Donna Violetta had become the
heiress of vast estates in the dominions of the church,
and a compliance with that jealous and arbitrary law
of Venice, which commanded all of its nobles to
dispose of any foreign possessions they might
acquire
,
was only suspended on account of her sex,
and, as has already been seen, with the hope of
disposing
of her hand in a manner that would prove
more profitable to the republic. With this object
still before them, and with the means of
accomplishing
Vol. II. C
it in their own hands, the bridegroom well knew
that his marriage would not only be denied, but he
feared the witnesses of the ceremony would be so
disposed of, as to give little reason ever to expect
embarrassment from their testimony. For himself,
personally, he felt less apprehension, though he
foresaw
that he had furnished his opponents with an
argument
that was likely to defer to an indefinite
period
,
if it did not entirely defeat his claims to the
disputed succession. But he had already made up
his mind to this result, though it is probable that his
passion for Violetta had not entirely blinded him to
the fact, that her Roman signories would be no
unequal offset for the loss. He believed that he might
possibly return to his palace with impunity, so far as
any personal injury was concerned; for the great
consideration he enjoyed in his native land, and the
high interest he possessed at the court of Rome,
were sufficient pledges that no open violence would
be done him. The chief reason why his claim had
been kept in suspense, was the wish to profit by his
near connexion with the favorite cardinal, and though
he had never been able entirely to satisfy the
ever-increasing
demands of the council, in this respect,
he thought it probable that the power of the Vatican
would not be spared, to save him from any very
imminent
personal hazard. Still he had given the state
of Venice plausible reasons for severity, and liberty,
just at that moment, was of so much importance,
that he dreaded falling into the hands of the officials,
as one of the greatest misfortunes which could
momentarily
overtake him. He so well knew the
crooked policy of those with whom he had to deal,
that he believed he might be arrested solely that the
government could make an especial merit of his future
release, under circumstances of so seeming gravity.
His order to Gino, therefore, had been to pull down
the principal passage toward the port.
Before the gondola, which sprung at each united
effort of its crew, like some bounding animal,
entered
among the shipping, its master had time to
recover
his self-possession, and to form some hasty
plans for the future. Making a signal for the crew
to cease rowing, he came from beneath the canopy.
Notwithstanding the lateness of the hour, boats
were plying on the water within the town, and the
song was still audible on the canals. But among the
mariners a general stillness prevailed, such as befitted
their toil during the day, and their ordinary habits.
Call the first idle gondolier of thy acquaintance
hither, Gino, said Don Camillo, with assumed
calmness
;
I would question him.
In less than a minute he was gratified.
Hast seen any strongly manned gondola plying,
of late, in this part of the canal? demanded Don
Camillo, of the man they had stopped.
None, but this of your own, Signore; which is
the fastest of all that passed beneath the Rialto, in
this day's regatta.
How knowest thou, friend, aught of the speed
of my boat?
Signore, I have pulled an oar on the canals of
Venice six-and-twenty years, and I do not
remember
to have seen a gondola move more swiftly on
them than did this very boat but a few minutes ago,
when it dashed among the feluccas, further down in
the port, as if it were again running for the oar.
Corpo di Bacco! There are rich wines in the
palaces of the nobles, that men can give such life to
wood!
Whither did we steer? eagerly asked Don
Camillo.
Blessed San Teodoro! I do not wonder,
eccellenza
,
that you ask that question, for though it is but
a moment since, here I see you lying as motionless
on the water as a floating weed!
Friend, here is silveraddio.
The gondolier swept slowly onward, singing a
strain in honor of his bark, while the boat of Don
Camillo darted ahead. Mistic, felucca, xebec,
brigantine
,
and three-masted ship, were apparently
floating
past them, as they shot through the maze of
shipping, when Gino bent forward and drew the
attention
of his master to a large gondola, which was
pulling with a lazy oar toward them, from the
direction
of the Lido. Both boats were in a wide
avenue in the midst of the vessels, the usual track
of those who went to sea, and there was no object
whatever between them. By changing the course
of his own boat, Don Camillo soon found himself
within an oar's length of the other. He saw, at a
glance, it was the treacherous gondola by which he
had been duped.
Draw, men, and follow! shouted the desperate
Neapolitan, preparing to leap into the midst of his
enemies.
You draw against St. Mark! cried a warning
voice from beneath the canopy. The chances are
unequal Signore; for the smallest signal would
bring twenty galleys to our succor.
Don Camillo might have disregarded this menace,
had he not perceived that it caused the half-drawn
rapiers of his followers to return to their scabbards.
Robber! he answered, restore her whom you
have spirited away.
Signore, you young nobles are often pleased to
play your extravagancies with the servants of the
republic. Here are none but the gondoliers and
myself. A movement of the boat permitted Don
Camillo to look into the covered part, and he saw
that the other uttered no more than the truth.
Convinced
of the uselessness of further parley,
knowing
the value of every moment, and believing he
was on a track which might still lead to success, the
young Neapolitan signed to his people to go on.
The boats parted in silence, that of Don Camillo
proceeding in the direction from which the other
had just come.
In a short time the gondola of Don Camillo was
in an open part of the Guidecca, and entirely
beyond
the tiers of the shipping. It was so late that
the moon had begun to fall, and its light was cast
obliquely on the bay, throwing the eastern sides of
the buildings and the other objects into shadow. A
dozen different vessels were seen, aided by the
land-breeze
,
steering towards the entrance of the port.
The rays of the moon fell upon the broad surface
of those sides of their canvas which were nearest
to the town, and they resembled so many spotless
clouds, sweeping the water and floating seaward.
They are sending my wife to Dalmatia! cried
Don Camillo, like a man on whom the truth began
to dawn.
Signore mio! exclaimed the astonished Gino.
I tell thee, sirrah, that this accursed senate hath
plotted against my happiness, and having robbed
me of thy mistress, hath employed one of the many
feluccas that I see, to transport her to some of its
strong-holds, on the eastern coast of the Adriatic.
Blessed Maria! Signor Duca, and my
honoured
master; they say that the very images of stone in
Venice have ears, and that the horses of bronze
will kick, if an evil word is spoken against those up
above.
Is it not enough, varlet, to draw curses from the
meek Job, to rob him of a wife? Hast thou no
feeling
for thy mistress?
I did not dream, eccellenza, that you were so
happy as to have the one, or that I was so honored
as to have the other.
Thou remindest me of my folly, good Gino. In
C 2
aiding me on this occasion, thou wilt have thy own
fortune in view, as thy efforts, like those of thy
fellows
,
will be made in behalf of the lady to whom I
have just plighted a husband's vows.
San Teodoro help us all, and hint what is to be
done! The lady is most happy, Signor Don Camillo,
and if I only knew by what name to mention her,
she should never be forgotten in any prayer that so
humble a sinner might dare to offer.
Thou hast not forgotten the beautiful lady I
drew from the Guidecca?
Corpo di Bacco! Your eccellenza floated like
a swan, and swam faster than a gull. Forgotten!
Signore, no,I think of it every time I hear a plash
in the canals, and every time I think of it I curse
the Ancona-man in my heart. St. Theodore forgive
me, if it be unlike a Christian to do so. But, though
we all tell marvels of what our Lord did in the
Guidecca, the dip of its waters is not the
marriage-ceremony
,
nor can we speak with much certainty
of beauty, that was seen to so great disadvantage.
Thou art right, Gino.But that lady, the
illustrious
Donna Violetta Tiepolo, the daughter and
heiress of a famed senator, is now thy mistress. It
remains for us to establish her in the Castle of Sant'
Agata, where I shall defy Venice and its agents.
Gino bowed his head in submission, though he
cast a look behind, to make sure that none of those
agents, whom his master set so openly at defiance,
were within ear-shot.
In the mean time the gondola proceeded, for the
dialogue in no manner interrupted the exertions of
Gino, still holding the direction of the Lido. As the
land-breeze freshened, the different vessels in sight
glided away, and by the time Don Camillo reached
the barrier of sand, which separates the Lagunes
from the Adriatic, most of them had glided through
the passages, and were now shaping their courses,
according to their different destinations, across the
open gulf. The young noble had permitted his
people
to pursue the direction originally taken, in pure
indecision. He was certain that his bride was in
one of the many barks in sight, but he possessed no
clue to lead him towards the right one, nor any
sufficient
means of pursuit, were he even master of
that important secret. When he landed, therefore,
it was with the simple hope of being able to form
some general conjecture as to the portion of the
republic's
dominions, in which he might search for her
he had lost, by observing to what part of the
Adriatic
the different feluccas held their way. He had
determined on immediate pursuit, however, and
before
he quitted the gondola, he once more turned to
his confidential gondolier to give the necessary
instructions
.
Thou knowest, Gino, he said, that there is
one born a vassal on my estates, here in the port,
with a felucca from the Sorrentine shore?
I know the man better than I know my own
faults, Signore, or even my own virtues.
Go to him, at once, and make sure of his
presence
.
I have imagined a plan to decoy him into
the service of his lord; but I would now know the
condition of his vessel.
Gino said a few words in commendation of the
zeal of his friend Stefano, and in praise of the
Bella Sorrentina, as the gondola receded from the
shore; and then he dashed his oar into the water,
like a man in earnest to execute the commission.
There is a lonely spot on the Lido di Palestrina,
where Catholic exclusion has decreed that the
remains
of all who die in Venice, without the pale of
the church of Rome, shall moulder into their
kindred
dust. Though it is not distant from the
ordinary
landing and the few buildings which line the
shore, it is a place that, in itself, is no bad emblem
of a hopeless lot. Solitary, exposed equally to the
hot airs of the south and the bleak blasts of the Alps,
frequently covered with the spray of the Adriatic,
and based on barren sands, the utmost that human
art, aided by a soil which has been fattened by
human
remains, can do, has been to create around the
modest graves a meager vegetation, that is in slight
contrast to the sterility of most of the bank. This
place of interment is without the relief of trees, at
the present day it is uninclosed, and in the opinions
of those who have set it apart for heretic and Jew,
it is unblessed. And yet, though condemned alike
to this, the last indignity which man can inflict on
his fellow, the two proscribed classes furnish a
melancholy
proof of the waywardness of human passions
and prejudice, by refusing to share in common the
scanty pittance of earth, which bigotry has allowed
for their everlasting repose! While the protestant
sleeps by the side of protestant in exclusive obloquy,
the children of Israel moulder apart on the same
barren heath, sedulous to preserve, even in the
grave, the outward distinctions of faith. We shall
not endeavor to seek that deeply-seated principle
which renders man so callous to the most eloquent
and striking appeals to liberality, but rest satisfied
with being grateful that we have been born in a
land, in which the interests of religion are as little
as possible sullied by the vicious contamination of
those of life; in which Christian humility is not
exhibited
beneath the purple, nor Jewish adhesion by
intolerance; in which man is left to care for the
welfare of his own soul, and in which, so far as the
human eye can penetrate, God is worshipped for
himself.
Don Camillo Monforte landed near the retired
graves of the proscribed. As he wished to ascend
the low sand-hills, which have been thrown up by
the waves and the winds of the gulf, on the outer
edge of the Lido, it was necessary that he should
pass directly across the contemned spot, or make
such a circuit as would have been inconvenient.
Crossing himself, with a superstition that was
interwoven
with all his habits and opinions, and
loosening
his rapier, in order that he might not miss the
succor of that good weapon, at need, he moved
across the heath tenanted by the despised dead,
taking care to avoid the mouldering heaps of earth
which lay above the bones of heretic or Jew. He
had not threaded more than half the graves,
however
,
when a human form arose from the grass, and
seemed to walk like one who mused on the moral
that the piles at his feet would be apt to excite.
Again Don Camillo touched the handle of his rapier;
then moving aside, in a manner to give himself an
equal advantage from the light of the moon, he
drew near the stranger. His footstep was heard,
for the other paused, regarded the approaching
cavalier, and folding his arms, as it might be in sign
of neutrality, awaited his nearer approach.
Thou hast chosen a melancholy hour for thy
walk, Signore, said the young Neapolitan; and a
still more melancholy scene. I hope I do not
intrude
on an Israelite, or a Lutheran, who mourns
for his friend?
Don Camillo Monforte, I am, like yourself, a
Christian.
Ha! Thou knowest me'tis Battista, the
gondolier
that I once entertained in my household?
Signore, 'tis not Battista.
As he spoke, the stranger faced the moon, in a
manner that threw all of its mild light upon his
features
.
Jacopo! exclaimed the duke, recoiling, as did
all in Venice habitually, when that speaking eye was
unexpectedly met.
SignoreJacopo.
In a moment the rapier of Don Camillo glittered
in the rays of the moon.
Keep thy distance, fellow, and explain the
motive that hath brought thee thus across my
solitude
!
The Bravo smiled, but his arms maintained their
fold.
I might, with equal justice, call upon the Duke
of Sant' Agata to furnish reasons, why he wanders
at this hour among the Hebrew graves.
Nay, spare thy pleasantry; I trifle not with men
of thy reputation; if any in Venice have thought
fit to employ thee against my person, thou wilt have
need of all thy courage and skill, ere thou earnest
thy fee.
Put up thy rapier, Don Camillo; here is none to
do you harm. Think you, if employed in the
manner
you name, I would be in this spot to seek you?
Ask yourself whether your visit here was known,
or whether it was more than the idle caprice of a
young noble, who finds his bed less easy than his
gondola. We have met, Duke of Sant' Agata, when
you distrusted my honor less.
Thou speakest true, Jacopo; returned the
noble
,
suffering the point of his rapier to fall from
before
the breast of the Bravo, though he still hesitated
to withdraw the point. Thou sayest the truth.
My visit to this spot is indeed accidental, and thou
could'st not have possibly foreseen it. Why art thou
here?
Why are these here? demanded Jacopo,
pointing
to the graves at his feet. We are born, and
we diethat much is known to us all; but the
when and the where are mysteries, until time reveals
them.
Thou art not a man to act without good
motive
.
Though these Israelites could not foresee their
visit to the Lido, thine hath not been without
intention
.
I am here, Don Camillo Monforte, because my
spirit hath need of room. I want the air of the sea
the canals choke meI can only breathe in
freedom
on this bank of sand!
Thou hast another reason, Jacopo?
Ay, SignoreI lothe yon city of crimes!
As the Bravo spoke, he shook his hand in the
direction
of the domes of St. Mark, and the deep tones
of his voice appeared to heave up from the depths of
his chest.
This is extraordinary language for a
Bravo; speak the word boldly, Signoreit is no
stranger to my ears. But even the stiletto of a
Bravo is honorable, compared to that sword of
pretended
justice which St. Mark wields! The
commonest
hireling of Italyhe who will plant his dagger
in the heart of his friend for two sequins, is a man
of open dealing, compared to the merciless
treachery
of some in yonder town!
I understand thee, Jacopo; thou art, at length,
proscribed. The public voice, faint as it is in the
republic, has finally reached the ears of thy
employers
,
and they withdraw their protection.
Jacopo regarded the noble, for an instant, with an
expression so ambiguous, as to cause the latter
insensibly
to raise the point of his rapier, but when he
answered, it was with his ordinary quiet.
Signor Duca, he said, I have been thought
worthy to be retained by Don Camillo Monforte!
I deny it notand now that thou recallest the
occasion, new light breaks in upon me. Villain, to
thy faithlessness I owe the loss of my bride!
Though the rapier was at the very throat of
Jacopo, he did not flinch. Gazing at his excited
companion, he laughed in a smothered manner, but
bitterly.
It would seem that the Lord of Sant' Agata
wishes to rob me of my trade, he said. Arise,
ye Israelites, and bear witness, lest men doubt the
fact! A common bravo of the canals is waylaid,
among your despised graves, by the proudest
Signor
of Calabria! You have chosen your spot, in
mercy, Don Camillo, for sooner or later this
crumbling
and sea-worn earth is to receive me. Were I
to die at the altar itself, with the most penitent prayer
of holy church on my lips, the bigots would send
my body to rest among those hungry Hebrews and
accursed heretics. Yes, I am a man proscribed, and
unfit to sleep with the faithful!
His companion spoke with so strange a mixture
of irony and melancholy, that the purpose of Don
Camillo wavered. But remembering his loss, he
shook the rapier's point, and continued:
Thy taunts and effrontery will not avail thee,
knave; he cried. Thou knowest that I would
have engaged thee as the leader of a chosen band,
to favor the flight of one dear from Venice.
Nothing more true, Signore.
And thou didst refuse the service?
Noble duke, I did.
Not content with this, having learned the
particulars
of my project, thou sold the secret to the
senate?
Don Camillo Monforte, I did not. My
engagements
with the council would not permit me to
serve you; else, by the brightest star of yonder
vault! it would have gladdened my heart to have
witnessed the happiness of two young and faithful
lovers. Nonono; they know me not, who
think I cannot find pleasure in the joy of another.
I told you that I was the senate's,and there the
matter ended.
And I had the weakness to believe thee, Jacopo,
for thou hast a character so strangely compounded
of good and evil, and bearest so fair a name for
observance
of thy faith, that the seeming frankness
of the answer lulled me to security. Fellow, I
have been betrayed, and that at the moment when
I thought success most sure.
Jacopo manifested interest, but, as he moved
slowly on, accompanied by the vigilant and zealous
noble, he smiled coldly, like one who had pity for
the other's credulity.
In bitterness of soul, I have cursed the whole
race for its treachery; continued the Neapolitan.
This is rather for the priore of St. Mark, than
for the ear of one who carries a public stiletto.
My gondola has been imitatedthe liveries of
my people copiedmy bride stolen.Thou
answerest
not, Jacopo?
What answer would you have? You have been
cozened, Signore, in a state, whose very prince
dare not trust his secrets to his wife. You would
have robbed Venice of an heiress, and Venice
has robbed you of a bride. You have played
high, Don Camillo, and have lost a heavy stake.
You have thought of your own wishes and rights,
while you have pretended to serve Venice with the
Spaniard.
Don Camillo started in surprise.
Why this wonder, Signore?You forget that I
have lived much among those who weigh the
chances of every political interest, and that your
name is often in their mouths. This marriage is
doubly disagreeable to Venice, who has nearly as
much need of the bridegroom as of the bride. The
council hath long ago forbidden the banns.
Aybut the means?explain the means by
which I have been duped, lest the treachery be
ascribed to thee.
Signore, the very marbles of the city give up
their secrets to the state. I have seen much, and
Vol. II. D
understood much, when my superiors have believed
me merely a tool; but I have seen much that even
those who employed me could not comprehend. I
could have foretold this consummation of your
nuptials
,
had I known of their celebration.
This thou could'st not have done, without being
an agent of their treachery.
The schemes of the selfish may be foretold; it
is only the generous and the honest that baffle
calculation
.
He who can gain a knowledge of the
present interest of Venice is master of her dearest
secrets of state; for what she wishes she will do,
unless the service cost too dear. As for the means
how can they be wanting in a household like
yours, Signore?
I trusted none but those deepest in my
confidence
.
Don Camillo, there is not a servitor in your
palace, Gino alone excepted, who is not a hireling
of the senate, or of its agents. The very gondoliers,
who row you to your daily pleasures, have had
their hands crossed with the republic's sequins.
Nay, they are not only paid to watch you, but to
watch each other.
Can this be true!
Have you ever doubted it, Signore? asked
Jacopo, looking up like one who admired at
another's simplicity.
I knew them to be falsepretenders to a faith
that in secret they mock; but I had not believed
they dared to tamper with the very menials of my
person. This undermining of the security of
families
is to destroy society at its core!
You talk like one who hath not been long a
bridegroom, Signore; said the Bravo with a
hollow
laugh. A year hence, you may know what
it is to have your own wife turning your secret
thoughts into gold.
And thou servest them, Jacopo?
Who does not, in some manner suited to his
habits? We are not masters of our fortune, Don
Camillo, or the Duke of Sant' Agata would not be
turning his influence with a relative, to the
advantage
of the republic. What I have done hath not
been done without bitter penitence, and an agony
of soul, that your own light servitude may have
spared you, Signore.
Poor Jacopo!
If I have lived through it all, 'tis because one
mightier than the state hath not deserted me. But,
Don Camillo Monforte, there are crimes which pass
beyond the powers of man to endure.
The Bravo shuddered, and he moved among the
despised graves, in silence.
They have then proved too ruthless even for
thee? said Don Camillo, who watched the
contracting
eye and heaving form of his companion, in
wonder.
Signore, they have. I have witnessed, this
night, a proof of their heartlessness and bad faith,
that hath caused me to look forward to my own
fate. The delusion is over; from this hour I serve
them no longer.
The Bravo spoke with deep feeling, and his
companion
fancied, strange as it was coming from such
a man, with an air of wounded integrity. Don
Camillo knew that there was no condition of life,
however degraded or lost to the world, which had
not its own particular opinions of the faith due to its
fellows; and he had seen enough of the sinuous
course of the oligarchy of Venice, to understand
that it was quite possible its shameless and
irresponsible
duplicity might offend the principles of even
an assassin. Less odium was attached to men of
that class, in Italy and at that day, than will be
easily imagined in a country like this; for the
radical
defects and the vicious administration of the
laws, caused an irritable and sensitive people too
often to take into their own hands, the right of
redressing
their own wrongs. Custom had lessened
the odium of the crime, and though society
denounced
the assassin himself, it is scarcely too
much to say, that his employer was regarded with
little more disgust than the religious of our time
regard
the survivor of a private combat. Still it was
not usual for nobles like Don Camillo to hold
inter-course
,
beyond that which the required service
exacted
,
with men of Jacopo's east; but the language
and manner of the Bravo so strongly attracted the
curiosity, and even the sympathy of his companion,
that the latter unconsciously sheathed his rapier and
drew nearer.
Thy penitence and regrets, Jacopo, may lead
thee yet nearer to virtue, he said, than mere
abandonment
of the senate's service. Seek out some
godly priest, and ease thy soul, by confession and
prayer.
The Bravo trembled in every limb, and his eye
turned wistfully to the countenance of the other.
Speak, Jacopo; even I will hear thee, if thou
would'st remove the mountain from thy breast.
Thanks, noble Signore! a thousand thanks for
this glimpse of sympathy, to which I have long been
a stranger! None know how dear a word of
kindness
is, as he who has been condemned by all, as I
have been. I have prayedI have cravedI have
wept for some ear to listen to my tale, and I thought
I had found one who would have heard me without
scorn, when the cold policy of the senate struck him.
I came here to commune with the hated dead, when
chance brought us together. Could I the Bravo
paused and looked doubtfully, again, at his
companion
.
Say on, Jacopo.
I have not dared to trust my secrets even to the
confessional, Signore, and can I be so bold as to
offer them to you?
Truly, it is a strange behest!
Signore, it is. You are noble, I am of humble
blood. Your ancestors were senators and doges of
Venice, while mine have been, since the fishermen
first built their huts in the Lagunes, laborers on the
canals, and rowers of gondolas. You are powerful,
and rich, and courted; while I am denounced, and,
in secret, I fear, condemned. In short, you are Don
Camillo Monforte, and I am Jacopo Frontoni!
Don Camillo was touched, for the Bravo spoke
without bitterness, and in deep sorrow.
I would thou wert at the confessional, poor
Jacopo
!
he said; I am little able to give ease to
such a burthen.
Signore, I have lived too long, shut out from the
good wishes of my fellows, and I can bear with it
no longer. The accursed senate may cut me off
without warning, and then who will stop to look at
my grave. Signore, I must speak, or die!
Thy case is piteous, Jacopo!Thou hast need
of ghostly counsel.
Here is no priest, Signore, and I carry a weight
past bearing. The only man who has shown
interest
in me, for three long and dreadful years, is
gone!
But he will return, poor Jacopo.
Signore, he will never return. He is with the
fishes of the Lagunes.
By thy hand, monster!
By the justice of the illustrious republic, said
the Bravo, with a smothered but bitter smile.
Ha! they are then awake to the acts of thy
class? Thy repentance is the fruit of fear!
Jacopo seemed choked. He had evidently
counted
on the awakened sympathy of his companion,
D2
notwithstanding the difference in their situations, and
to be thus thrown off again, unmanned him. He
shuddered, and every muscle and nerve appeared
about to yield its power. Touched by so
unequivocal
signs of suffering, Don Camillo kept close at his
side, reluctant to enter more deeply into the feelings
of one of his known character, and yet unable to
desert a fellow-creature in so grievous agony.
Signor Duca, said the Bravo, with a pathos in
his voice that went to the heart of his auditor, leave
me. If they ask for a proscribed man, let them come
here; in the morning they will find my body near
the graves of the heretics.
Speak, I will hear thee.
Jacopo looked up with doubt expressed on his
features.
Unburthen thyself; I will listen, though thou
recounted the assassination of my dearest friend.
The oppressed Bravo gazed at him, as if he still
distrusted his sincerity. His face worked, and his
look became still more wistful; but as Don Camillo
faced the moon, and betrayed the extent of his
sympathy
,
the other burst into tears.
Jacopo, I will hear theeI will hear thee, poor
Jacopo! cried Don Camillo, shocked at this
exhibition
of distress in one so stern by nature. A wave
from the hand of the Bravo silenced him, and Jacopo,
struggling with himself for a moment, spoke.
You have saved a soul from perdition, Signore,
he said, smothering his emotion. If the happy
knew how much power belongs to a single word of
kindnessa glance of feeling, when given to the
despised, they would not look so coldly on the
miserable
.
This night must have been my last, had
you cast me off without pitybut you will hear
my tale, Signoreyou will not scorn the confession
of a Bravo?
I have promised. Be brief, for at this moment
I have great care of my own.
Signore, I know not the whole of your wrongs,
but they will not be less likely to be redressed for
this grace.
Jacopo made an effort to command himself, when
he commenced his tale.
The course of the narrative does not require that
we should accompany this extraordinary man,
through the relation of the secrets he imparted to
Don Camillo. It is enough, for our present purposes,
to say, that, as he proceeded, the young Calabrian
noble drew nearer to his side, and listened with
growing interest. The Duke of Sant' Agata
scarcely
breathed, while his companion, with that energy
of language and feeling which marks Italian
character
,
recounted his secret sorrows, and the scenes
in which he had been an actor. Long before he
was done, Don Camillo had forgotten his own
private
causes of concern, and, by the time the tale
was finished, every shade of disgust had given place
to an ungovernable expression of pity. In short, so
eloquent was the speaker, and so interesting the
facts with which he dealt, that he seemed to play
with the sympathies of the listener, as the
improvisatore
of that region is known to lead captive the
passions of the admiring crowd.
During the time Jacopo was speaking, he and his
wondering auditor had passed the limits of the
despised
cemetery; and as the voice of the former
ceased, they stood on the outer beach of the Lido.
When the low tones of the Bravo were no longer
audible, they were succeeded by the sullen wash of
the Adriatic.
This surpasseth belief! Don Camillo
exclaimed
,
after a long pause, which had only been
disturbed
by the rush and retreat of the waters.
Signore, as holy Maria is kind! it is true.
I doubt you not, Jacopopoor Jacopo! I
cannot
distrust a tale thus told! Thou hast, indeed, been
a victim of their hellish duplicity, and well mayest
thou say, the load was past bearing. What is thy
intention?
I serve them no longer, Don CamilloI wait
only for the last solemn scene, which is now
certain
,
and then I quit this city of deceit, to seek my
fortune in another region. They have blasted my
youth, and loaded my name with infamy.God may
yet lighten the load!
Reproach not thyself beyond reason, Jacopo,
for the happiest and most fortunate of us all are not
above the power of temptation. Thou knowest that
even my name and rank have not, altogether,
protected
me from their arts.
I know them capable, Signore, of deluding
angels
!
Their arts are only surpassed by their means,
and their pretence of virtue by their indifference to
its practice.
Thou sayest true, Jacopo: the truth is never in
greater danger, than when whole communities lend
themselves to the vicious deception of seemliness,
and without truth there is no virtue. This it is to
substitute profession for practiceto use the altar
for a worldly purposeand to bestow power
without
any other responsibility than that which is
exacted
by the selfishness of caste! Jacopopoor
Jacopo! thou shalt be my servitorI am lord of
my own seignories, and once rid of this specious
republic, I charge myself with the care of thy safety
and fortunes. Be at peace as respects thy
conscience
:
I have interest near the holy see, and thou
shalt not want absolution!
The gratitude of the Bravo was more vivid in
feeling than in expression. He kissed the hand of
Don Camillo, but it was with a reservation of
self-respect
,
that belonged to the character of the man.
A system like this of Venice, continued the
musing noble, leaves none of us masters of our
own acts. The wiles of such a combination are
stronger than the will. It clokes its offences against
right in a thousand specious forms, and it enlists the
support of every man, under the pretence of a
sacrifice
for the common good. We often fancy
ourselves
simple dealers in some justifiable state
intrigue
,
when in truth we are deep in sin. Falsehood
is the parent of all crimes, and in no case has it a
progeny so numerous, as that in which its own
birth is derived from the state. I fear I may have
made sacrifices, to this treacherous influence, I
could wish forgotten.
Though Don Camillo soliloquized, rather than
addressed
his companion, it was evident, by the train
of his thoughts, that the narrative of Jacopo had
awakened disagreeable reflections, on the manner
in which he had pushed his own claims, with the
senate. Perhaps he felt the necessity of some
apology
to one who, though so much his inferior in rank,
was so competent to appreciate his conduct, and
who had just denounced in the strongest language,
his own fatal subserviency to the arts of that
irresponsible
and meretricious body.
Jacopo uttered a few words of a general nature,
but such as had a tendency to quiet the uneasiness
of his companion; after which, with a readiness
that proved him qualified for the many delicate
missions
with which he had been charged, he
ingeniously
turned the discourse to the recent abduction
of Donna Violetta, with the offer of rendering his
new employer all the services in his power to
regain
his bride.
That thou mayest know all thou hast
undertaken
,
rejoined Don Camillo, listen, Jacopo, and
I will conceal nothing from thy shrewdness.
The Duke of Sant' Agata now briefly, but
explicitly
,
laid bare to his companion all his own views
and measures, with respect to her he loved, and all
those events, with which the reader has already
become
acquainted.
The Bravo gave great attention to the minutest
parts of the detail, and more than once, as the other
proceeded, he smiled to himself, like a man who
was able to trace the secret means, by which this
or that intrigue had been effected. The whole was
just related, when the sound of a footstep announced
the return of Gino.
CHAPTER III.
Pale she look'd,
Yet cheerful; though methought, once, if not twice,
She wiped away a tear that would be coming.
Rogers.
The
hours passed as if naught had occurred,
within the barriers of the city, to disturb their
progress
.
On the following morning men proceeded to
their several pursuits, of business or of pleasure, as
had been done for ages, and none stopped to
question
his neighbor of the scene which might have
taken place during the night. Some were gay, and
others sorrowing; some idle, and others occupied;
here one toiled, there another sported; and Venice
presented, as of wont, its noiseless, suspicious, busy,
mysterious, and yet stirring throngs, as it had before
done at a thousand similar risings of the sun.
The menials lingered around the water-gate of
Donna Violetta's palace, with distrustful but cautious
faces, scarce whispering among themselves their
secret suspicions of the fate of their mistress. The
residence of the Signor Gradenigo presented its
usual gloomy magnificence, while the abode of Don
Camillo Monforte betrayed no sign of the heavy
disappointment which its master had sustained.
The Bella Sorrentina still lay in the port, with a
yard on deck, while the crew repaired its sail in the
lazy manner of mariners, who work without
excitement
.
The Lagunes were dotted with the boats of
fishermen
,
and travellers arrived and departed from the
city, by the well-known channels of Fusina and
Mestre
.
Here, some adventurer from the north quitted
the canals, on his return towards the Alps, carrying
with him a pleasing picture of the ceremonies he
had witnessed, mingled with some crude conjectures
of that power which predominated in the suspected
state; and there, a countryman of the Main sought
his little farm, satisfied with the pageants and
regatta
of the previous day. In short, all seemed as
usual, and the events we have related remained a
secret
with the actors, and that mysterious council
which had so large a share in their existence.
As the day advanced, many a sail was spread for
the pillars of Hercules, or the genial Levant, and
feluccas, mystics and golettas, went and came as the
land or sea-breeze prevailed. Still the mariner of
Calabria lounged beneath the awning which
sheltered
his deck, or took his siesta on a pile of old sails,
which were ragged with the force of many a hot
sirocco. As the sun fell, the gondolas of the great
and idle began to glide over the water; and when
the two squares were cooled by the air of the
Adriatic
,
the Broglio began to fill with those privileged
to pace its vaulted passage. Among these came the
Duke of Sant' Agata, who, though an alien to the
laws of the republic, being of so illustrious descent,
and of claims so equitable, was received among the
senators, in their moments of ease, as a welcome
sharer in this vain distinction. He entered the
Broglio at the wonted hour, and with his usual
composure
,
for he trusted to his secret influence at Rome,
and something to the success of his rivals, for
impunity
.
Reflection had shown Don Camillo that, as
his plans were known to the council, they would
long since have arrested him, had such been their
intention; and it had also led him to believe, that
the most efficient manner of avoiding the personal
consequences of his adventure, was to show
confidence
in his own power to withstand them. When
he appeared, therefore, leaning on the arm of a high
officer of the papal embassy, and with an eye that
spoke assurance in himself, he was greeted, as usual,
by all who knew him, as was due to his rank and
expectations. Still Don Camillo walked among the
patricians of the republic with novel sensations.
More than once he thought he detected, in the
wandering
glances of those with whom he conversed,
signs of their knowledge of his frustrated attempt,
and more than once, when he least suspected such
scrutiny, his countenance was watched, as if the
observer sought some evidence of his future
intentions
.
Beyond this, none might have discovered that
an heiress of so much importance had been so near
being lost to the state, or, on the other hand, that a
bridegroom had been robbed of his bride. Habitual
art, on the part of the state, and resolute but wary
intention, on the part of the young noble, concealed
all else from observation.
In this manner the day passed, not a tongue in
Venice, beyond those which whispered in secret,
making any allusion to the incidents of our tale.
Just as the sun was setting, a gondola swept
slowly
up to the water-gate of the ducal palace. The
gondolier
landed, fastened his boat in the usual manner
to the stepping-stones, and entered the court. He
wore a mask, for the hour of disguise had come, and
his attire was so like the ordinary fashion of men
of his class, as to defeat recognition by its simplicity.
Glancing an eye about him, he entered the building
by a private door.
The edifice in which the Doges of Venice dwelt
still stands a gloomy monument of the policy of the
republic, furnishing evidence, in itself, of the
specious
character of the prince whom it held. It is
built around a vast but gloomy court, as is usual with
nearly all of the principal edifices of Europe. One
of its fronts forms a side of the piazzetta, so often
mentioned, and another lines the quay next the port.
The architecture of these two exterior faces of the
palace renders the structure remarkable. A low
portico, which forms the Broglio, sustains a row of
massive oriental windows, and above these again
lies a pile of masonry, slightly relieved by apertures,
which reverses the ordinary uses of the arts. A
third front is nearly concealed by the cathedral of
St. Mark, and the fourth is washed by its canal.
The public prison of the city forms the other side
of this canal, eloquently proclaiming the nature of
the government by the close approximation of the
powers of legislation and of punishment. The
famous
Bridge of Sighs is the material, and we might
add the metaphorical, link between the two. The
latter edifice stands on the quay, also, and though
less lofty and spacious, in point of architectural
beauty
it is the superior structure, though the quaintness
and unusual style of the palace is most apt to attract
attention.
The masked gondolier soon reappeared beneath
the arch of the water-gate, and with a hurried step
he sought his boat. It required but a minute to
cross the canal, to land on the opposite quay, and to
enter the public door of the prison. It would seem
that he had some secret means of satisfying the
vigilance
of the different keepers, for bolts were drawn,
Vol. II. E
and doors unlocked, with little question, wherever he
presented himself. In this manner he quickly passed
all the outer barriers of the palace, and reached a
part of the building, which had the appearance of
being fitted for the accommodation of a family.
Judging from the air of all around him, those who
dwelt there took the luxury of their abode but little
into the account, though neither the furniture nor the
rooms were wanting in most of the necessaries,
suited to people of their class and the climate, and
in that age.
The gondolier had ascended a private stairway,
and he was now before a door, which had none of
those signs of a prison, that so freely abounded in
other parts of the building. He paused to listen,
and then tapped, with singular caution.
Who is without? asked a gentle female voice,
at the same instant that the latch moved and fell
again, as if she within waited to be assured of the
character of her visitor, before she opened the door
A friend to thee, Gelsomina; was the answer.
Nay, here all are friends to the keepers, if words
can be believed. You must name yourself, or go
elsewhere for your answer.
The gondolier removed the mask a little, which
had altered his voice as well as concealed his face.
It is I, Gessina, he said, using the diminutive of
her name.
The bolts grated, and the door was hurriedly
opened.
It is wonderful that I did not know thee, Carlo!
said the female, with eager simplicity; but thou
takest so many disguises of late, and so
counterfeitest
strange voices, that thine own mother might have
distrusted her ear.
The gondolier paused to make certain they were
alone; then, laying aside the mask altogether, he
exposed the features of the Bravo.
Thou knowest the need of caution, he added,
and wilt not judge me harshly.
I said not that, Carlobut thy voice is so
familiar
,
that I thought it wonderful thou could'st speak
as a stranger.
Hast thou aught for me?
The gentle girl, for she was both young and
gentle
,
hesitated.
Hast thou aught new, Gelsomina? repeated the
Bravo, reading her innocent face with his searching
glance.
Thou art fortunate in not being sooner in the
prison. I have just had a visitor. Thou would'st
not have liked to be seen, Carlo?
Thou knowest I have good reasons for coming
masked. I might, or I might not have disliked thy
acquaintance, as he should have proved.
Nay, now thou judgest wrong; returned the
female, hastily, I had no other, here, but my cousin,
Annina.
Dost thou think me jealous? said the Bravo,
smiling in kindness, as he took her hand. Had it
been thy cousin Pietro, or Michele, or Roberto, or
any other youth of Venice, I should have no other
dread than that of being known.
But it was only Anninamy cousin, Annina,
whom thou hast never seenand I have no cousins
Pietro, and Michele, and Roberto. We are not
many, Carlo. Annina has a brother, but he never
comes hither. Indeed it is long since she has found
it convenient to quit her trade to come to this dreary
place. Few children of sisters see each other so
seldom as Annina and I!
Thou art a good girl, Gessina, and art always
to be found near thy mother. Hast thou naught in
particular, for my ear?
Again the soft eyes of Gelsomina, or Gessina, as
she was familiarly called, dropped to the floorbut
raising them, ere he could note the circumstance, she
hurriedly continued the discourse.
I fear Annina will return, or I would go with
thee, at once.
Is this cousin of thine still here, then? asked
the Bravo, with uneasiness.Thou knowest I
would not be seen.
Fear not. She cannot enter without touching
that bell, for she is above with my poor bed-ridden
mother. Thou canst go into the inner room, as
usual, when she comes, and listen to her idle
discourse
,
if thou wiltorbut we have not timefor
Annina comes seldom, and I know not why, but she
seems to love a sick room little, as she never stays
many minutes with her aunt.
Thou would'st have said, or I might go on my
errand, Gessina?
I would, Carlobut I am certain we should be
recalled by my impatient cousin.
I can wait; I am patient when with thee,
dearest
Gessina.
Hist!'Tis my cousin's step.Thou canst
go in.
While she spoke, a small bell rang, and the Bravo
withdrew into the inner room, like one accustomed
to that place of retreat. He left the door ajar, for
the darkness of the closet sufficiently concealed his
person. In the mean time, Gelsomina opened the
outer door for the admission of her visitor. At the
first sound of the latter's voice, Jacopo, who had
little suspected the fact from a name which was so
common, recognized the artful daughter of the
wine-seller.
Thou art at thy ease, here, Gelsomina, cried
the latter, entering and throwing herself into a seat,
like one fatigued. Thy mother is better, and thou
art truly mistress of the house.
I would I were not, Annina, for I am young to
have this trust, with this affliction.
It is not so insupportable, Gessina, to be mistress
within doors, at seventeen! Authority is sweet, and
obedience is odious.
I have found neither so, and I will give up the
first with joy, whenever my poor mother shall be
able to take command of her own family, again.
This is well, Gessina, and does credit to the
good father confessor. But authority is dear to
woman, and so is liberty. Thou wast not with the
maskers yesterday, in the square?
I seldom wear a disguise, and I could not quit
my mother.
Which means that thou would'st have been glad
to do it. Thou hast good reason for thy regrets,
since a gayer marriage of the sea, or a braver
regatta, has not been witnessed in Venice, since
thou wast born. But the first was to be seen from
thy window?
I saw the galley of state sweeping toward the
Lido, and the train of patricians on its deck; but
little else.
No matter. Thou shalt have as good an idea
of the pageant as if thou had'st played the part of
the doge himself. First came the men of the guard,
with their ancient dresses
Nay, this I remember to have often seen; for
the same show is kept from year to year.
Thou art right; but Venice never witnessed
such a brave regatta! Thou knowest that the first
trial is always between gondolas of many oars,
steered by the best esteemed of the canals. Luigi
was there, and though he did not win, he more than
merited success, by the manner in which he
directed
his boat. Thou knowest Luigi?
I scarce know any in Venice, Annina, for the
long illness of my mother, and this unhappy office
E 2
of my father, keep me within, when others are on
the canals.
True. Thou art not well placed to make
acquaintances
.
But Luigi is second to no gondolier,
in skill or reputation, and he is much the merriest
rogue of them all, that put foot on the Lido.
He was foremost, then, in the grand race?
He should have been, but the awkwardness of
his fellows, and some unfairness in the crossing,
threw him back to be second. 'Twas a sight to
behold, that of many noble watermen struggling to
maintain or to get a name on the canals. Santa
Maria! I would thou could'st have seen it, girl!
I should not have been glad to see a friend
defeated.
We must take fortune as it offers. But the most
wonderful sight of the day, after all, though Luigi
and his fellows did so well, was to see a poor
fisherman
,
named Antonio, in his bare head and naked
legs, a man of seventy years, and with a boat no
better than that I use to carry liquors to the Lido,
entering on the second race, and carrying off the
prize!
He could not have met with powerful rivals?
The best of Venice; though Luigi, having
strived for the first, could not enter for the second
trial. 'Tis said, too, continued Annina, looking
about her with habitual caution, that one, who may
scarce be named in Venice, had the boldness to
appear
in that regatta masked; and yet the fisherman
won! Thou hast heard of Jacopo?
The name is common.
There is but one who bears it now, in Venice.
All mean the same when they say Jacopo.
I have heard of a monster of that name. Surely
he hath not dared to show himself among the
nobles
,
on such a festa!
Gessina, we live in an unaccountable country!
The man walks the piazza with a step as lordly as
the doge, at his pleasure, and yet none say aught to
him! I have seen him, at noonday, leaning against
the triumphal mast, or the column of San Teodoro,
with as proud an air as if he were put there to
celebrate a victory of the republic!
Perhaps he is master of some terrible secret,
which they fear he will reveal?
Thou knowest little of Venice, child! Holy
Maria! a secret of that kind is a death-warrant of
itself. It is as dangerous to know too much, as it
is to know too little, when one deals with St. Mark.
But they say Jacopo was there, standing eye to eye
with the doge, and scaring the senators as if he had
been an uncalled spectre from the vaults of their
fathers. Nor is this all; as I crossed the Lagunes
this morning, I saw the body of a young cavalier
drawn from the water, and those who were near it,
said it had the mark of his fatal hand!
The timid Gelsomina shuddered.
They who rule, she said, will have to answer
for this negligence to God, if they let the wretch
longer go at large.
Blessed St. Mark protect his children! They
say there is much of this sort of sin to answer for
but see the body I did, with my own eyes, in
entering
the canals this morning.
And didst thou sleep on the Lido, that thou
wert abroad so early?
The LidoyesnayI slept not, but thou
knowest my father had a busy day during the
revels, and I am not like thee, Gessina, mistress of
the household, to do as I would. But I tarry here
to chat with thee, when there is great need of
industry
at home. Hast thou the package, child,
which I trusted to thy keeping, at my last visit?
It is here, answered Gelsomina, opening a
drawer, and handing to her cousin a small but
closely enveloped package, which, unknown to
herself
,
contained some articles of forbidden commerce,
and which the other, in her indefatigable activity,
had been obliged to secrete for a time. I had
begun
to think that thou hadst forgotten it, and was
about to send it to thee.
Gelsomina, if thou lovest me, never do so rash
an act! My brother Guiseppethou scarce
knowest
Guiseppe?
We have little acquaintance, for cousins.
Thou art fortunate in thy ignorance. I cannot
say what I might of the child of the same parents,
but had Guiseppe seen this package, by any
accident
,
it might have brought thee into great trouble!
Nay, I fear not thy brother, nor any else, said
the daughter of the prison-keeper, with the firmness
of innocence; he could do me no harm for dealing
kindly by a relative.
Thou art right; but he might have caused me
great vexation. Sainted Maria! if thou knewest
the pain that unthinking and misguided boy gives
his family! He is my brother, after all, and you
will fancy the rest. Addio, good Gessina; I hope
thy father will permit thee to come and visit, at last,
those who so much love thee.
Addio, Annina; thou knowest I would come
gladly, but that I scarce quit the side of my poor
mother.
The wily daughter of the wine-seller gave her
guileless and unsuspecting friend a kiss, and then
she was let out and departed.
Carlo, said the soft voice of Gessina; thou
canst come forth, for we have no further fear of
visits.
The Bravo appeared, but with a paleness deeper
than common on his cheek. He looked mournfully
at the gentle and affectionate being who awaited his
return, and when he struggled to answer her
ingenuous
smile, the abortive effort gave his features an
expression of ghastliness.
Annina has wearied thee with her idle discourse
of the regatta, and of murders on the canals. Thou
wilt not judge her harshly, for the manner in which
she spoke of Giuseppe, who may deserve this, and
more. But, I know thy impatience, and I will not
increase thy weariness.
Hold, Gessinathis girl is thy cousin?
Have I not told thee so? our mothers are
sisters
.
And she is here often?
Not as often as she could wish, I am certain,
for her aunt has not quitted her room for many,
many months.
Thou art an excellent daughter, kind Gessina,
and would make all others as virtuous as thyself.
And thou hast been to return these visits?
Never. My father forbids it, for they are
dealers
in wines, and entertain the gondoliers in revelry.
But Annina is blameless for the trade of her
parents
.
No doubtand that package? it hath been long
in thy keeping.
A month; Annina left it at her last visit, for
she was hurried to cross to the Lido. But why
these questions? You do not like my cousin, who
is giddy, and given to idle conversation, but who, I
think, must have a good heart. Thou heard'st the
manner in which she spoke of the wretched bravo,
Jacopo, and of this late murder?
I did.
Thou could'st not have shown more horror at
the monster's crime thyself, Carlo. Nay, Annina is
thoughtless, and she might be less worldly; but she
hath, like all of us, a holy aversion to sin. Shall I
lead thee to the cell?
Go on.
Thy honest nature revolts, Carlo, at the cold
villany of the assassin. I have heard much of his
murders, and of the manner in which those up above
bear with him. They say, in common, that his art
surpasseth theirs, and that the officers wait for
proof, that they may not do injustice.
Is the senate so tender, think you? asked the
Bravo, huskily, but motioning for his companion to
proceed.
The girl looked sad, like one who felt the force
of this question; and she turned away to open a
private door, whence she brought forth a little box.
This is the key, Carlo, she said, showing him
one of a massive bunch, and I am now the sole
warder. This much, at least, we have effected; the
day may still come when we shall do more.
The Bravo endeavored to smile, as if he
appreciated
her kindness; but he only succeeded in
making
her understand his desire to go on. The eye of
the gentle-hearted girl lost its gleam of hope in an
expression of sorrow, and she obeyed.
CHAPTER IV.
But let us to the roof,
And, when thou hast survey'd the sea, the land,
Visit the narrow cells that cluster there,
As in a place of tombs.
St. Mark's Place
.
We
shall not attempt to thread the vaulted
galleries
,
the gloomy corridors, and all the apartments,
through which the keeper's daughter led her
companion
.
Those, who have ever entered an extensive
prison, will require no description to revive the
feeling
of pain which it excited, by barred windows,
creaking hinges, grating bolts, and all those other
signs, which are alike the means and evidence of
incarceration. The building, unhappily like most
other edifices intended to repress the vices of
society
,
was vast, strong, and intricate within, although,
as has been already intimated, of a chaste and
simple
beauty externally, that might seem to have been
adopted in mockery of its destination.
Gelsomina entered a low, narrow, and glazed
gallery
,
when she stopped.
Thou soughtest me, as wont, beneath the
water-gate
,
Carlo, she asked, at the usual hour?
I should not have entered the prison had I found
thee there, for thou knowest I would be little seen.
But I bethought me of thy mother, and crossed the
canal.
Thou wast wrong. My mother rests much as she
has done, for many monthsthou must have seen
that we are not taking the usual route to the cell?
I have; but as we are not accustomed to meet
in thy father's rooms, on this errand, I thought this
the necessary direction.
Hast thou much knowledge of the palace and
the prison, Carlo?
More than I could wish, good Gelsomina;but
why am I thus questioned, at a moment when I
would be otherwise employed?
The timid and conscious girl did not answer. Her
cheek was never bright, for like a flower reared in
the shade, it had the delicate hue of her secluded
life; but at this question it became pale.
Accustomed
to the ingenuous habits of the sensitive being at
his side, the Bravo studied her speaking features
intently
.
He moved swiftly to a window, and looking
out, his eye fell upon a narrow and gloomy canal.
Crossing the gallery, he cast a glance beneath him,
and saw the same dark watery passage, leading
between
the masonry of two massive piles to the quay
and the port.
Gelsomina! he cried, recoiling from the sight,
this is the Bridge of Sighs!
It is, Carlo; hast thou ever crossed it before?
Never: nor do I understand why I cross it now.
I have long thought that it might one day be my
fortune
to walk this fatal passage, but I could not dream
of such a keeper!
The eye of Gelsomina brightened, and her smile
was cheerful.
Thou wilt never cross it, to thy harm, with me.
Of that I am certain, kind Gessina, he
answered
,
taking her hand. But this is a riddle that I
cannot explain. Art thou in the habit of entering
the palace by this gallery?
It is little used, except by the keepers and the
condemned, as doubtless thou hast often heard; but
yet they have given me the keys, and taught me the
windings of the place, in order that I might serve,
as usual, for thy guide.
Gelsomina, I fear I have been too happy in thy
company to note, as prudence would have told me,
the rare kindness of the council in permitting me to
enjoy it!
Dost thou repent, Carlo, that thou hast known
me?
The reproachful melancholy of her voice
touched
the Bravo, who kissed the hand he held, with
Italian fervor.
I should then repent me of the only hours of
happiness I have known for years, he said. Thou
hast been to me, Gelsomina, like a flower in a
desert
a
pure spring to a feverish mana gleam of
hope to one suffering under malediction.No, no;
not for a moment have I repented knowing thee, my
Gelsomina!
'Twould not have made my life more happy,
Carlo, to have thought I had added to thy sorrows.
I am young, and ignorant of the world, but I know
we should cause joy, and not pain, to those we
esteem.
Thy nature would teach thee this gentle lesson.
But, is it not strange that one, like me, should be
suffered to visit the prison unattended by any other
keeper?
I had not thought it so, Carlo; but, surely it is
not common!
We have found so much pleasure in each other,
dear Gessina, that we have overlooked what ought
to have caused alarm.
Alarm, Carlo!
Or, at least, distrust; for these wily senators do
no act of mercy without a motive. But it is now
too late to recall the past, if we would; and in that
which relates to thee I would not lose the memory
of a moment. Let us proceed.
The slight cloud vanished from the face of the mild
auditor of the Bravo; but still she did not move.
Few pass this bridge, they say, she added
tremulously
,
and enter the world again; and yet thou
dost not even ask why we are here, Carlo!
There was a transient gleam of distrust in the
hasty glance of the Bravo, as he shot a look at the
undisturbed eye of the innocent being who put this
question. But it scarcely remained long enough to
change the expression of manly interest she was
accustomed to meet in his look.
Since thou wilt have me curious, he said, why
hast thou come hither, and more than all, being here,
why dost thou linger?
The season is advanced, Carlo, she answered,
speaking scarcely above her breath, and we should
look in vain among the cells.
I understand thee, he said, we will proceed.
Gelsomina lingered to gaze wistfully into the face
Vol. II. F
of her companion, but finding no visible sign of the
agony he endured, she went on. Jacopo spoke
hoarsely, but he was too long accustomed to
disguise
,
to permit the weakness to escape, when he
knew how much it would pain the sensitive and
faithful being, who had yielded her affections to him,
with a singleness and devotion which arose nearly
as much from her manner of life, as from natural
ingenuousness.
In order that the reader may be enabled to
understand
the allusions, which seem to be so plain
to our lovers, it may be necessary to explain
another
odious feature in the policy of the republic of
Venice.
Whatever may be the pretension of a state, in its
acknowledged theories, an unerring clue to its true
character is ever to be found in the machinery of
its practice. In those governments which are
created
for the good of the people, force is applied with
caution and reluctance, since the protection and not
the injury of the weak is their object; whereas the
more selfish and exclusive the system becomes, the
more severe and ruthless are the coercive means
employed by those in power. Thus, in Venice,
whose whole political fabric reposed on the narrow
foundation of an oligarchy, the jealousy of the
senate
brought the engines of despotism in absolute
contact with even the pageantry of their titular
prince, and the palace of the doge himself was
polluted
by the presence of the dungeons. The
princely
edifice had its summer and winter cells. The
reader may be ready to believe that mercy had
dictated
some slight solace for the miserable, in this
arrangement. But this would be ascribing pity to
a body, which, to its latest moment, had no tie to
subject it to the weakness of humanity. So far
from consulting the sufferings of the captive, his
winter cell was below the level of the canals, while
his summers were to be past beneath the leads,
exposed
to the action of the burning sun of that
climate
.
As the reader has probably anticipated,
already
,
that Jacopo was in the prison on an errand
connected with some captive, this short explanation
will enable him to understand the secret allusion of
his companion. He they sought had, in truth, been
recently conveyed from the damp cells, where he had
passed the winter and spring, to the heated chambers
beneath the roof.
Gelsomina continued to lead the way, with a
sadness
of eye and feature, that betrayed her strong
sympathy
with the sufferings of her companion, but
without
appearing to think further delay necessary. She
had communicated a circumstance, which weighed
heavily on her own mind, and, like most of her mild
temperament, who had dreaded such a duty, now
that it was discharged, she experienced a sensible
relief. They ascended many flights of steps,
opened
and shut numberless doors, and threaded
several
narrow corridors, in silence, before reaching
the place of destination. While Gelsomina sought
the key of the door, before which they stopped,
in the large bunch she carried, the Bravo breathed
the hot air of the attic, like one who was
suffocating
.
They promised me that this should not be done
again! he said.But they forget their pledges,
fiends, as they are!
Carlo!thou forgettest that this is the palace of
the doge! whispered the girl, while she threw a
timid glance behind her.
I forget nothing that is connected with the
republic
!It
is all here, striking his flushed browwhat
is not there, is in my heart!
Poor Carlo! this cannot last for everthere will
be an end.
Thou art right; answered the Bravo, hoarsely.
The end is nearer than thou thinkest.No
matter
;
turn the key, that we may go in.
The hand of Gelsomina lingered on the lock, but
admonished by his impatient eye, she complied, and
they entered the cell.
Father! exclaimed the Bravo, hastening to the
side of a pallet, that lay on the floor.
The attenuated and feeble form of an old man rose
at the word, and an eye which, while it spoke mental
feebleness, was at that moment even brighter than
that of his son, glared on the faces of Gelsomina and
her companion.
Thou hast not suffered, as I had feared, by this
sudden change, father! continued the latter,
kneeling
by the side of the straw.Thine eye, and cheek,
and countenance are better, than in the damp caves
below!
I am happy here, returned the prisoner;
there is light, and though they have given me too
much of it, thou canst never know, my boy, the joy
of looking at the day, after so long a night.
He is better, Gelsomina!They have not yet
destroyed
him. See!his eye is bright even, and his
cheek has a glow!
They are ever so, after passing the winter in the
lower dungeons; whispered the gentle girl.
Hast thou news for me, boy?What tidings from
thy mother?
Jacopo bowed his head to conceal the anguish
occasioned
by this question, which he now heard for
the hundredth time.
She is happy, fatherhappy as one can be, who
so well loves thee, when away from thy side.
Does she speak of me often?
The last word that I heard from her lips, was
thy name.
Holy Maria, bless her! I trust she remembers
me in her prayers?
Doubt it not, father,they are the prayers of an
angel!
And thy patient sister?thou hast not named
her, son.
She, too, is well, father.
Has she ceased to blame herself for being the
innocent cause of my sufferings?
She has.
Then she pines no longer over a blow that
cannot
be helped.
The Bravo seemed to search for relief in the
sympathizing
eye of the pale and speechless Gelsomina.
She has ceased to pine, father; he uttered with
compelled calmness.
Thou hast ever loved thy sister, boy, with
manly
tenderness. Thy heart is kind, as I have reason
to know. If God has given me grief, he has blessed
me, in my children!
A long pause followed, during which the parent
seemed to muse on the past, while the child rejoiced
in the suspension of questions which harrowed his
soul, since those of whom the other spoke had long
been the victims of family misfortune. The old
man, for the prisoner was aged, as well as feeble,
turned his look on the still kneeling Bravo,
thoughtfully
,
and continued.
There is little hope of thy sister marrying, for
none are fond of tying themselves to the
proscribed
.
She wishes it notshe wishes it notshe is
happy, with my mother!
It is a happiness the republic will not begrudge.
Is there no hope of our being able to meet soon?
Thou wilt meet my mother,yes, that pleasure
will come at last!
It is a weary time since any of my blood, but
thee, have stood in my sight. Kneel, that I may
bless thee.
F 2
Jacopo, who had arisen under his mental torture,
obeyed, and bowed his head in reverence to receive
the paternal benediction. The lips of the old man
moved, and his eyes were turned to Heaven, but
his language was of the heart, rather than that of
the tongue. Gelsomina bent her head to her bosom,
and seemed to unite her prayers to those of the
prisoner. When the silent but solemn ceremony
was ended, each made the customary sign of the
cross, and Jacopo kissed the wrinkled hand of the
captive.
Hast thou hope for me? the old man asked,
this pious and grateful duty done. Do they still
promise to let me look upon the sun, again?
They do.They promise fair.
Would that their words were true! I have
lived on hope, for a weary timeI have now been
within these walls, more than four years, methinks.
Jacopo did not answer, for he knew that his
father named the period only that he himself had
been permitted to see him.
I built upon the expectation, that the doge
would remember his ancient servant, and open my
prison-doors.
Still Jacopo was silent, for the doge, of whom
the other spoke, had long been dead.
And yet I should be grateful, for Maria and
the saints have not forgotten me. I am not without
my pleasures, in captivity.
God be praised! returned the Bravo. In
what manner dost thou ease thy sorrows, father?
Look hither, boy, exclaimed the old man,
whose eye betrayed a mixture of feverish
excitement
,
caused by the recent change in his prison,
and the growing imbecility of a mind that was
gradually losing its powers for want of use; dost
thou see the rent in that bit of wood? It opens with
the heat, from time to time, and since I have been
an inhabitant here, that fissure has doubled in length
I sometimes fancy, that when it reaches the knot,
the hearts of the senators will soften, and that my
doors will open. There is a satisfaction, in
watching
its increase, as it lengthens, inch by inch, year
after year!
Is this all?
Nay, I have other pleasures. There was a
spider the past year, that wove his web from
yonder
beam, and he was a companion, too, that I
loved to see; wilt thou look, boy, if there is hope
of his coming back?
I see him not; whispered the Bravo.
Well, there is always the hope of its return.
The flies will enter soon, and then he will be looking
for his prey. They may shut me up on a false
charge, and keep me weary years from my wife
and daughter, but they cannot rob me of all my
happiness!
The aged captive was mute and thoughtful. A
childish impatience glowed in his eye, and he gazed
from the rent, the companion of so many solitary
summers, to the face of his son, like one who began
to distrust his enjoyments.
Well, let them take it away, he said, burying
his head beneath the covering of his bed; I will
not curse them!
Father!
The prisoner made no reply.
Father!
Jacopo!
In his turn the Bravo was speechless. He did
not venture, even, to steal a glance towards the
breathless and attentive Gelsomina, though his
bosom
heaved with longing to examine her guileless
features.
Dost thou hear me, son? continued the
prisoner
,
uncovering his head: dost thou really think
they will have the heart to chase the spider from
my cell?
They will leave thee this pleasure, father, for it
touches neither their power, nor their fame. So
long as the senate can keep its foot on the neck of
the people, and so long as it can keep the seemliness
of a good name, it will not envy thee this.
Blessed Maria, make me thankful!I had my
fears, child; for it is not pleasant to lose any friend
in a cell!
Jacopo then proceeded to soothe the mind of the
prisoner, and he gradually led his thoughts to other
subjects. He laid by the bed-side a few articles of
food, that he was allowed to bring with him, and
again holding out the hope of eventual liberation,
he proposed to take his leave.
I will try to believe thee, son, said the old
man, who had good reason to distrust assurances
so often made. I will do all I can to believe it.
Thou wilt tell thy mother, that I never cease to
think of her, and to pray for her; and thou wilt
bless thy sister, in the name of her poor imprisoned
parent.
The Bravo bowed in acquiescence, glad of any
means to escape speech. At a sign from the old
man he again bent his knee, and received the
parting
benediction. After busying himself in
arranging
the scanty furniture of the cell, and in trying to
open one or two small fissures, with a view to
admit
more light and air, he quitted the place.
Neither Gelsomina nor Jacopo spoke, as they
returned
by the intricate passages through which they
had ascended to the attic, until they were again on
the Bridge of Sighs. It was seldom that human
foot trod this gallery, and the former, with female
quickness, selected it as a place suited to their
further
conference.
Dost thou find him changed? she asked,
lingering
on the arch.
Much.
Thou speakest with a frightful meaning!
I have not taught my countenance to lie to thee,
Gelsomina.
But there is hope.Thou told'st him there was
hope, thyself.
Blessed Maria forgive the fraud! I could not
rob the little life he has, of its only comfort.
Carlo!Carlo!Why art thou so calm? I
have never heard thee speak so calmly of thy
father's wrongs and imprisonment.
It is because his liberation is near.
But this moment he was without hope, and thou
speakest, now, of liberation!
The liberation of death. Even the anger of the
senate will respect the grave.
Dost thou think his end near? I had not seen
this change.
Thou art kind, good Gelsomina, and true to thy
friends, and without suspicion of those crimes of
which thou art so innocent; but to one, who has
seen as much evil as I, a jealous thought comes at
every new event. The sufferings of my poor father
are near their end, for nature is worn out; but were
it not, I can foresee that means would be found to
bring them to a close.
Thou canst not suspect that any here would do
him harm!
I suspect none that belong to thee. Both thy
father and thyself, Gelsomina, are placed here by
the interposition of the saints, that the fiends should
not have too much power on earth.
I do not understand thee, Carlobut thou art
often so.Thy father used a word to-day that I
could wish he had not, in speaking to thee.
The eye of the Bravo threw a quick, uneasy,
suspicious
glance at his companion, and then averted
its look with haste.
He called thee, Jacopo! continued the girl.
Men often have glimpses of their fate, by the
kindness of their patrons.
Would'st thou say, Carlo, that thy father
suspects
the senate will employ the monster he named?
Why not?they have employed worse men. If
report says true, he is not unknown to them.
Can this be so!Thou art bitter against the
republic
,
because it has done injury to thy family; but
thou canst not believe it has ever dealt with the
hired stiletto.
I said no more than is whispered daily on the
canals.
I would thy father had not called thee by this
terrible name, Carlo!
Thou art too wise to be moved by a word,
Gelsomina
.
But what thinkest thou of my unhappy
father?
This visit has not been like the others thou hast
made him in my company. I know not the reason,
but to me thou hast ever seemed to feel the hope
with which thou hast cheered the prisoner; while
now, thou seemest to have even a frightful pleasure
in despair.
Thy fears deceive thee; returned the Bravo,
scarce speaking above his breath. Thy fears
deceive
thee, and we will say no more. The senate
mean to do us justice, at last. They are honorable
Signori, of illustrious birth, and renowned names!
'Twould be madness to distrust the patricians! Dost
thou not know, girl, that he who is born of gentle
blood is above the weaknesses and temptations that
beset us of base origin? They are men placed by
birth above the weaknesses of mortals, and owing
their account to none, they will be sure to do justice.
This is reasonable, and who can doubt it!
As he ended, the Bravo laughed bitterly.
Nay, now thou triflest with me, Carlo; none
are above the danger of doing wrong, but those
whom the saints and kind Maria favor.
This comes of living in a prison, and of saying
thy prayers night and morning! Nonosilly girl,
there are men in the world born wise, from
generation
to generation; born honest, virtuous, brave,
incorruptible
,
and fit in all things to shut up and
imprison
those who are born base and ignoble. Where
hast thou passed thy days, foolish Gelsomina, not to
have felt this truth, in the very air thou breathest?
'Tis clear as the sun's light, and palpableay
palpable
as these prison walls!
The timid girl recoiled from his side, and there
was a moment when she meditated flight; for never
before, during their numberless and confidential
interviews
,
had she ever heard so bitter a laugh, or
seen so wild a gleam in the eye of her companion.
I could almost fancy, Carlo, that thy father was
right in using the name he did; she said, as
recovering
herself, she turned a reproachful look on his
still excited features.
It is the business of parents to name their
children
;but,
enough. I must leave thee, good
Gelsomina
,
and I leave thee with a heavy heart.
The unsuspecting Gelsomina forgot her alarm.
She knew not why, but, though the imaginary Carlo
seldom quitted her that she was not sad, she felt a
weight heavier than common on her spirits at this
declaration.
Thou hast thy affairs, and they must not be
forgotten
.
Art fortunate with the gondola, of late,
Carlo?
Gold and I are nearly strangers. The republic
throws the whole charge of the venerable prisoner
on my toil.
I have little, as thou knowest, Carlo, said
Gelsomina
,
in a half-audible voice; but it is thine.
My father is not rich, as thou canst feel, or he would
not live on the sufferings of others, by holding the
keys of the prison.
He is better employed than those who set the
duty. Were the choice given me, girl, to wear the
horned bonnet, to feast in their halls, to rest in their
palaces, to be the gayest bauble in such a pageant
as that of yesterday, to plot in their secret councils,
and to be the heartless judge to condemn my fellows
to this miseryor to be merely the keeper of the
keys and turner of the boltsI should seize on the
latter office, as not only the most innocent, but by
far the most honorable!
Thou dost not judge as the world judges, Carlo.
I had feared thou might'st feel shame at being the
husband of a jailer's daughter; nay, I will not hide
the secret longer, since thou speakest so calmly, I
have wept that it should be so.
Then thou hast neither understood the world
nor me. Were thy father of the senate, or of the
Council of Three, could the grievous fact be known,
thou would'st have cause to sorrow. But
Gelsomina
,
the canals are getting dusky, and I must
leave thee.
The reluctant girl saw the truth of what he said,
and applying a key, she opened the door of the
covered
bridge. A few turnings and a short descent
brought the Bravo and his companion to the level
of the quays. Here the former took a hurried leave
and quitted the prison.
CHAPTER IV.
But they who blunder thus are raw beginners.
Don Juan
.
The
hour had come for the revels of the Piazza,
and for the movement of the gondolas. Maskers
glided along the porticoes as usual; the song and cry
were heard anew, and Venice was again absorbed
in delusive gaiety.
When Jacopo issued from the prison on the quay,
he mingled with the stream of human beings that
was setting towards the squares, protected from
observation
by the privileged mask. While crossing
the lower bridge of the canal of St. Mark, he
lingered
an instant, to throw a look at the glazed gallery
he had just quitted, and then moved forward with
the crowdthe image of the artless and confiding
Gelsomina uppermost in his thoughts. As he passed
slowly along the gloomy arches of the Broglio, his
eye sought the person of Don Camillo Monforte.
They met at the angle of the little square, and
exchanging
secret signs, the Bravo moved on
unnoticed
.
Hundreds of boats lay at the foot of the Piazzetta.
Among these Jacopo sought his own gondola, which
he extricated from the floating mass, and urged into
the stream. A few sweeps of the oar, and he lay
at the side of La Bella Sorrentina. The padrone
paced the deck, enjoying the cool of the evening,
with Italian indolence, while his people sang, or
rather chanted, a song of those seas, grouped on
the forecastle. The greetings were blunt and brief,
as is usual among men of that class. But the
padrone
appeared to expect the visit, for he led his
guest far from the ears of his crew, to the other
extremity
of the felucca.
Vol. II. G
Hast thou aught in particular, good Roderigo?
demanded the mariner, who knew the Bravo by a
sign, and yet who only knew him by that fictitious
name. Thou seest we have not passed the time
idly, though yesterday was a festa.
Art thou ready for the gulf?
For the Levant, or the pillars of Hercules, as
shall please the senate. We have got our yard aloft
since the sun went behind the mountains, and though
we may seem careless of delay, an hour's notice will
fit us for the outside of the Lido.
Then take the notice.
Master Roderigo, you bring your news to an
overstocked market. I have already been informed
that we shall be wanted to-night.
The quick movement of suspicion made by the
Bravo escaped the observation of the padrone, whose
eye was running over the felucca's gear, with a
sailor's
habitual attention to that part of his vessel, when
there was question of its service.
Thou art right, Stefano. But there is little harm
in repeated caution. Preparation is the first duty in
a delicate commission.
Will you look for yourself, Signor Roderigo?
said the mariner, in a lower tone. La Bella
Sorrentina
is not the Bucentaur, nor a galley of the
Grand Master of Malta; but, for her size, better
rooms are not to be had in the palace of the doge.
When they told me there was a lady in the freight,
the honor of Calabria was stirred in her behalf.
'Tis well. If they have named to thee all the
particulars, thou wilt not fail to do thyself credit.
I do not say that they have shown me half of
them, good Signore; interrupted Stefano. The
secrecy of your Venetian shipments is my greatest
objection to the trade. It has more than once
happened
to me, that I have lain weeks in the canals,
with my hold as clean as a friar's conscience, when
orders have come to weigh, with some such cargo
as a messenger, who has got into his berth as we
cleared the port, to get out of it on the coast of
Dalmatia
,
or among the Greek islands.
In such cases thou hast earned thy money
easily
.
Diamine! Master Roderigo, if I had a friend
in Venice to give timely advice, the felucca might
be ballasted with articles that would bring a profit,
on the other shore. Of what concern is it to the
senate, when I do my duty to the nobles faithfully,
that I do my duty at the same time to the good
woman
and her little brown children, left at home, in
Calabria?
There is much reason in what thou sayest,
Stefano
;
but thou knowest the republic is a hard
master
.
An affair of this nature must be touched with
a gentle hand.
None know it better than I, for when they sent
the trader with all his movables out of the city, I
was obliged to throw certain casks into the sea, to
make room for his worthless stuffs. The senate
owes me just compensation for that loss, worthy
Signor
Roderigo!
Which thou would'st be glad to repair, to-night?
Santissima Maria! You may be the doge
himself
,
Signore, for any thing I know of your
countenance
;
but I could swear at the altar you ought
to be of the senate for your sagacity!If this lady
will not be burthened with many effects, and there
is yet time, I might humor the tastes of the
Dalmatians
with certain of the articles that come from the
countries beyond the pillars of Hercules!
Thou art the judge of the probability thyself,
since they told thee of the nature of thy errand.
San Gennaro of Napoli, open my eyes!They
said not a word beyond this little fact, that a
youthful
lady, in whom the senate had great interest, would
quit the city this night for the eastern coast. If it
is at all agreeable to your conscience, Master
Roderigo
,
I should be happy to hear who are to be her
companions?
Of that thou shalt hear more in proper season.
In the meantime, I would recommend to thee a
cautious
tongue, for St. Mark makes no idle jokes with
those who offend him. I am glad to see thee in this
state of preparation, worthy padrone, and wishing
thee a happy night, and a prosperous voyage, I
commit thee to thy patron. But holdere I quit
thee, I would know the hour that the land-breeze
will serve?
You are exact as a compass in your own
matters
,
Signore, but of little charity to thy friends!
With the burning sun of to-day we should have the
air of the Alps, about the turn of the night.
'Tis well.My eye shall be on thee. Once more,
addio.
Cospetto! and thou hast said nothing of the
cargo?
'Twill not be so weighty in bulk as in value,
carelessly answered Jacopo, shoving his gondola
from the side of the felucca. The fall of his oar into
the water succeeded, and as Stefano stood,
meditating
the chances of his speculation on his deck, the
boat glided away towards the quay, with a swift but
easy movement.
Deceit, like the windings of that subtle animal the
fox, often crosses its own path. It consequently
throws out those by whom it is practised, as well
as those who are meant to be its victims. When
Jacopo parted from Don Camillo, it was with an
understanding
that he should adopt all the means that
his native sagacity, or his experience might suggest,
to ascertain in what manner the council intended to
dispose of the person of Donna Violetta. They had
separated on the Lido, and as none knew of their
interview but him, and none would probably suspect
their recent alliance, the Bravo entered on his new
duty with some chances of success, that might
otherwise
have been lost. A change of its agents, in
affairs
of peculiar delicacy, was one of the ordinary
means taken by the republic to avoid investigation.
Jacopo had often been its instrument in negotiating
with the mariner, who, as has been so plainly
intimated
,
had frequently been engaged in carrying into
effect its secret, and perhaps justifiable measures of
police; but in no instance had it ever been found
necessary to interpose a second agent between the
commencement and the consummation of its
bargains
,
except in this. He had been ordered to see
the padrone, and to keep him in preparation for
immediate
service; but since the examination of
Antonio
before the council, his employers had neglected
to give him any farther instructions. The danger
of leaving the bride within reach of the agents of
Don Camillo was so obvious, that this unusual
caution
had been considered necessary. It was under
this disadvantage, therefore, that Jacopo entered on
the discharge of his new and important duties.
That cunning, as has just been observed, is apt to
overreach itself, has passed into a proverb; and the
case of Jacopo and his employers was one in point
to prove its truth. The unusual silence of those who
ordinarily sought him on similar occasions, had not
been lost on the agent; and the sight of the felucca,
as he strayed along the quays, gave an accidental
direction to his inquiries. The manner in which
they were aided, by the cupidity of the Calabrian,
has just been related.
Jacopo had no sooner touched the quay and
secured
his boat, than he hastened again to the
Broglio
.
It was now filled by maskers and the idlers
of the Piazzetta. The patricians had withdrawn to
the scenes of their own pleasures, or, in furtherance
G 2
of that system of mysterious sway which it was
their policy to maintain, they did not choose to
remain
exposed to the common eye, during the hours
of license which were about to follow.
It would seem that Jacopo had his instructions,
for no sooner did he make sure that Don Camillo
had retired, than he threaded the throng with the
air of a man whose course was decided. By this
time, both the squares were full, and at least half of
those who spent the night in those places of
amusement
,
were masked. The step of the Bravo, though
so unhesitating, was leisurely, and he found time, in
passing up the Piazzetta, to examine the forms, and,
when circumstances permitted, the features of all
he met. He proceeded, in this manner, to the point
of junction between the two squares, when his elbow
was touched by a light hand.
Jacopo was not accustomed, unnecessarily, to
trust his voice in the square of St. Mark, and at that
hour. But his look of inquiry was returned by a sign
to follow. He had been stopped by one, whose
figure was so completely concealed by a domino,
as to baffle all conjecture concerning his true
character
.
Perceiving, however, that the other wished
to lead him to a part of the square that was vacant,
and which was directly on the course he was about
to pursue, the Bravo made a gesture of compliance
and followed. No sooner were the two apart from
the pressure of the crowd, and in a place where no
eaves-dropper could overhear their discourse
without
detection, than the stranger stopped. He
appeared
to examine the person, stature, and dress of
Jacopo, from beneath his mask, with singular
caution
,
closing the whole with a sign that meant
recognition
.
Jacopo returned his dumb show, but
maintained a rigid silence.
Just Daniel! muttered the stranger, when he
found that his companion was not disposed to speak;
one would think, illustrious Signore, that your
confessor had imposed a penance of silence, by the
manner in which you refuse to speak to your
servant
.
What would'st thou?
Here am I, sent into the piazza, among knights
of industry, valets, gondoliers, and all other manner
of revellers that adorn this Christian land, in search
of the heir of one of the most ancient and honorable
houses of Venice.
How knowest thou I am he thou seekest?
Signore, there are many signs seen by a wise
man, that escape the unobservant. When young
cavaliers have a taste for mingling with the people
in honorable disguise, as in the case of a certain
patrician of this republic, they are to be known by
their air, if not by their voices.
Thou art a cunning agent, Hosea; but the
shrewdness of thy race is its livelihood!
It is its sole defence against the wrongs of the
oppressor, young noble. We are hunted like wolves.
and it is not surprising that we sometimes show the
ferocity of the beasts you take us for. But why
should I tell the wrongs of my people to one who
believes life is a masquerade!
And who would not be sorry, ingenious Hosea,
were it composed only of Hebrews! But, thy
errand
;
I have no gage unredeemed, nor do I know
that I owe thee gold.
Righteous Samuel! you cavaliers of the senate
are not always mindful of the past, Signore, or
these are words that might have been spared. If
your excellency is inclined to forget pledges, the
fault is not of my seeking; but as for the account
that has been so long growing between us, there is
not a dealer on the Rialto that will dispute the
proofs.
Well, be it sowould'st thou dun my father's
son in the face of the revellers in St. Mark?
I would do no discredit to any come of that
illustrious race, Signore, and therefore we will say
no more of the matter; always relying that, at the
proper moment, you will not question your own
hand and seal.
I like thy prudence, Hebrew. It is a pledge
thou comest on some errand less ungracious than
common. As I am pressed for time, 'twill be a favor
wert thou to name it.
Hosea examined, in a convert but very thorough
manner, the vacant spot around them, and drawing
nearer to the supposed noble, he continued.
Signore, your family is in danger of meeting
with a great loss! It is known to you that the senate
has altogether and suddenly removed Donna
Violetta
,
from the keeping of the faithful and illustrious
senator your father.
Though Jacopo started slightly, the movement
was so natural for a disappointed lover, that it rather
aided than endangered his disguise.
Compose yourself, young Signore, continued
Hosea; these disappointments attend us all in
youth, as I know by severe trials. Leah was not
gained without trouble, and next to success in
barter
,
success in love is perhaps the most uncertain.
Gold is a great make-weight in both, and it
commonly
prevails. But, you are nearer to losing the
lady of your love and her possessions, than you may
imagine, for I am sent expressly to say, that she is
about to be removed from the city.
Whither? demanded Jacopo, so quickly as to
do credit to his assumed character.
That is the point to learn, Signore. Thy father
is a sagacious senator, and is deep, at times, in the
secrets of the state. But, judging from his
uncertainty
on this occasion, I take it he is guided more
by his calculations, than by any assurance of his
own knowledge. Just Daniel! I have seen the
moments
when I have suspected that the venerable
patrician himself was a member of the Council of
Three!
His house is ancient and his privileges well
established
why
should he not?
I say naught against it, Signore. It is a wise
body, that doeth much good, and preventeth much
harm. None speak evil of the secret councils on
the Rialto, where men are more given to gainful
industry
than to wild discussions of their rulers' acts.
But, Signore, be he of this or that council, or
merely
of the senate, a heedful hint has fallen from his
lips, of the danger we are in of losing
We!Hast thou thoughts of Donna Violetta,
Hosea?
Leah, and the law forbid!If the comely queen
of Sheba, herself, were to tempt me, and a frail
nature
showed signs of weakness, I doubt that our
rabbis would find reasons for teaching self-denial!
Besides, the daughter of Levi is no favorer of
polygamy
,
nor any other of our sex's privileges. I
spoke in pluralities, Signore, because the Rialto has
some stake in this marriage, as well as the house of
Gradenigo.
I understand thee. Thou hast fears for thy
gold?
Had I been easily alarmed, Signor Giacomo, in
that particular, I might not have parted with it so
readily. But, though the succession of thy
illustrious
father will be ample to meet any loan within
my humble means, that of the late Signor Tieopolo
will not weaken the security.
I admit thy sagacity, and feel the importance
of thy warning. But it seems to have no other
object, or warranty, than thy own fears.
With certain obscure hints from your honored
father, Signore.
Did he say more to the point?
He spoke in parables, young noble, but having
an oriental ear, his words were not uttered to the
wind. That the rich damsel is about to be
conveyed
from Venice am I certain, and for the benefit of
the little stake I have myself in her movements, I
would give the best turquoise in my shop to know
whither.
Canst thou say with certainty, 'twill be this
night.
Giving no pledge for redemption in the event
of mistake, I am so sure, young cavalier, as to
have many unquiet thoughts.
EnoughI will look to my own interests, and
to thine.
Jacopo waved his hand in adieu, and pursued his
walk up the piazza.
Had I looked more sharply to the latter, as
became
one accustomed to deal with the accursed
race, muttered the Hebrew, it would be a matter
of no concern to me if the girl married a Turk!
Hosea, said a mask at his ear; a word with
thee, in secret.
The jeweller started, and found that, in his zeal,
he had suffered one to approach within sound of his
voice unseen. The other was in a domino also, and
so well enveloped as to be effectually concealed.
What would'st thou, Signor Mask? demanded
the wary Jew.
A word in friendship and in confidence.Thou
hast moneys to lend at usury?
The question had better be put to the republic's
treasury! I have many stones, valued much below
their weight, and would be glad to put them, with
some one more lucky than myself, who will be able
to keep them.
Nay, this will not sufficethou art known to be
abounding in sequins; one of thy race and riches
will never refuse a sure loan, with securities as
certain as the laws of Venice. A thousand ducats
in thy willing hand is no novelty.
They who call me rich, Signor Mask, are
pleased
to joke with the unhappy child of a luckless
race. That I might have been above wantnay,
that I am not downright needy, may be true; but
when they speak of a thousand ducats, they speak
of affairs too weighty for my burthened shoulders.
Were it your pleasure to purchase an amethyst, or
a ruby, gallant Signore, there might possibly be
dealings between us?
I have need of gold, old man, and can spare
thee jewels myself, at need. My wants are urgent,
at this moment, and I have little time to lose in
wordsname thy conditions.
One should have good securities, Signore, to be
so peremptory in a matter of money.
Thou hast heard that the laws of Venice are
not more certain. A thousand sequins, and that
quickly. Thou shalt settle the usury with thine own
conscience.
Hosea thought that this was giving ample room
to the treaty, and he began to listen more seriously.
Signore, he said, a thousand ducats are not
picked up at pleasure, from the pavement of the
great square. He who would lend them, must first
earn them with long and patient toil; and he who
would borrow
Waits at thy elbow.
Should have a name and countenance well
known on the Rialto.
Thou lendest on sufficient pledges to masks,
careful Hosea, or fame belies thy generosity.
A sufficient pledge gives me power to see the
way clearly, though the borrower should be as
much hidden as those up above. But here is none
forthcoming. Come to me to-morrow, masked or
not, as may suit your own pleasure, for I have no
impertinent desire to pry into any man's secrets,
beyond what a regard to my own interests requires,
and I will look into my coffers; though those of no
heir-apparent in Venice can be emptier.
My necessities are too urgent to brook delay.
Hast thou the gold, on condition of naming thine
own usury?
With sufficient pledges in stones of price, I
might rake together the sum, among our dispersed
people, Signore. But he who goes on the island to
borrow, as I shall be obliged to do, should be able
to satisfy all doubts concerning the payment.
The gold can then be hadon that point I may
be easy?
Hosea hesitated, for he had in vain endeavored
to penetrate the other's disguise, and while he
thought his assurance a favorable omen, with a
lender's instinct he disliked his impatience.
I have said, by the friendly aid of our people;
he answered, with caution.
This uncertainty will not answer my need.
Addio
,
Hosea,I must seek elsewhere.
Signore, you could not be more hurried were
the money to pay the cost of your nuptials. Could
I find Isaac and Aaron within, at this late hour, I
think I might be safe in saying, that part of the
money might be had.
I cannot trust to this chance.
Nay, Signore, the chance is but small, since
Aaron is bed-ridden, and Isaac never fails to look
into his affairs, after the toil of the day is ended.
The honest Hebrew finds sufficient recreation in the
employment, though I marvel at his satisfaction,
since nothing but losses have come over our people
the year past!
I tell thee, Jew, no doubt must hang over the
negotiation. The money, with pledges, and thine
own conscience for arbiter between us; but no
equivocal
dealings, to be followed by a disappointment,
under the pretence that second parties are not
satisfied.
Just Daniel! to oblige you, Signore, I think I
may venture!The well-known Hebrew, Levi of
Livorno, has left with me a sack, containing the very
sum of which there is question, and, under the
conditions
named, I will convert it to my uses, and
repay
the good jeweller his gold, with moneys of my
own, at a later day.
I thank thee for the fact, Hosea; said the other,
partially removing his mask, but as instantly
replacing
it. It will greatly shorten our negotiations.
Thou hast not that sack of the Jew of Livorno
beneath
thy domino?
Hosea was speechless. The removal of the mask
had taught him two material facts. He had been
communicating his distrust of the Senate's
intentions
,
concerning Donna Violetta, to an unknown
person, and, possibly, to an agent of the police; and
he had just deprived himself of the only argument
he had ever found available, in refusing the attempts
of Giacomo Gradenigo to borrow, by admitting to
that very individual, that he had in his power the
precise sum required.
I trust the face of an old customer is not likely
to defeat our bargain, Hosea? demanded the
profligate
heir of the senator, scarce concealing the irony
in which the question was put.
Father Abraham! Had I known it had been
you, Signor Giacomo, we might have greatly
shortened
the treaty.
By denying that thou hadst the money, as thou
hast so often done of late!
Vol. II. H
Nay, nay, I am not a swallower of my own
words, young Signore; but my duty to Levi must
not be forgotten. The careful Hebrew made me
take a vow, by the name of our tribe, that I would
not part with his gold, to any that had not the means
of placing its return beyond all chances.
This assurance is not wanting, since thou art the
borrower, thyself, to lend to me.
Signore, you place my conscience in an
awkward
position. Your are now my debtor some
six-thousand
sequins, and were I to make this loan of
money in trust, and were you to return ittwo
propositions
I make on suppositiona natural love for
my own might cause me to pass the payment to
account, whereby I should put the assets of Levi in
jeopardy.
Settle that as thou wilt with thy conscience,
Hosea
thou
hast confessed to the money, and here are
jewels for the pledgeI ask only the sequins.
It is probable that the appeal of Giacomo
Gradenigo
would not have produced much effect on the
flinty nature of the Hebrew, who had all the failings
of a man proscribed by opinion; but having
recovered
from his surprise, he began to explain to his
companion his apprehensions on account of Donna
Violetta, whose marriage, it will be remembered,
was a secret to all but the witnesses and the Council
of Three, when to his great joy he found that the
gold was wanting to advance his own design of
removing
her to some secret place. This immediately
changed the whole face of the bargain. As the
pledges offered were really worth the sum to be
received
,
Hosea thought, taking the chances of
recovering
back his ancient loans, from the foreign
estates
of the heiress, into the account, the loan would
be no bad investment of the pretended sequins of his
friend Levi.
As soon as the parties had come to a clear
understanding
,
they left the square together, to
consummate
their bargain.
CHAPTER V.
We'll follow Cade, we'll follow Cade.
Henry VI
.
The
night wore on. The strains of music again
began to break through the ordinary stillness of the
town, and the boats of the great were once more
in motion on every canal. Hands waved timidly
in recognition, from the windows of the little dark
canopies, as the gondolas glided by, but few paused
to greet each other in that city of mystery and
suspicion
.
Even the refreshing air of the evening was
inhaled under an appearance of restraint, which,
though it might not be at the moment felt, was too
much interwoven with the habits of the people, ever
to be entirely thrown aside.
Among the lighter and gayer barges of the
patricians
,
a gondola of more than usual size, but of
an exterior so plain as to denote vulgar uses, came
sweeping down the great canal. Its movement was
leisurely, and the action of the gondoliers that of
men either fatigued or little pressed for time. He
who steered, guided the boat with consummate skill,
but with a single hand, while his three fellows, from
time to time, suffered their oars to trail on the
water
in very idleness. In short, it had the ordinary
listless appearance of a boat returning to the city,
from an excursion on the Brenta, or to some of the
more distant isles.
Suddenly, the gondola diverged from the centre
of the passage, down which it rather floated than
pulled, and shot into one of the least frequented
canals
of the city. From this moment its movement
became more rapid and regular, until it reached a
quarter of the town inhabited by the lowest order
of the Venetians. Here it stopped by the side of a
warehouse, and one of its crew ascended to a bridge.
The others threw themselves on the thwarts and
seemed to repose.
He who quitted the boat threaded a few narrow
but public allies, such as are to be found in every
part of that confined town, and knocked lightly
at a window. It was not long before the casement
opened, and a female voice demanded the name of
him without.
It is I, Annina; returned Gino, who was not an
unfrequent applicant for admission, at that private
portal. Open the door, girl, for I have come on a
matter of pressing haste.
Annina complied, though not without making sure
that her suitor was alone.
Thou art come unseasonably, Gino, said the
wine-seller's daughter; I was about to go to St.
Mark's to breathe the evening air. My father and
brothers are already departed, and I only stay to
make sure of the bolts.
Their gondola will hold a fourth?
They have gone by the footways.
And thou walkest the streets alone at this hour,
Annina?
I know not thy right to question it, if I do,
returned the girl, with spirit. San Teodoro be
praised, I am not yet the slave of a Neapolitan's
servitor!
The Neapolitan is a powerful noble, Annina, able
and willing to keep his servitors in respect.
He will have need of all his interestbut why
hast thou come at this unseasonable hour? Thy
visits are never too welcome, Gino, and when I have
other affairs, they are disagreeable.
Had the passion of the gondolier been very deep
or very sensitive, this plain dealing might have given
him a shock; but Gino appeared to take the repulse
as coolly as it was given.
I am used to thy caprices, Annina, he said,
throwing himself upon a bench, like one determined
to remain where he was. Some young patrician
has kissed his hand to thee as thou hast crossed San
Marco, or thy father has made a better day of it
than common on the Lidothy pride always mounts
with thy father's purse.
Diamine! to hear the fellow, one would think
he had my troth, and that he only waited in the
sacristy
for the candles to be lighted, to receive my
vows! What art thou to me, Gino Tullini, that thou
takest on thee these sudden airs?
And what art thou to me, Annina, that thou
playest off these worn-out caprices on Don Camillo's
confidant?
Out upon thee, insolent! I have no time to waste
in idleness.
Thou art in much haste to-night, Annina.
To be rid of thee. Now listen to what I say,
Gino, and let every word go to thy heart, for they
are the last thou wilt ever hear from me. Thou
servest a decayed noble, one who will shortly be
chased in disgrace from the city, and with him will
go all his idle servitors. I choose to remain in the
city of my birth.
The gondolier laughed in real indifference at her
affected scorn. But remembering his errand, he
quickly assumed a graver air, and endeavored to
still the resentment of his fickle mistress, by a more
respectful manner.
St. Mark protect me, Annina! he said. If we
are not to kneel before the good priore together, it
H2
is no reason we should not bargain in wines. Here
have I come into the dark canals, within
stone's-throw
of thy very door, with a gondola of mellow
Lachryma Christi, such as honest 'Maso, thy father,
has rarely dealt in, and thou treatest me as a dog,
that is chased from a church!
I have little time for thee, or thy wines, to-night,
Gino. Hadst thou not stayed me, I should already
have been abroad and happy.
Close thy door, girl, and make little ceremony
with an old friend, said the gondolier, officiously
offering to aid her in securing the dwelling. Annina
took him at his word, and as both appeared to work
with good will, the house was locked, and the wilful
girl and her suitor were soon in the street. Their
route lay across the bridge already named. Gino
pointed to the gondola, as he said, Thou art not to
be tempted, Annina?
Thy rashness in leading the smugglers to my
father's door will bring us to harm some day, silly
fellow!
The boldness of the act will prevent suspicion.
Of what vineyard is the liquor?
It came from the foot of Vesuvius, and is
ripened
by the heat of the volcano. Should my friends
part with it to thy enemy, old Beppo, thy father will
rue the hour!
Annina, who was much addicted to consulting her
interests on all occasions, cast a longing glance at
the boat. The canopy was closed, but it was large,
and her willing imagination readily induced her to
fancy it well filled with skins from Naples.
This will be the last of thy visits to our door,
Gino?
As thou shalt please.But go down and taste
Annina hesitated, and, as a woman is said always
to do when she hesitates, she complied. They
reached
the boat, with quick steps, and without regarding
the men who were still lounging on the thwarts,
Annina
glided immediately beneath the canopy. A fifth
gondolier was lying at length on the cushions, for,
unlike a boat devoted to the contraband, the canopy
had the usual arrangement of a bark of the canals.
I see nothing to turn me aside! exclaimed the
disappointed girl. Wilt thou aught with me,
Signore?
Thou art welcome. We shall not part so readily
as before.
The stranger had arisen while speaking, and as
he ended, he laid a hand on the shoulder of his
visitor
,
who found herself confronted with Don Camillo
Monforte.
Annina was too much practised in deception to
indulge in any of the ordinary female symptoms,
either of real or of affected alarm. Commanding
her features, though in truth her limbs shook, she
said, with assumed pleasantry
The secret trade is honored in the services of
the noble Duke of St. Agata!
I am not here to trifle, girl, as thou wilt see in
the end. Thou hast thy choice before thee, frank
confession, or my just anger.
Don Camillo spoke calmly, but in a manner that
plainly showed Annina she had to deal with a
resolute
man.
What confession would your eccellenza have
from the daughter of a poor wine-seller? she asked,
her voice trembling in spite of herself.
The truthand remember, that this time we do
not part until I am satisfied. The Venetian police
and I are now fairly at issue, and thou art the first
fruits of my plan.
Signor Duca, this is a bold step to take in the
heart of the canals!
The consequences be mine. Thy interest will
teach thee to confess.
I shall make no great merit, Signore, of doing
that which is forced upon me. As it is your
pleasure
to know the little I can tell you, I am happy to
be permitted to relate it.
Speak, then; for time presses.
Signore, I shall not pretend to deny you have
been ill-treated. Capperi! how ill has the council
treated you! A noble cavalier, of a strange country,
who, the meanest gossip in Venice knows, has a just
right to the honors of the senate, to be so treated is
a disgrace to the republic! I do not wonder that
your eccellenza is out of humor with them. Blessed
St. Mark himself would lose his patience to be thus
treated!
A truce with this, girl, and to your facts.
My facts, Signor Duca, are a thousand times
clearer than the sun, and they are all at your
eccellenza's
service. I am sure I wish I had more of
them, since they give you pleasure.
Enough of this profession.Speak to the facts
themselves.
Annina, who, in the manner of most of her class
in Italy, that had been exposed to the intrigues of
the towns, had been lavish of her words, now found
means to cast a glance at the water, when she saw
that the boat had already quitted the canals, and
was rowing easily out upon the Lagunes.
Perceiving
how completely she was in the power of Don
Camillo, she began to feel the necessity of being
more explicit.
Your eccellenza has probably suspected that the
council found means to be acquainted with your
intention
to fly from the city with Donna Violetta?
All that is known to me.
Why they chose me to be the servitor of the
noble lady is beyond my powers to discover. Our
Lady of Loretto! I am not the person to be sent for,
when the state wishes to part two lovers!
I have borne with thee, Annina, because I would
let the gondola get beyond the limits of the city; but
now thou must throw aside thy subterfuge, and speak
plainly. Where didst thou leave my wife?
Does your eccellenza then think the state will
admit the marriage to be legal?
Girl, answer, or I will find means to make thee.
Where didst thou leave my wife?
Blessed St. Theodore! Signore, the agents of the
republic had little need of me, and I was put on the
first bridge that the gondola passed.
Thou strivest to deceive me in vain. Thou wast
on the Lagunes till a late hour in the day, and I have
notice of thy having visited the prison of St. Mark
as the sun was setting; and this on thy return from
the boat of Donna Violetta.
There was no acting in the wonder of Annina.
Santissima Maria! You are better served,
Signore
,
than the council thinks!
As thou wilt find to thy cost, unless the truth be
spoken. From what convent didst thou come?
Signore, from none. If your eccellenza has
discovered
that the senate has shut up the Signora
Tiepolo, in the prison of St. Mark, for safe-keeping,
it is no fault of mine.
Thy artifice is useless, Annina; observed Don
Camillo, calmly. Thou wast in the prison, in quest
of forbidden articles that thou hadst long left with
thy cousin Gelsomina, the keeper's daughter, who
little suspected thy errand, and on whose innocence
and ignorance of the world thou hast long
successfully
practised. Donna Violetta is no vulgar
prisoner
,
to be immured in a jail.
Santissima Madre di Dio!
Amazement confined the answer of the girl to
this single, but strong, exclamation.
Thou seest the impossibility of deception. I am
acquainted with so much of thy movements as to
render it impossible that thou should'st lead me far
astray. Thou art not wont to visit thy cousin; but
as thou entered the canals this evening
A shout on the water caused Don Camillo to
pause. On looking out he saw a dense body of
boats, sweeping towards the town as if they were
all impelled by a single set of oars. A thousand
voices were speaking at once, and occasionally a
general and doleful cry proclaimed that the floating
multitude, which came on, was moved by a
common
feeling. The singularity of the spectacle, and
the fact that his own gondola lay directly in the
route of the fleet, which was composed of several
hundred boats, drove the examination of the girl,
momentarily, from the thoughts of the noble.
What have we here, Jacopo? he demanded, in
an under-tone, of the gondolier who steered his own
barge.
They are fishermen, Signore, and by the
manner
in which they come down towards the canals, I
doubt they are bent on some disturbance. There
has been discontent among them since the refusal of
the doge to liberate the boy of their companion from
the galleys.
Curiosity induced the people of Don Camillo to
linger a minute, and then they perceived the
necessity
of pulling out of the course of the floating mass,
which came on like a torrent, the men sweeping
their boats with that desperate stroke which is so
often seen among the Italian oarsmen. A menacing
hail, with a command to remain, admonished Don
Camillo of the necessity of downright flight, or of
obedience. He chose the latter, as the least likely
to interfere with his own plans.
Who art thou? demanded one, who had
assumed
the character of a leader. If men of the
Lagunes and Christians, join your friends, and away
with us to St. Mark, for justice!
What means this tumult? asked Don Camillo,
whose dress effectually concealed his rank, a
disguise
that he completed by adopting the Venetian
dialect. Why are you here in these numbers,
friends?
Behold!
Don Camillo turned, and he beheld the withered
features and glaring eyes of old Antonio, fixed in
death. The explanation was made by a hundred
voices, accompanied by oaths so bitter, and
denunciations
so deep, that had not Don Camillo been
prepared by the tale of Jacopo, he would have found
great difficulty in understanding what he heard.
In dragging the Lagunes for fish, the body of
Antonio had been found, and the result was, first a
consultation on the probable means of his death,
then a collection of the men of his calling, and
finally the scene described.
Giustizia! exclaimed fifty excited voices, as
the grim visage of the fisherman was held towards
the light of the moon; Giustizia in Palazzo e pane
in Piazza!
Ask it of the senate! returned Jacopo, not
attempting
to conceal the derision of his tones.
Thinkest thou our fellow has suffered for his
boldness yesterday?
Stranger things have happened in Venice!
They forbid us to cast our nets in the Canale
Orfano, lest the secrets of justice should be known,
and yet they have grown bold enough to drown
one of our own people in the midst of our gondolas!
Justice, justice! shouted numberless hoarse
throats.
Away to St. Mark's! Lay the body at the feet
of the dogeaway, brethrenAntonio's blood is on
their souls!
Bent on a wild and undigested scheme of
asserting
their wrongs, the fishermen again plied their
oars, and the whole fleet swept away, as if it were
composed of a single mass.
The meeting, though so short, was accompanied
by cries, menaces, and all those accustomed signs
of rage which mark a popular tumult among those
excitable people, and it had produced a sensible
effect on the nerves of Annina. Don Camillo
profited
by her evident terror to press his questions, for
the hour no longer admitted of trifling.
The result was, that while the agitated mob
swept into the mouth of the Great Canal, raising
hoarse shouts, the gondola of Don Camillo
Monforte
glided away across the wide and tranquil
surface
of the Lagunes.
CHAPTER VI.
A Clifford, a Clifford! we'll follow the king and Clifford.
Henry VI
.
The
tranquillity of the best ordered society may
be disturbed, at any time, by a sudden outbreaking
of the malcontents. Against such a disaster there
is no more guarding than against the commission
of more vulgar crimes; but when a government
trembles for its existence, before the turbulence of
popular commotion, it is reasonable to infer some
radical defect in its organization. Men will rally
around their institutions, as freely as they rally
around any other cherished interest, when they
merit their care, and there can be no surer sign of
their hollowness than when the rulers seriously
apprehend
the breath of the mob. No nation ever
exhibited more of this symptomatic terror, on all
occasions of internal disturbance, than the
pretending
republic of Venice. There was a never-ceasing
and a natural tendency to dissolution, in her factious
system, which was only resisted by the alertness of
her aristocracy, and the political buttresses which
their ingenuity had reared. Much was said of the
venerable character of her polity, and of its
consequent
security, but it is in vain that selfishness
contends
with truth. Of all the fallacies with which
man has attempted to gloss his expedients, there is
none more evidently false than that which infers the
duration of a social system, from the length of time
it has already lasted. It would be quite as
reasonable
to affirm that the man of seventy has the same
chances for life as the youth of fifteen, or that the
inevitable fate of all things of mortal origin was
not destruction. There is a period in human
existence
,
when the principle of vitality has to contend
with the feebleness of infancy, but this probationary
state passed, the child attains the age when it has
the most reasonable prospect of living. Thus the
social, like any other, machine, which has run just
long enough to prove its fitness, is at the precise
period when it is least likely to fail, and although he
that is young may not live to become old, it is
certain
that he who is old was once young. The
empire
of China was, in its time, as youthful as our
own republic, nor can we see any reason for
believing
that it is to outlast us, from the decrepitude
which is a natural companion of its years.
At the period of our tale, Venice boasted much
of her antiquity, and dreaded, in an equal degree,
her end. She was still strong in her combinations,
but they were combinations that had the vicious
error of being formed for the benefit of the
minority
,
and which, like the mimic fortresses and moats
of a scenic representation, needed only a strong
light to destroy the illusion. The alarm with
Vol. II. I
which the patricians heard the shouts of the
fishermen
,
as they swept by the different palaces, on
their way to the great square, can be readily
imagined
.
Some feared that the final consummation of
their artificial condition, which had so long been
anticipated by a secret political instinct, was at
length arrived, and began to bethink them of the
safest means of providing for their own security.
Some listened in admiration, for habit had so far
mastered dullness, as to have created a species of
identity between the state and far more durable
things, and they believed that St. Mark had gained
a victory, in that decline, which was never exactly
intelligible to their apathetic capacities. But a few,
and these were the spirits that accumulated all the
national good which was vulgarly and falsely
ascribed to the system itself, intuitively
comprehended
the danger, with a just appreciation of its
magnitude, as well as of the means to avoid it.
But the rioters were unequal to any estimate of
their own force, and had little aptitude in measuring
their accidental advantages. They acted merely
on impulse. The manner in which their aged
companion
had triumphed on the preceding day, his
cold repulse by the doge, and the scene of the Lido,
which in truth led to the death of Antonio, had
prepared
their minds for the tumult. When the body
was found, therefore, after the time necessary to
collect their forces on the Lagunes, they yielded to
passion, and moved away towards the palace of
St. Mark, as described, without any other definite
object than a simple indulgence of feeling.
On entering the canal, the narrowness of the
passage
compressed the boats into a mass so dense, as,
in a measure, to impede the use of oars, and the
progress of the crowd was necessarily slow. All
were anxious to get as near as possible to the body
of Antonio, and, like all mobs, they in some degree
frustrated their own objects, by ill-regulated zeal.
Once or twice the names of offensive senators were
shouted, as if the fishermen intended to visit the
crimes of the state on its agents; but these cries
passed away in the violent breath that was
expended
.
On reaching the bridge of the Rialto, more
than half of the multitude landed, and took the
shorter course of the streets to the point of
destination
,
while those in front got on the faster, for being
disembarrassed of the pressure in the rear. As
they drew nearer to the port, the boats began to
loosen, and to take something of the form of a
funeral procession.
It was during this moment of change that a
powerfully manned gondola swept, with strong
strokes, out of a lateral passage into the Great
Canal. Accident brought it directly in front of the
moving phalanx of boats, that was coming down
the same channel. Its crew seemed staggered by
the extraordinary appearance, which met their
view, and for an instant its course was undecided.
A gondola of the republic! shouted fifty
fishermen
.
A single voice addedCanale Orfano!
The bare suspicion of such an errand, as was
implied by the latter words, and at that moment,
was sufficient to excite the mob. They raised a
cry of denunciation, and some twenty boats made
a furious demonstration of pursuit. The menace,
however, was sufficient; for quicker far than the
movements of the pursuers, the gondoliers of the
republic dashed towards the shore, and leaping on
one of those passages of planks, which encircle so
many of the palaces of Venice, they disappeared
by an alley.
Encouraged by this success, the fishermen seized
the boat as a waif, and towed it into their own fleet,
filling the air with cries of triumph. Curiosity led
a few to enter the hearse-like canopy, whence they
immediately reissued, dragging forth a priest.
Who art thou? hoarsely demanded he, who
took upon himself the authority of a leader.
A Carmelite, and a servant of God!
Dost thou serve St. Mark? Hast thou been to
the Canale Orfano, to shrive a wretch?
I am here, in attendance on a young and noble
lady, who has need of my council and prayers. The
happy and the miserable, the free and the captive,
are equally my care!
Ha!Thou art not above thy office?Thou
wilt say the prayers for the dead, in behalf of a
poor man's soul?
My son, I know no difference, in this respect,
between the doge and the poorest fisherman. Still
I would not willingly desert the females.
The ladies shall receive no harm. Come into
my boat, for there is need of thy holy office.
Father Anselmothe reader will readily
anticipate
that it was heentered the canopy, said a
few words in explanation, to his trembling
companions
,
and complied. He was rowed to the
leading
gondola, and, by a sign, directed to the dead
body.
Thou see'st that corpse, father? continued his
conductor. It is the face of one who was an
upright
and pious Christian!
He was.
We all knew him as the oldest and the most
skilful
fisherman of the Lagunes, and one ever ready
to assist an unlucky companion.
I can believe thee!
Thou mayest, for the holy books are not more
true than my wordsyesterday he came down
this very canal, in triumph, for he bore away the
honors of the regatta from the stoutest oars in
Venice.
I have heard of his success.
They say that Jacopo, the Bravohe who once
held the best oar in the canalswas of the party!
Santa Madonna! such a man was too precious to
die!
It is the fate of allrich and poor, strong and
feeble, happy and miserable, must alike come to this
end.
Not to this end, reverend Carmelite, for
Antonio
having given offence to the republic, in the
matter
of a grandson that is pressed for the galleys, has
been sent to purgatory without a Christian hope for
his soul.
There is an eye that watcheth on the meanest of
us, son; we will believe he was not forgotten.
Cospetto!They say that those the senate look
black upon, get but little aid from the church! Wilt
thou pray for him, Carmelite, and make good thy
words?
I will, said Father Anselmo, firmly. Make
room, son, that no decency of my duty be
overlooked
.
The swarthy, expressive, faces of the fishermen
gleamed with satisfaction, for in the midst of the
rude turmoil, they all retained a deep and rooted
respect for the offices of the church in which they
had been educated. Silence was quickly obtained,
and the boats moved on with greater order than
before.
The spectacle was now strikingIn front rowed
the gondola which contained the remains of the
dead. The widening of the canal, as it approached
the port, permitted the rays of the moon to fall upon
the rigid features of old Antonio, which were set in
such a look, as might be supposed to characterize
the dying thoughts of a man so suddenly and so
fearfully destroyed. The Carmelite, bare-headed,
with clasped hands, and a devout heart, bowed his
I2
head at the feet of the body, with his white robes
flowing in the light of the moon. A single gondolier
guided the boat, and no other noise was audible but
the plash of the water, as the oars slowly fell and
rose together. This silent procession lasted a few
minutes, and then the tremulous voice of the monk
was heard chanting the prayers for the dead. The
practised fishermen, for few in that disciplined
church, and that obedient age, were ignorant of
those solemn rites, took up the responses, in a
manner
that must be familiar to every ear that has ever
listened to the sounds of Italy, the gentle washing of
the element, on which they glided, forming a soft
accompaniment. Casement after casement opened
while they passed, and a thousand curious and
anxious
faces crowded the balconies, as the funeral
cortege
swept slowly on.
The gondola of the republic was towed in the
centre of the moving mass, by fifty lighter boats, for
the fishermen still clung to their prize. In this
manner
the solemn procession entered the port, and
touched the quay at the foot of the Piazzetta. While
numberless eager hands were aiding in bringing the
body of Antonio to land, there arose a shout from
the centre of the ducal palace, which proclaimed the
presence already of the other part of their body in
its court.
The squares of St. Mark now presented a novel
picture. The quaint and oriental church, the rows
of massive and rich architecture, the giddy pile of
the Campanile, the columns of granite, the masts of
triumph, and all those peculiar and remarkable
fixtures
,
which had witnessed so many scenes of
violence
,
of rejoicing, of mourning, and of gaiety, were
there, like land-marks of the earth, defying time;
beautiful and venerable in despite of all those
varying
exhibitions of human passions, that were daily
acted around them.
But the song, the laugh, and the jest, had ceased.
The lights of the coffee-houses had disappeared, the
revellers had fled to their homes, fearful of being
confounded with those who braved the anger of the
senate, while the grotesque, the ballad-singers, and
the buffoon, had abandoned their assumed gaiety for
an appearance more in unison with the true feelings
of their hearts.
Giustizia! cried a thousand deep voices, as
the body of Antonio was borne into the court
Illustrious Doge! Giustizia in palazzo, e pane in
piazza! Give us justice! We are beggars for
justice!
The gloomy but vast court was paved with the
swarthy faces and glittering eyes of the fishermen.
The corpse was laid at the foot of the Giant's Stairs,
while the trembling halberdier at the head of the
flight, scarce commanded himself sufficiently to
maintain that air of firmness, which was exacted
by discipline and professional pride. But there was
no other show of military force, for the politic
power
,
which ruled in Venice, knew too well its
momentary
impotency to irritate when it could not quell.
The mob beneath was composed of nameless rioters,
whose punishment could carry no other consequences
than the suppression of immediate danger, and for
that, those who ruled were not prepared.
The Council of Three had been apprized of the
arrival of the excited fishermen. When the mob
entered the court, it was consulting in secret
conclave
,
on the probabilities of the tumult having a
graver and more determined object, than was
apparent
in the visible symptoms. The routine of
office had not yet dispossessed the men already
presented
to the reader, of their dangerous and
despotic
power.
Are the Dalmatians apprized of this movement?
asked one of the secret tribunal, whose nerves were
scarcely equal to the high functions he discharged.
We may have occasion for their volleys, ere this
riot is appeased.
Confide in the ordinary authorities for that,
Signore
,
answered the Senator Gradenigo. I have
only concern, lest some conspiracy, which may
touch the fidelity of the troops, lies concealed
beneath
the outcry.
The evil passions of man know no limits! What
would the wretches have? For a state in the decline,
Venice is to the last degree prosperous. Our ships
are thriving; the bank flourishes with goodly
dividends
;
and I do assure you, Signore, that, for many
years, I have not known so ample revenues for most
of our interests, as at this hour. All cannot thrive
alike!
You are happily connected with flourishing
affairs
,
Signore, but there are many that are less lucky.
Our form of government is somewhat exclusive, and
it is a penalty that we have ever paid for its
advantages
,
to be liable to sudden and malevolent
accusations
,
for any evil turn of fortune that besets the
republic.
Can nothing satisfy these exacting spirits? Are
they not freeare they not happy?
It would seem that they want better assurance
of these facts, than our own feelings, or our words.
Man is the creature of envy! The poor desire
to be richthe weak, powerful.
There is an exception to your rule, at least,
Signore
,
since the rich rarely wish to be poor, or the
powerful, weak.
You deride my sentiments, to-night, Signor
Gradenigo
.
I speak, I hope, as becomes a senator of
Venice, and in a manner that you are not
unaccustomed
to hear!
Nay, the language is not unusual. But I fear
me, there is something unsuited to a falling fortune,
in the exacting and narrow spirit of our laws.
When a state is eminently flourishing, its subjects
overlook general defects, in private prosperity, but
there is no more fastidious commentator on
measures
than your merchant of a failing trade.
This is their gratitude! Have we not converted
these muddy isles into a mart for half Christendom,
and now they are dissatisfied that they cannot retain
all the monopolies that the wisdom of our ancestors
has accumulated.
They complain much in your own spirit,
Signore
,but
you are right in saying the present riot
must be looked to. Let us seek his highness, who
will go out to the people, with such patricians as
may be present, and one of our number as a witness:
more than that might expose our character.
The Secret Council withdrew to carry this
resolution
into effect, just as the fishermen in the court
received
the accession of those who arrived by water.
There is no body so sensible of an increase of its
members as a mob. Without discipline, and
dependent
solely on animal force for its ascendency, the
sentiment of physical power is blended with its very
existence. When they saw the mass of living beings
which had assembled within the wall of the ducal
palace, the most audacious of that throng became
more hardy, and even the wavering grew strong.
This is the reverse of the feeling which prevails
among those who are called on to repress this species
of violence, who generally gain courage as its
exhibition
is least required.
The throng in the court was raising one of its
loudest and most menacing cries as the train of the
doge appeared, approaching by one of the long open
galleries of the principal floor of the edifice.
The presence of the venerable man who
nominally
presided over that factitious state, and the long
training of the fishermen in habits of deference to
authority, notwithstanding their present tone of
insubordination
,
caused a sudden and deep silence. A
feeling of awe gradually stole over the thousand dark
faces that were gazing upwards, as the little
cortege
drew near. So profound, indeed, was the
stillness
caused by this sentiment, that the rustling of
the ducal robes was audible, as the prince, impeded
by his infirmities, and consulting the state usual to his
rank, slowly advanced. The previous violence of
the untutored fishermen, and their present deference
to the external state that met their eyes, had its
origin
in the same causes;ignorance and habit were
the parents of both.
Why are ye assembled here, my children?
asked the doge, when he had reached the summit
of the Giant's Stairs,and most of all, why have
ye come into the palace of your prince, with these
unbefitting cries?
The tremulous voice of the old man was clearly
audible, for the lowest of its tones was scarcely
interrupted
by a breath. The fishermen gazed at
each other, and all appeared to search for him who
might be bold enough to answer. At length one in
the centre of the crowded mass, and effectually
concealed
from observation, cried, Justice!
Such is our object, mildly continued the prince;
and such, I will add, is our practice. Why are ye
assembled here, in a manner so offensive to the state,
and so disrespectful to your prince?
Still none answered. The only spirit of their
body, which had been capable of freeing itself from
the trammels of usage and prejudice, had deserted
the shell which lay on the lower step of the Giant's
Stairs.
Will none speak?are ye so bold with your
voices when unquestioned, and so silent when
confronted
?
Speak them fair, your highness, whispered he
of the council, who was commissioned to be a secret
witness of the interview;the Dalmatians are
scarce yet apparelled.
The prince bowed to advice which he well knew
must be respected, and he assumed his former tone.
If none will acquaint me with your wants, I must
command you to retire, and while my parental heart
grieves
Giustiza! repeated the hidden member of the
crowd.
Name thy wants, that we may know them.
Highness! deign to look at this!
One bolder than the rest had turned the body of
Antonio to the moon, in a manner to expose the
ghastly features, and, as he spoke, he pointed
towards
the spectacle he had prepared. The prince
started at the unexpected sight, and, slowly
descending
the steps, closely accompanied by his
companions
and his guards, he paused over the body.
Has the assassin done this? he asked, after
looking at the dead fisherman, and crossing himself.
What could the end of one like this profit a Bravo?
happly the unfortunate man hath fallen in a broil
of his class?
Neither, illustrious doge! we fear that Antonio
has suffered for the displeasure of St. Mark!
Antonio! Is this the hardy fisherman who
would have taught us how to rule in the state
regatta
!
Eccellenza, it is; returned the simple laborer
of the Lagunes,and a better hand with a net, or
a truer friend in need, never rowed a gondola, to
or from the Lido.
Diavalo!
It would have done
your highness pleasure to have seen the poor old
Christian among us, on a saint's day, taking the
lead in our little ceremonies, and teaching us the
manner in which our fathers used to do credit to
the craft!
Or to have been with us, illustrious doge, cried
another, for, the ice once broken, the tongues of a
mob soon grow bold, in a merry-making, on the
Lido, when old Antonio was always the foremost in
the laugh, and the discreetest in knowing when to
be grave.
The doge began to have dawning of the truth,
and he cast a glance aside to examine the
countenance
of the unknown inquisitor.
It is far easier to understand the merits of the
unfortunate man, than the manner of his death, he
said, finding no explanation in the drilled members
of the face he had scrutinized. Will any of your
party explain the facts?
The principal speaker among the fishermen
willingly
took on himself the office, and, in the
desultory
manner of one of his habits, he acquainted the
doge with the circumstances connected with the
finding of the body. When he had done, the prince
again asked explanations, with his eye, from the
senator
at his side, for he was ignorant whether the
policy of the state required an example, or simply a
death.
I see nothing in this, your Highness, observed
he of the council, but the chances of a fisherman.
The unhappy old man has come to his end by
accident
,
and it would be charity to have a few masses
said for his soul.
Noble senator! exclaimed the fisherman,
doubtingly
,
St. Mark was offended!
Rumor tells many idle tales of the pleasure and
displeasure of St. Mark. If we are to believe all
that the wit of men can devise, in affairs of this
nature
,
the criminals are not drowned in the Lagunes,
but in the Canale Orfano.
True, eccellenza, and we are forbidden to cast
our nets there, on pain of sleeping with the eels at
its bottom.
So much greater reason for believing that this
old man hath died by accident. Is there mark of
violence on his body?for though the state could
scarcely occupy itself with such as he, some other
might. Hath the condition of the body been looked
to?
Eccellenza, it was enough to cast one of his
years into the centre of the Lagunes. The stoutest
arm in Venice could not save him.
There may have been violence in some quarrel,
and the proper authority should be vigilant. Here
is a Carmelito!Father, do you know aught of
this?
The monk endeavored to answer, but his voice
failed. He stared wildly about him, for the whole
scene resembled some frightful picture of the
imagination
,
and then folding his arms on his bosom, he
appeared to resume his prayers.
Thou dost not answer, Friar? observed the
doge, who had been as effectually deceived, by the
natural and indifferent manner of the inquisitor, as
any other of his auditors. Where didst thou find
this body?
Father Anselmo briefly explained the manner in
which he had been pressed into the service of the
fishermen.
At the elbow of the prince there stood a young
patrician, who, at the moment, filled no other office
in the state, than such as belonged to his birth.
Deceived
,
like the others, by the manner of the only
one who knew the real cause of Antonio's death, he
felt a humane and praiseworthy desire to make sure
that no foul play had been exercised towards the
victim.
I have heard of this Antonio, said this person,
who was called the Senator Soranzo, and who was
gifted by nature with feelings that, in any other
form of government, would have made him a
philanthropist
,and
Vol. II. K
of his success in the regatta.
Was it not said that Jacopo, the Bravo, was his
competitor?
A low, meaning, and common murmur ran through
the throng.
A man of his reputed passions and ferocity,
may well have sought to revenge defeat, by
violence
!
A second, and a louder murmur denoted the effect
this suggestion had produced.
Eccellenza, Jacopo deals in the stiletto!
observed
the half-credulous but still doubting
fisherman
.
That is as may be necessary. A man of his art
and character may have recourse to other means to
gratify his malice. Do you not agree with me,
Signore
?
The Senator Soranzo put this question, in perfect
good faith, to the unknown member of the secret
council. The latter appeared struck with the
probability
of the truth of his companion's conjecture,
but contented himself, with a simple
acknowledgment
to that effect, by bowing.
Jacopo!Jacopo! hoarsely repeated voice
after voice in the crowdJacopo has done this!
The best gondolier in Venice has been beaten by an
old fisherman, and nothing but blood could wipe out
the disgrace!
It shall be inquired into, my children, and
strict justice done, said the doge, preparing to
depart
.
Officers, give money for masses, that the soul
of the unhappy man be not the sufferer. Reverend
Carmelite, I commend the body to thy care, and
thou canst do no better service than to pass the
night in prayer, by its side.
A thousand caps were waved in commendation
of this gracious command, and the whole throng
stood in silent respect, as the prince, followed by his
retinue, retired as he had approached, through the
long, vaulted, gallery above.
A secret order of the Inquisition prevented the
appearance of the Dalmatians.
A few minutes later and all was prepared. A
bier and canopy were brought out of the adjoining
cathedral, and the corpse was placed upon the
former. Father Anselmo then headed the
procession
,
which passed through the principal gate of the
palace into the square, chanting the usual service.
The Piazzetta and the piazza were still empty.
Here and there, indeed, a curious face, belonging to
some agent of the police, or to some observer more
firm than common, looked out from beneath the
arches of the porticoes on the movements of the
mob, though none ventured to come within its
influence
.
But the fishermen were no longer bent on
violence
.
With the fickleness of men little influenced
by reflection, and subject to sudden and violent
emotions, a temperament which, the effect of a
selfish system, is commonly tortured into the
reason
why it should never be improved, they had
abandoned all idea of revenge on the agents of the
police, and had turned their thoughts to the
religious
services, which, being commanded by the
prince himself, were so flattering to their class.
It is true that a few of the sterner natures, among
them, mingled menaces against the Bravo, with
their prayers for the dead, but these had no other
effect on the matter in hand, than is commonly
produced
by the by-players on the principal action of
the piece.
The great portal of the venerable church was
thrown open, and the solemn chant was heard
issuing
,
in responses, from among the quaint columns
and vaulted roofs within. The body of the lowly
and sacrificed Antonio was borne beneath that arch
which sustains the precious relics of Grecian art,
and deposited in the nave. Candles glimmered
before
the altar and around the ghastly person of the
dead, throughout the night; and the cathedral of
St. Mark was pregnant with all the imposing
ceremonials
of the Catholic ritual, until the day once
more appeared.
Priest succeeded priest, in repeating the masses,
while the attentive throng listened, as if each of its
members felt that his own honor and importance
were elevated by this concession to one of their
number. In the square the maskers gradually
reappeared
,
though the alarm had been too sudden
and violent, to admit a speedy return to the levity
which ordinarily was witnessed in that spot,
between
the setting and the rising of the sun.
CHAPTER VII.
'Tis of a lady in her earliest youth,
The very last of that illustrious race.
Rogers.
When
the fishermen landed on the quay, they
deserted
the gondola of the state to a man. Donna
Violetta and her governess heard the tumultuous
departure of their singular captors with alarm, for
they were nearly in entire ignorance of the motive
which had deprived them of the protection of father
Anselmo, and which had so unexpectedly made
them actors in the extraordinary scene. The
monk had simply explained that his offices were
required in behalf of the dead, but the
apprehension
of exciting unnecessary terror prevented him
from adding that they were in the power of a mob.
Donna Florinda, however, had ascertained
sufficient
,
by looking from the windows of the canopy,
and from the cries of those around her, to get a
glimmering of the truth. Under the circumstances,
she saw that the most prudent course was to keep
themselves as much as possible from observation.
But when the profound stillness that succeeded the
landing of the rioters announced that they were
alone, both she and her charge had an intuitive
perception
of the favorable chance, which fortune had
so strangely thrown in their way.
They are gone! whispered Donna Florinda,
holding her breath in attention, as soon as she had
spoken.
And the police will be soon here to seek us!
No further explanation passed, for Venice was a
town in which even the young and innocent were
taught caution. Donna Florinda stole another look
without.
They have disappeared, Heaven knows where!
Let us go!
In an instant the trembling fugitives were on the
quay. The Piazzetta was without a human form,
except their own. A low, murmuring, sound arose
from the court palace, which resembled the hum of
a disturbed hive; but nothing was distinct or
intelligible
.
There is violence meditated, again whispered
the governess; would to God that father Anselmo
were here!
A shuffling footstep caught their ears, and both
turned towards a boy, in the dress of one of the
Lagunes, who approached from the direction of the
Broglio.
A reverend Carmelite bid me give you this,
said the youth, stealing a glance behind him, like
one who dreaded detection. Then putting a small
piece of paper in the hand of Donna Florinda, he
K2
turned his own swarthy palm, in which a small
silver coin glittered, to the moon, and vanished.
By the aid of the same light the governess
succeeded
in tracing pencil-marks, in a hand that had
been well known to her younger days.
Save thyself, FlorindaThere is not an instant
to lose. Avoid public places, and seek a shelter
quickly.
But whither? asked the bewildered woman,
when she had read aloud the scroll.
Anywhere but here, rejoined Donna Violetta;
follow me.
Nature frequently more than supplies the
advantages
of training and experience, by her own gifts.
Had Donna Florinda been possessed of the natural
decision and firmness of her pupil, she would not now
have been existing in the isolated condition which is
so little congenial to female habits, nor would father
Anselmo have been a monk. Both had sacrificed
inclination to what they considered to be duty, and if
the ungenial life of the governess was owing to the
tranquil course of her ordinary feelings, it is
probable
that its impunity was to be ascribed to the same
respectable cause. Not so with Violetta. She was
ever more ready to act than to reflect, and though,
in general, the advantage might possibly be with
those of a more regulated temperament, there are
occasions that form exceptions to the rule. The
present moment was one of those turns in the
chances of life, when it is always better to do any
thing than to do nothing.
Donna Violetta had scarcely spoken, before her
person was shadowed beneath the arches of the
Broglio. Her governess clung to her side, more in
affection than in compliance with the warning of the
monk, or with the dictates of her own reason. A
vague and romantic intention of throwing herself at
the feet of the doge, who was a collateral
descendant
of her own ancient house, had flashed across
the mind of the youthful bride, when she first fled;
but no sooner had they reached the palace, than a
cry from the court acquainted them with its
situation
,
and consequently with the impossibility of
penetrating
to the interior.
Let us retire, by the streets, to thy dwelling, my
child, said Donna Florinda, drawing her mantle
about her in womanly dignity. None will offend
females of our condition; even the senate must, in
the end, respect our sex.
This from thee, Florinda!Thou, who hast so
often trembled for their anger! But go, if thou wilt
I am no longer the senate's.Don Camillo Monforte
has my duty.
Donna Florinda had no intention of disputing this
point, and as the moment had now arrived when the
most energetic was likely to lead, she quietly
submitted
herself to the superior decision of her pupil.
The latter took the way along the portico, keeping
always within its shadows. In passing the gateway,
which opened towards the sea, the fugitives had a
glimpse of what was passing in the court. The
sight quickened their steps, and they now flew, rather
than ran, along the arched passage. In a minute
they were on the bridge, which crosses the canal of
St. Mark, still flying with all their force. A few
mariners were looking from their feluccas and
gazing
in curiosity, but the sight of two terrified females,
seeking refuge from a mob, had nothing in itself
likely to attract notice.
At this moment, a dark mass of human bodies
appeared advancing along the quay in the opposite
direction. Arms glittered in the moon-beams, and
the measured tread of trained men became audible.
The Dalmatians were moving down from the arsenal
in a body. Advance and retreat now seemed equally
impossible to the breathless fugitives. As decision
and self-possession are very different qualities, Donna
Violetta did not understand so readily as the
circumstances
required, that it was more than probable
the hirelings of the republic would consider the flight
perfectly natural, as it had appeared to the curious
gazers of the port.
Terror made them blind, and as shelter was now
the sole object of the fugitives, they would probably
have sought it in the chamber of doom, itself, had
there been an opportunity. As it was, they turned
and entered the first, and indeed the only, gate which
offered. They were met by a girl, whose anxious
face betrayed that singular compound of self-devotion
and terror, which probably has its rise in the instinct
of feminine sympathies.
Here is safety, noble ladies, said the youthful
Venetian, in the soft accent of her native islands;
none will dare do you harm within these walls.
Into whose palace have I entered? demanded
the half-breathless Violetta. If its owner has a
name in Venice, he will not refuse hospitality to a
daughter of Tiepolo.
Signora, you are welcome, returned the gentle
girl, curtsying low, and still leading the way deeper
within the vast edifice. You bear the name of an
illustrious house!
There are few in the republic of note, from
whom I may not claim, either the kindness of ancient
and near services, or that of kindred. Dost thou
serve a noble master?
The first in Venice, lady.
Name him, that we may demand his hospitality
as befits us.
Saint Mark.
Donna Violetta and her governess stopped short.
Have we unconsciously entered a portal of the
palace?
That were impossible, lady, since the canal lies
between you and the residence of the doge. Still is
St. Mark master here. I hope you will not esteem
your safety less, because it has been obtained in
the public prison, and by the aid of its keeper's
daughter.
The moment for headlong decision was passed,
and that of reflection had returned.
How art thou called, child? asked Donna
Florinda
,
moving ahead of her pupil and taking the
discourse up, where in wonder the other had
permitted
it to pause. We are truly grateful for the
readiness with which thou threw open the gate for
our admission, in a moment of such alarmHow
art thou called?
Gelsomina, answered the modest girl. I am
the keeper's only childand when I saw ladies of
your honorable condition, fleeing on the quay, with
the Dalmatians marching on one side, and a mob
shouting on the other, I bethought me that even a
prison might be welcome.
Thy goodness of heart did not mislead thee.
Had I known it was a lady of the Tiepolo, I
should have been even more ready; for there are
few of that great name now left to do us honor.
Violetta curtsied to the compliment, but she
seemed uneasy that haste and pride of rank had led
her, so indiscreetly, to betray herself.
Canst thou not lead us to some place less public?
she asked, observing that her conductor had stopped
in a public corridor to make this explanation.
Here you will be retired as in your own palaces,
great ladies; answered Gelsomina, turning into a
private passage, and leading the way towards the
rooms of her family, from a window of which she
had first witnessed the embarrassment of her guests.
None enter here, without cause, but my father and
myself; and my father is much occupied with his
charge.
Hast thou no domestic?
None, lady. A prison-keeper's daughter should
not be too proud to serve herself.
Thou sayest well. One of thy discretion, good
Gelsomina, must know it is not seemly for females
of condition to be thrown within walls like these,
even by accident, and thou wilt do us much favor,
by taking more than common means, to be certain
that we are unseen. We give thee much trouble,
but it shall not go unrequited. Here is gold.
Gelsomina did not answer, but as she stood with
her eyes cast to the floor, the color stole to her
cheeks, until her usually bloodless face was in a soft
glow.
Nay, I have mistaken thy character! said
Donna
Florinda, secreting the sequins, and taking the
unresisting hand of the silent girl. If I have
pained thee, by my indiscretion, attribute the offer
to our dread of the disgrace of being seen in this
place.
The glow deepened, and the lips of the girl
quivered.
Is it then a disgrace to be innocently within these
walls, lady? she asked, still with an averted eye.
I have long suspected this, but none has ever before
said it, in my hearing!
Holy Maria pardon me! If I have uttered a
syllable to pain thee, excellent girl, it has been
unwittingly
and without intention!
We are poor, lady, and the needy must submit
to do that which their wishes might lead them to
avoid. I understand your feelings, and will make
sure of your being secret, and Blessed Maria will
pardon a greater sin, than any you have committed
here.
While the ladies were wondering, at witnessing
such proofs of delicacy and feeling in so singular a
place, the girl withdrew.
I had not expected this in a prison! exclaimed
Violetta.
As all is not noble, or just, in a palace, neither
is all to be condemned unheard, that we find in a
prison. But this is, in sooth, an extraordinary girl
for her condition, and we are indebted to blessed
St. Theodore, (crossing herself,) for putting her in
our way.
Can we do better than by making her a confidant
and a friend?
The governess was older, and less disposed than
her pupil, to confide in appearances. But the more
ardent mind and superior rank of the latter had
given her an influence, that the former did not
always
successfully resist. Gelsomina returned
before
there was time to discuss the prudence of what
Violetta had proposed.
Thou hast a father, Gelsomina? asked the
Venetian
heiress, taking the hand of the gentle girl, as
she put her question.
Holy Maria be praised!I have still that
happiness
.
It is a happinessfor surely a father would not
have the heart to sell his own child to ambition and
mercenary hopes! And thy mother?
Has long been bed-ridden, lady. I believe we
should not have been here, but we have no other
place so suitable for her sufferings, as this jail.
Gelsomina, thou art happier than I, even in thy
prison. I am fatherlessmotherlessI could almost
say, friendless.
And this from a lady of the Tiepolo!
All is not as it seems in this evil world, kind
Gelsomina. We have had many doges, but we
have had much suffering. Thou mayest have heard
that the house of which I come is reduced to a
single
,
youthful girl like thyself, who has been left in
the senate's charge?
They speak little of these matters, lady, in
Venice
;
and, of all here, none go so seldom into the
square as I. Still have I heard of the beauty and
riches of Donna Violetta. The last I hope is true;
the first I now see is so.
The daughter of Tiepolo colored, in turn, but it
was not in resentment.
They have spoken in too much kindness for an
orphan, she answered; though that fatal wealth
is perhaps not over-estimated. Thou knowest that
the state charges itself with the care and
establishment
of all noble females, whom Providence has
left fatherless?
Lady, I did not. It is kind of St. Mark to do it!
Thou wilt think differently, anon. Thou art
young, Gelsomina, and hast passed thy time in
privacy
?
True, lady. It is seldom I go farther than my
mother's room, or the cell of some suffering
prisoner
.
Violetta looked towards her governess, with an
expression which seemed to say, that she anticipated
her appeal would be made in vain, to one so little
exposed to the feelings of the world.
Thou wilt not understand then, that a noble
female
may have little inclination to comply with all
the senate's wishes, in disposing of her duties and
affections?
Gelsomina gazed at the fair speaker, but it was
evident that she did not clearly comprehend the
question. Again Violetta looked at the governess
as if asking aid.
The duties of our sex are often painful, said
Donna Florinda, understanding the appeal with
female instinct. Our attachments may not always
follow the wishes of our friends. We may not
choose, but we cannot always obey.
I have heard that noble ladies are not suffered to
see those to whom they are to be wedded, Signora,
if that is what your eccellenza means, and, to me,
the custom has always seemed unjust, if not cruel.
And are females of thy class permitted to make
friends among those who may become dearer at
any other day? asked Violetta.
Lady, we have that much freedom even in the
prisons.
Then art thou happier than those of the palaces!
I will trust thee, generous girl, for thou canst not
be unfaithful to the weakness and wrongs of thy
sex.
Gelsomina raised a hand, as if to stop the
impetuous
confidence of her guest, and then she listened
intently.
Few enter, here, she said; but there are
many ways of learning secrets within these walls
which are still unknown to me. Come deeper into
the rooms, noble ladies, for here is a place that I
have reason to think is safe, even from listeners.
The keeper's daughter led the way into the little
room, in which she was accustomed to converse
with Jacopo.
You were saying, lady, that I had a feeling for
the weakness and helplessness of our sex, and
surely you did me justice.
Violetta had leisure to reflect an instant, in
passing
from one room to the other, and she began her
communications with more reserve. But the
sensitive
interest that a being of the gentle nature and
secluded habits of Gelsomina took in her narrative,
won upon her own natural frankness, and, in a
manner nearly imperceptible to herself, she made
the keeper's daughter mistress of most of the
circumstances
under which she had entered the prison.
The cheek of Gelsomina became colorless as
she listened, and when Donna Violetta ceased,
every limb of her slight frame trembled with interest.
Vol. II. L
The senate is a fearful power to resist! she
said, speaking so low as hardly to be audible.
Have you reflected, lady, on the chances of what
you do?
If I have not, it is now too late to change my
intentions. I am the wife of the Duke of Sant'
Agata, and can never wed another.
Gesu!This is true.And yet, methinks, I
would choose to die a nun rather than offend the
council!
Thou knowest not, good girl, to what courage
the heart of even a young wife is equal.Thou art
still bound to thy father, in the instruction and
habits of childhood, but thou mayest live to know
that all thy hopes will centre in another.
Gelsomina ceased to tremble, and her mild eye
brightened.
The council is terrible, she answered, but it
must be more terrible to desert one to whom you
have vowed duty and love at the altar!
Hast thou the means of concealing us, kind
girl, interrupted Donna Florinda, and canst thou,
when this tumult shall be quieted, in any manner
help us to farther secrecy or flight?
Lady, I have none. Even the streets and
squares of Venice are nearly strangers to me.
Santissima
Maria! what would I give to know the
ways of the town as well as my cousin Annina,
who passes, at will, from her father's shop to the
Lido, and from St. Mark's to the Rialto, as her
pleasure suits. I will send for my cousin, who will
counsel us in this fearful strait!
Thy cousin!Hast thou a cousin named
Annina
?
Lady, Annina. My mother's sister's child.
The daughter of a wine-seller called Tomaso
Torti?
Do the noble dames of the city take such heed
of their inferiors!This will charm my cousin, for
she has great desires to be noted by the great.
And does thy cousin come hither?
Rarely, ladyWe are not of much intimacy.
I suppose Annina finds a girl, simple and
uninstructed
as I, unworthy of her company. But she will
not refuse to aid us, in a danger like this. I know
she little loves the republic, for we have had words
on its acts, and my cousin has been bolder of
speech about them, than befits one of her years, in
this prison.
Gelsomina, thy cousin is a secret agent of the
police, and unworthy of thy confidence
Lady!
I do not speak without reason. Trust me, she
is employed in duties that are unbecoming her sex,
and unworthy of thy confidence.
Noble dames, I will not say any thing to do
displeasure
to your high rank and present distress, but
you should not urge me to think thus of my
mother's
niece. You have been unhappy, and you
may have cause to dislike the republic, and you are
safe herebut I do not desire to hear Annina
censured
.
Both Donna Florinda and her less experienced
pupil knew enough of human nature, to consider
this generous incredulity as a favorable sign of the
integrity of her who manifested it, and they wisely
contented themselves with stipulating that Annina
should, on no account, be made acquainted with
their situation. After this understanding, the three
discussed, more leisurely, the prospect of the
fugitives
being able to quit the place, when ready,
without
detection.
At the suggestion of the governess, a servitor of
the prison was sent out by Gelsomina, to observe
the state of the square. He was particularly
charged, though in a manner to avoid suspicion, to
search for a Carmelite of the order of the
barefooted
friars. On his return, the menial reported
that the mob had quitted the court of the palace,
and was gone to the cathedral, with the body of
the fisherman who had so unexpectedly gained the
prize in the regatta of the preceding day.
Repeat your aves and go to sleep, Bella
Gelsomina
,
concluded the sub-keeper, for the fishermen
have left off shouting to say their prayers. Per
Diana! The bare-headed and bare-legged rascals
are as impudent as if St. Mark were their
inheritance
!
The noble patricians should give them a
lesson in modesty, by sending every tenth knave
among them to the galleys. Miscreants! to disturb
the quiet of an orderly town with their vulgar
complaints
!
But thou hast said nothing of the friar; is he
with the rioters?
There is a Carmelite at the altarbut my blood
boiled at seeing such vagabonds disturb the peace
of respectable persons, and I took little note of his
air or years.
Then thou failedst to do the errand on which I
sent thee. It is now too late to repair thy fault.
Thou canst return to thy charge.
A million pardons, Bellissima Gelsomina, but
indignation
is the uppermost feeling, when one in office
sees his rights attacked by the multitude. Send me
to Corfu, or to Candia, if you please, and I will bring
back the color of every stone in their prisons, but
do not send me among rebels. My gorge rises at
the sight of villany!
As the keeper's daughter withdrew, while her
father's assistant was making this protestation of
loyalty, the latter was compelled to give vent to the
rest of his indignation in a soliloquy.
One of the tendencies of oppression is to create
a scale of tyranny, descending from those who rule
a state, to those who domineer over a single
individual
.
He, who has been much accustomed to
view men, need not be told that none are so arrogant
with their inferiors, as those who are oppressed by
their superiors; for poor human nature has a secret
longing to revenge itself on the weak for all the
injuries
it receives from the strong. On the other
hand, no class is so willing to render that deference,
when unexacted, which is the proper meed of virtue,
and experience, and intelligence, as he who knows
that he is fortified on every side against innovations
on his natural rights. Thus it is, that there is more
security against popular violence and popular insults
in these free states, than in any other country on
earth, for there is scarcely a citizen so debased as
not to feel that, in assuming the appearance of a wish
to revenge the chances of fortune, he is making an
undue admission of inferiority.
Though the torrent may be pent and dammed by
art, it is with the constant hazard of breaking down
the unnatural barriers; but left to its own course, it
will become the tranquil and the deep stream, until
it finally throws off its superfluous waters into the
common receptacle of the ocean.
When Gelsomina returned to her visitors, it was
with a report favorable to their tranquillity. The
riot in the court of the palace, and the movement of
the Dalmatians, had drawn all eyes in another
direction
;
and although some errant gaze might have
witnessed their entrance into the gate of the prison,
it was so natural a circumstance, that no one would
suspect females of their appearance of remaining
there an instant longer than was necessary. The
momentary absence of the few servants of the
prison
,
who took little heed of those who entered the
open parts of the building, and who had been drawn
away by curiosity, completed their security. The
humble room they were in was exclusively devoted
L 2
to the use of their gentle protector, and there was
scarcely a possibility of interruption, until the
council
had obtained the leisure and the means of making
use of those terrible means, which rarely left any
thing it wished to know concealed.
With this explanation Donna Violetta and her
companion were greatly satisfied. It left them
leisure to devise means for their flight, and kindled
a hope, in the former, of being speedily restored to
Don Camillo. Still there existed the cruel
embarrassment
of not possessing the means of acquainting
the latter with their situation. As the tumult ceased,
they resolved to seek a boat, favored by such
disguises
as the means of Gelsomina could supply, and
to row to his palace; but reflection convinced Donna
Florinda of the danger of such a step, since the
Neapolitan was known to be surrounded by the
agents of the police. Accident, which is more
effectual
than stratagem in defeating intrigues, had
thrown them into a place of momentary security,
and it would be to lose the vantage-ground of their
situation to cast themselves, without the utmost
caution, into the hazards of the public canals.
At length the governess bethought her of turning
the services of the gentle creature, who had already
shown so much sympathy in their behalf, to account.
During the revelations of her pupil, the feminine
instinct of Donna Florinda had enabled her to
discover
the secret springs which moved the
unpractised
feelings of their auditor. Gelsomina had
listened
to the manner in which Don Camillo had thrown
himself into the canal to save the life of Violetta,
with breathless admiration; her countenance was a
pure reflection of her thoughts, when the daughter
of Tiepolo spoke of the risks he had run to gain her
love, and woman glowed in every lineament of her
mild face, when the youthful bride touched on the
nature of the engrossing tie which had united them,
and which was far too holy to be severed by the
senate's policy.
If we had the means of getting our situation
to the ears of Don Camillo, said the governess, all
might yet be saved; else will this happy refuge in
the prison avail us nothing.
Is the cavalier of too stout a heart to shrink
before
those up above? demanded Gelsomina.
He would summon the people of his confidence,
and ere the dawn of day we might still be beyond
their power. Those calculating senators will deal
with the vows of my pupil, as if they were childish
oaths, and set the anger of the Holy See itself at
defiance, when there is question of their interest.
But the sacrament of marriage is not of man;
that, at least, they will respect!
Believe it not. There is no obligation so solemn
as to be respected, when their policy is concerned.
What are the wishes of a girl, or what the
happiness
of a solitary and helpless female, to their
fortunes
?
That my charge is young, is a reason why
their wisdom should interfere, though it is none to
touch their hearts with the reflection that the misery
to which they would condemn her, is to last the
longer. They take no account of the solemn
obligations
of gratitude; the ties of affection are so
many means of working upon the fears of those
they rule, but none for forbearance; and they laugh
at the devotedness of woman's love, as a folly to
amuse their leisure, or to take off the edge of
disappointment
in graver concerns.
Can any thing be more grave than wedlock,
lady?
To them it is important, as it furnishes the
means of perpetuating their honors and their proud
names. Beyond this, the councils look little at
domestic
interests.
They are fathers and husbands!
True, for to be legally the first, they must
become
the last. Marriage to them is not a tie of
sacred and dear affinity, but the means of
increasing
their riches and of sustaining their names;
continued the governess, watching the effect of her
words on the countenance of the guileless girl.
They call marriages of affection children's games,
and they deal with the wishes of their own
daughters
,
as they would traffic with their commodities
of commerce. When a state sets up an idol of
gold as its god, few will refuse to sacrifice at its
altar!
I would I might serve the noble Donna
Violetta
!
Thou art too young, good Gelsomina, and I fear
too little practised in the cunning of Venice.
Doubt me not, lady; for I can do my duty like
another, in a good cause.
If it were possible to convey to Don Camillo
Monforte a knowledge of our situationbut thou art
too inexperienced for the service!
Believe it not, Signora, interrupted the generous
Gelsomina, whose pride began to stimulate her
natural
sympathies with one so near her own age, and
one too, like herself, subject to that passion which
engrosses a female heart. I may be apter than
my appearance would give reason to think.
I will trust thee, kind girl, and if the Sainted
Virgin protects us, thy fortunes shall not be
forgotten
!
The pious Gelsomina crossed herself, and, first
acquainting her companions with her intentions, she
went within to prepare herself, while Donna
Florinda
penned a note, in terms so guarded as to defy
detection in the event of accident, but which might
suffice to let the lord of St. Agata understand their
present situation.
In a few minutes the keeper's daughter
reappeared
.
Her ordinary attire, which was that of a
modest Venetian maiden of humble condition,
needed
no concealment; and the mask, an article of
dress which none in that city were without,
effectually
disguised her features. She then received the
note, with the name of the street, and the palace
she was to seek, a description of the person of the
Neapolitan, with often-repeated cautions to be wary,
and departed.
CHAPTER VIII.
Which is the wiser here?Justice or iniquity?
Measure for Measure
.
In
the constant struggle between the innocent and
the artful, the latter have the advantage, so long as
they confine themselves to familiar interests. But
the moment the former conquer their disgust for the
study of vice, and throw themselves upon the
protection
of their own high principles, they are far
more effectually concealed from the calculations of
their adversaries, than if they practised the most
refined of their subtle expedients. Nature has given
to every man enough of frailty to enable him to
estimate
the workings of selfishness and fraud, but her
truly privileged are those who can shroud their
motives
and intentions in a degree of justice and
disinterestedness
,
which surpass the calculations of the
designing. Millions may bow to the commands of
a conventional right, but few, indeed, are they who
know how to choose in novel and difficult cases.
There is often a mystery in virtue. While the
cunning
of vice is no more than a pitiful imitation of
that art, which endeavors to cloke its workings in
the thin veil of deception, the other, in some degree,
resembles the sublimity of infallible truth.
Thus men, too much practised in the interests of
life, constantly overreach themselves, when brought
in contact with the simple and intelligent; and the
experience of every day proves, that, as there is no
fame permanent which is not founded on virtue, so
there is no policy secure which is not bottomed on
the good of the whole. Vulgar minds may control
the concerns of a community, so long as they are
limited to vulgar views; but woe to the people
who confide, on great emergencies, in any but the
honest, the noble, the wise, and the philanthropic;
for there is no security for success when the
meanly
artful control the occasional and providential
events which regenerate a nation. More than half
the misery which has defeated, as well as disgraced,
civilization, proceeds from neglecting to use those
great men that are always created by great
occasions
.
Treating, as we are, of the vices of the Venetian
system, our pen has run truant with its subject,
since the application of the moral must be made on
the familiar scale suited to the incidents of our story.
It has already been seen that Gelsomina was
intrusted
with certain important keys of the prison.
For this trust there had been sufficient motive with
the wily guardians of the jail, who had made their
calculations on her serving their particular orders,
without ever suspecting that she was capable of so
far listening to the promptings of a generous
temper
,
as might induce her to use them in any manner
prejudicial to their own views. The service to
which they were now to be applied, proved that the
keepers, one of which was her own father, had not
fully known how to estimate the powers of the
innocent
and simple.
Provided with the keys in question, Gelsomina
took a lamp, and passed upward from the mezzinino
in which she dwelt, to the first floor of the edifice,
instead of descending to its court. Door was
opened
after door, and many a gloomy corridor was
passed by the gentle girl, with the confidence of one
who knew her motive to be good. She soon
crossed
the Bridge of Sighs, fearless of interruption in that
unfrequented gallery, and entered the palace. Here
she made her way to a door that opened on the
common and public vomitories of the structure.
Moving with sufficient care to make inpunity from
detection sure, she extinguished the light, and
applied
the key. At the next instant she was on the
vast and gloomy stair-way. It required but a
moment
to descend it, and to reach the covered gallery
which surrounded the court. A halberdier was
within a few feet of her. He looked at the unknown
female with interest; but as it was not his business
to question those who issued from the building,
nothing
was said. Gelsomina walked on. A
half-repenting
,
but vindictive being, was dropping an
accusation
in the lion's mouth. Gelsomina stopped
involuntarily, until the secret accuser had done his
treacherous work and departed. Then, when she
was about to proceed, she saw that the halberdier,
at the head of the Giant's stairway, was smiling at
her indecision, like one accustomed to such scenes.
Is there danger in quitting the palace? she
asked of the rough mountaineer.
Corpo di Bacco! There might have been, an
hour since, Bella Donna; but the rioters are
muzzled
,
and at their prayers!
Gelsomina hesitated no longer. She descended
the well-known flight, down which the head of
Faliero
had rolled, and was soon beneath the arch of
the gate. Here the timid and unpractised girl again
stopped, for she could not venture into the square
without assuring herself, like a deer about to quit its
cover, of the tranquillity of the place, into which she
was to enter.
The agents of the police had been too much
alarmed by the rising of the fishermen, not to call
their usual ingenuity and finesse into play, the
moment
the disturbance was appeased. Money had
been given to the mountebanks and ballad-singers to
induce them to reappear, and groups of hirelings,
some in masks and others without concealment,
were ostentatiously assembled in different parts of
the piazza. In short, those usual expedients were
resorted to, which are constantly used to restore the
confidence of a people, in those countries in which
civilization is so new, that they are not yet
considered
sufficiently advanced to be the guardians of
their own security. There are few artifices so
shallow
that many will not be their dupes. The idler, the
curious, the really discontented, the factious, the
designing
,
with a suitable mixture of the unthinking,
and of those who only live for the pleasure of the
passing hour, a class not the least insignificant for
numbers, had lent themselves to the views of the
police
;
and when Gelsomina was ready to enter the
Piazzetta, she found both the squares partially filled.
A few excited fishermen clustered about the doors
of the cathedral, like bees swarming before their
hive; but, on that side, there was no very visible
cause of alarm. Unaccustomed as she was to scenes
like that before her, the first glance assured the
gentle
girl of the real privacy which so singularly
distinguishes
the solitude of a crowd. Gathering her
simple mantle more closely about her form, and
settling
her mask with care, she moved with a swift
step into the centre of the piazza.
We shall not detail the progress of our heroine,
as, avoiding the commonplace gallantry that
assailed
and offended her ear, she went her way, on her
errand of kindness. Young, active, and impelled by
her intentions, the square was soon passed, and she
reached the place of San Nico. Here was one of
the landings of the public gondolas. But, at the
moment
,
there was no boat in waiting, for curiosity or
fear had induced the men to quit their usual stand.
Gelsomina had ascended the bridge, and was on the
crown of its arch, when a gondolier came
sweeping
lazily in from the direction of the Grand Canal.
Her hesitation and doubting manner attracted his
attention, and the man made the customary sign,
which conveyed the offer of his services. As she
was nearly a stranger to the streets of Venice,
labyrinths
,
that offer greater embarrassment to the
uninitiated
,
than perhaps the passages of any other
town of its size, she gladly availed herself of the
offer. To descend to the steps, to leap into the
boat, to utter the word Rialto, and to conceal
herself in the pavilion, was the business of a minute.
The boat was instantly in motion.
Gelsomina now believed herself secure of
effecting
her purpose, since there was little to apprehend
from the knowledge, or the designs, of a common
boatman. He could not know her object, and it
was his interest to carry her, in safety, to the place
she had commanded. But so important was
success
,
that she could not feel secure of attaining it,
while it was still unaccomplished. She soon
summoned
sufficient resolution to look out at the palaces
and boats they were passing, and she felt the
refreshing
air of the canal revive her courage. Then
turning, with sensitive distrust, to examine the
countenance of the gondolier, she saw that his
features
were concealed beneath a mask that was so
well designed, as not to be perceptible to a casual
observer by moonlight.
Though it was common, on occasions, for the
servants of the great, it was not usual for the public
Vol. II. M
gondoliers, to be disguised. The circumstance itself
was one justly to excite slight apprehension, though,
on second thoughts, Gelsomina saw no more in it,
than a return from some expedition of pleasure, or
some serenade, perhaps, in which the caution of a
lover had compelled his followers to resort to this
species of concealment.
Shall I put you on the public quay, Signora,
demanded the gondolier, or shall I see you to the
gate of your own palace?
The heart of Gelsomina beat high. She liked the
tone of the voice, though it was necessarily
smothered
by the mask, but she was little accustomed to
act in the affairs of others, and less still in any of so
great interest, that the sounds caused her to tremble
like one less worthily employed.
Dost thou know the palace of a certain Don
Camillo Monforte, a lord of Calabria, who dwells,
here, in Venice? she asked, after a moment's pause.
The gondolier sensibly betrayed surprise, by the
manner in which he started at the question.
Would you be rowed there, lady?
If thou art certain of knowing the palazzo.
The water stirred, and the gondola glided between
high walls. Gelsomina knew, by the sound, that they
were in one of the smaller canals, and she augured
well of the boatman's knowledge of the town. They
soon stopped by the side of a water-gate, and the
man appeared on the step, holding an arm, to aid
her in ascending, after the manner of people of his
craft. Gelsomina bade him wait her return, and
proceeded.
There was a marked derangement in the
household
of Don Camillo, that one more practised than
our heroine would have noted. The servants
seemed
undecided, in the manner of performing the most
ordinary duties; their looks wandered distrustfully
from one to the other, and when their half-frightened
visitor entered the vestibule, though all arose, none
advanced to meet her. A female masked was not a
rare sight, in Venice, for few of that sex went upon
the canals, without using the customary means of
concealment; but it would seem, by their, hesitating
manner, that the menials of Don Camillo did not
view the entrance of her, who now appeared, with
the usual indifference.
I am in the dwelling of the Duke of St. Agata,
a Signore of Calabria? demanded Gelsomina, who
saw the necessity of being firm.
Signora, si
Is your lord in the palace?
Signora, he isand he is not. What beautiful
lady shall I tell him does him this honor?
If he be not at home, it will not be necessary to
tell him any thing. If he is, I could wish to see him.
The domestics, of whom there were several, put
their heads together, and seemed to dispute on the
propriety of receiving the visit. At this instant, a
gondolier, in a flowered jacket, entered the vestibule.
Gelsomina took courage at his good-natured eye and
frank manner.
Do you serve Don Camillo Monforte? she asked,
as he passed her, on his way to the canal.
With the oar, Bellissima Donna, answered
Gino, touching his cap, though scarce looking aside
at the question.
And could he be told that a female wishes
earnestly to speak to him in private?A female.
Santa Maria! Bella Donna, there is no end to
females who come on these errands, in Venice. You
might better pay a visit to the statue of San Teodore,
in the piazza, than see my master at this moment;
the stone will give you the better reception.
And this he commands you to tell all of my sex
who come!
Diavolo!Lady, you are particular in your
questions. Perhaps my master might, on a strait,
receive one of the sex, I could name, but on the
honor of a gondolier he is not the most gallant
cavalier of Venice, just at this moment.
If there is one to whom he would pay this
deference
,
you are bold for a servitor. How know you
I am not that one?
Gino started. He examined the figure of the
applicant
,
and lifting his cap he bowed.
Lady, I do not know any thing about it, he said;
you may be his Highness the Doge, or the
ambassador
of the emperor. I pretend to know nothing
in Venice, of late
The words of Gino were cut short by a tap on
the shoulder from the public gondolier, who had
hastily entered the vestibule. The man whispered
in the ear of Don Camillo's servitor.
This is not a moment to refuse any, he said.
Let the stranger go up.
Gino hesitated no longer. With the decision of a
favored menial he pushed the groom of the
chambers
aside, and offered to conduct Gelsomina,
himself
,
to the presence of his master. As they ascended
the stairs, three of the inferior servants disappeared.
The palace of Don Camillo had an air of more
than Venetian gloom. The rooms were dimly
lighted, many of the walls had been stripped of the
most precious of their pictures, and, in other
respects
a jealous eye might have detected evidence
of a secret intention, on the part of its owner, not
to make a permanent residence of the dwelling.
But these were particulars that Gelsomina did not
note, as she followed Gino through the apartments,
into the more private parts of the building. Here
the gondolier unlocked a door, and regarding his
companion with an air, half-doubting,
half-respectful
,
he made a sign for her to enter.
My master commonly receives the ladies, here,
he said. Enter, eccellenza, while I run to tell him
of his happiness.
Gelsomina did not hesitate, though she felt a
violent
throb at the heart, when she heard the key
turning in the lock, behind her. She was in an
antechamber
,
and, inferring from the light which shone
through the door of an adjoining room, that she
was to proceed, she went on. No sooner had she
entered the little closet, than she found herself alone
with one of her own sex.
Annina! burst from the lips of the unpractised
prison-girl, under the impulse of surprise.
Gelsomina!The simple, quiet, whispering,
modest, Gelsomina! returned the other.
The words of Annina admitted but of one
construction
.
Wounded, like the bruised sensitive plant,
Gelsomina withdrew her mask, for air, actually
gasping for breath, between offended pride and
wonder.
Thou here! she added, scarce knowing what
she uttered.
Thou here! repeated Annina, with such a
laugh, as escapes the degraded, when they believe
the innocent reduced to their own level.
NayI come on an errand of pity.
Santa Maria! we are both here with the same
end!
Annina! I know not what thou would'st say!
This is surely the palace of Don Camillo Monforte!
A noble Neapolitan, who urges claims to the
honors
of the senate?
The gayestthe handsomestthe richest, and
the most inconstant cavalier in Venice! Hadst thou
been here, a thousand times, thou could'st not be
better informed!
Gelsomina listened in horror. Her artful cousin,
who knew her character to the full extent that vice
can comprehend innocence, watched her colorless
M 2
cheek and contracting eye, with secret triumph.
At the first moment, she had believed all that she
insinuated, but second thoughts, and a view of the
visible distress of the frightened girl, gave a new
direction to her suspicions.
But I tell thee nothing new, she quickly added.
I only regret thou should'st find me, where, no
doubt, you expected to meet the Duca di Sant'
Agata himself.
Annina!This from thee!
Thou surely didst not come to his palace to
seek thy cousin!
Gelsomina had long been familiar with grief, but
until this moment she had never felt the deep
humiliation
of shame. Tears started from her eyes, and
she sunk back into a seat, in utter inability to stand.
I would not distress thee out of bearing, added
the artful daughter of the wine-seller. But that
we are both in the closet of the gayest cavalier of
Venice, is beyond dispute.
I have told thee that pity for another brought
me hither.
Pity for Don Camillo.
For a noble ladya young, a virtuous, and a
beautiful wifea daughter of the Tiepoloof the
Tiepolo, Annina!
Why should a lady of the Tiepolo employ a
girl of the public prisons!
Why!because there has been injustice by
those up above. There has been a tumult among
the fishermenand the lady with her governess
were liberated by the riotersand his Highness
spoke to them in the great courtand the
Dalmatians
were on the quayand the prison was a
refuge
for ladies of their quality, in a moment of so
great terrorand the Holy Church itself has
blessed
their love
Gelsomina could utter no more, but breathless with
the wish to vindicate herself, and wounded to the
soul by the strange embarrassment of her situation,
she sobbed aloud. Incoherent as had been her
language
,
she had said enough to remove every doubt
from the mind of Annina. Privy to the secret
marriage
,
to the rising of the fishermen, and to the
departure
of the ladies, from the convent on a distant
island, where they had been carried on quitting
their own palace, the preceding night, and whither
she had been compelled to conduct Don Camillo,
who had ascertained the departure of those he
sought without discovering their destination, the
daughter of the wine-seller readily comprehended,
not only the errand of her cousin, but the precise
situation of the fugitives.
And thou believest this fiction, Gelsomina?
she said, affecting pity for her cousin's credulity.
The characters of thy pretended daughter of
Tiepolo
and her governess are no secrets to those who
frequent the piazza of San Marco.
Hadst thou seen the beauty and innocence of
the lady, Annina, thou would'st not say this!
Blessed San Theodoro! What is more
beautiful
than vice! 'Tis the cheapest artifice of the devil
to deceive frail sinners. This thou hast heard of
thy confessor, Gelsomina, or he is of much lighter
discourse than mine.
But why should a woman of this life enter the
prisons?
They had good reasons to dread the
Dalmatians
,
no doubt. But, it is in my power to tell thee
more, of these thou hast entertained, with such
peril to thine own reputation. There are women
in Venice who discredit their sex in various ways,
and these, more particularly she who calls herself
Florinda, is notorious for her agency in robbing St.
Mark of his revenue. She has received a largess,
from the Neapolitan, of wines grown on his
Calabrian
mountains, and wishing to tamper with my
honesty, she offered the liquor to me, expecting one
like me to forget my duty, and to aid her in
deceiving
the republic.
Can this be true, Annina!
Why should I deceive thee? Are we not
sister's
children, and though affairs on the Lido keep
me much from thy company, is not the love
between
us natural? I complained to the authorities,
and the liquors were seized, and the pretended
noble
ladies were obliged to hide themselves this very
day. 'Tis thought they wish to flee the city, with
their profligate Neapolitan. Driven to take shelter,
they have sent thee to acquaint him with their
hiding-place, in order that he may come to their
aid.
And why art thou here, Annina?
I marvel that thou didst not put the question
sooner. Gino, the gondolier of Don Camillo, has
long been an unfavorable suitor of mine, and when
this Florinda complained of my having, what every
honest girl in Venice should do, exposed her fraud
to the authorities, he advised his master to seize me,
partly in revenge, and partly with the vain hope of
making me retract the complaint I have made. Thou
hast heard of the bold violence of these cavaliers
when thwarted in their wills.
Annina then related the manner of her seizure,
with sufficient exactitude, merely concealing those
facts that it was not her interest to reveal.
But there is a lady of the Tiepolo, Annina!
As sure as there are cousins like ourselves.
Santa Madre di Dio! that women so treacherous
and so bold should have met one of thy innocence!
It would have been better had they fallen in with
me, who am too ignorant for their cunning, blessed
St. Anna knows!but who has not to learn their
true characters.
They did speak of thee, Annina!
The glance, which the wine-seller's daughter
threw at her cousin, was such as the treacherous
serpent casts at the bird; but preserving her
self-possession
,
she added
Not to my favor; it would sicken me to hear
words of favor from such as they!
They are not thy friends, Annina.
Perhaps they told thee, child, that I was in the
employment of the council?
Indeed they did.
No wonder. Your dishonest people can never
believe one can do an act of pure conscience.
But, here comes the Neapolitan.Note the libertine,
Gelsomina, and thou wilt feel for him the same
disgust
as I!
The door opened, and Don Camillo Monforte
entered
.
There was an appearance of distrust in his
manner, which proved that he did not expect to
meet his bride. Gelsomina arose, and, though
bewildered
by the tale of her cousin, and her own
previous impressions, she stood resembling a meek
statue of modesty, awaiting his approach. The
Neapolitan was evidently struck by her beauty, and
the simplicity of her air, but his brow was fixed,
like that of a man who had steeled his feelings
against deceit.
Thou would'st see me? he said.
I had that wish, noble Signore, butAnnina
Seeing another, thy mind hath changed.
Signore, it has.
Don Camillo looked at her earnestly, and with
manly regret.
Thou art young for thy vocationhere is gold.
Retire as thou camest.But holddost thou know
this Annina?
She is my mother's sister's daughter, noble
Duca.
Per Diana! a worthy sisterhood! Depart
together
,
for I have no need of either. But mark
me, and as he spoke, Don Camillo took Annina by
the arm, and led her aside, when he continued with
a low but menacing voiceThou see'st I am to
be feared, as well as thy Councils. Thou canst not
cross the threshold of thy father without my
knowledge
.
If prudent, thou wilt teach thy tongue
discretion
.
Do as thou wilt, I fear thee not; but
remember
,
prudence,
Annina made an humble reverence, as if in
acknowledgment
of the wisdom of his advice, and taking
the arm of her half-unconscious cousin, she again
curtsied, and hurried from the room. As the
presence
of their master in his closet was known to
them, none of the menials presumed to stop those
who issued from the privileged room. Gelsomina,
who was even more impatient than her wily
companion
to escape from a place she believed polluted,
was nearly breathless when she reached the
gondola
.
Its owner was in waiting on the steps, and
in a moment the boat whirled away from a spot,
which both of those it contained were, though for
reasons so very different, glad to quit.
Gelsomina had forgotten her mask, in her hurry;
and the gondola was no sooner in the great canal
than she put her face at the window of the pavilion
in quest of the evening air. The rays of the moon
fell upon her guileless eye, and a cheek that was
now glowing, partly with offended pride, and partly
with joy at her escape from a situation she felt
to be so degrading. Her forehead was touched
with a finger, and turning she saw the gondolier
making a sign of caution. He then slowly lifted
his mask.
Carlo! had half burst from her lips, but another
sign suppressed the cry.
Gelsomina withdrew her head, and, after her
beating heart had ceased to throb, she bowed her
face and murmured thanksgivings, at finding herself,
at such a moment, under the protection of one who
possessed all her confidence.
The gondolier asked no orders for his direction.
The boat moved on, taking the direction of the port,
which appeared perfectly natural to the two females.
Annina supposed it was returning to the square,
the place she would have sought had she been alone,
and Gelsomina, who believed that he whom she
called Carlo, toiled regularly as a gondolier for
support
,
fancied, of course, that he was taking her to
her ordinary residence.
But though the innocent can endure the scorn of
the world, it is hard indeed to be suspected by those
they love. All that Annina had told her of the
character of Don Camillo and his associates came
gradually across the mind of the gentle Gelsomina,
and she felt the blood creeping to her temples, as she
saw the construction her lover might put on her
conduct. A dozen times did the artless girl satisfy
herself with saying inwardly, he knows me and
will believe the best, and as often did her feelings
prompt her to tell the truth. Suspense is far more
painful, at such moments, than even vindication,
which, in itself, is a humiliating duty to the virtuous.
Pretending a desire to breathe the air, she left her
cousin in the canopy. Annina was not sorry to be
alone, for she had need to reflect on all the windings
of the sinuous path on which she had entered.
Gelsomina succeeded in passing the pavilion, and
in gaining the side of the gondolier.
Carlo!she said, observing that he continued
to row in silence.
Gelsomina!
Thou hast not questioned me!
I know thy treacherous cousin, and can believe
thou art her dupe. The moment to learn the truth
will come.
Thou didst not know me, Carlo, when I called
thee from the bridge?
I did notAny fare that would occupy my time
was welcome.
Why dost thou call Annina treacherous?
Because Venice does not hold a more wily heart,
or a falser tongue.
Gelsomina remembered the warning of Donna
Florinda. Possessed of the advantage of blood, and
that reliance which the inexperienced always place
in the integrity of their friends, until exposure comes
to destroy the illusion, Annina had found it easy to
persuade her cousin of the unworthiness of her
guests. But here was one who had all her
sympathies
,
who openly denounced Annina herself. In
such a dilemma the bewildered girl did what nature
and her feelings suggested. She recounted, in a low
but rapid voice, the incidents of the evening, and
Annina's construction of the conduct of the females
whom she had left behind in the prison.
Jacopo listened so intently that his oar dragged in
the water.
Enough, he said, when Gelsomina, blushing
with her own earnestness to stand exculpated in his
eyes, had done; I understand it all. Distrust thy
cousin, for the senate itself is not more false.
The pretended Carlo spoke cautiously, but in a
firm voice. Gelsomina took his meaning, though
wondering at what she heard, and returned to
Annina
within. The gondola proceeded, as if nothing
had occurred.
CHAPTER IX.
Enough.
I could be merry now: Hubert, I love thee;
Well, I'll not say what I intend for thee:
Remember.
King John
.
Jacopo
was deeply practised in the windings of
Venetian deceit. He knew how unceasingly the
eyes of the Councils, through their agents, were on
the movements of those in whom they took an
interest
,
and he was far from feeling all the advantage
circumstances had seemingly thrown in his way.
Annina was certainly in his power, and it was not
possible that she had yet communicated the
intelligence
,
derived from Gelsomina, to any of her
employers
.
But a gesture, a look in passing the
prison-gates
,
the appearance of duresse, or an exclamation,
might give the alarm to some one of the thousand
spies of the police. The disposal of Annina's person
in some place of safety, therefore, became the first
and the most material act. To return to the palace
of Don Camillo, would be to go into the midst of the
hirelings of the senate; and although the Neapolitan,
relying on his rank and influence, had preferred this
step, when little importance was attached to the
detention
of the girl, and when all she knew had been
revealed, the case was altered, now that she might
become the connecting link in the information
necessary
to enable the officers to find the fugitives.
The gondola moved on. Palace after palace was
passed, and the impatient Annina thrust her head
from a window to note its progress. They came
among the shipping of the port, and her uneasiness
sensibly increased. Making a pretext similar to that
of Gelsomina, the wine-seller's daughter quitted the
pavilion, to steal to the side of the gondolier.
Vol. II. N
I would be landed quickly at the water-gate of
the doge's palace, she said, slipping a piece of
silver
into the hand of the boatman.
You shall be served, Bella Donna. But
Diamine
!
I marvel that a girl of thy wit should not
scent the treasures in yonder felucca!
Dost thou mean the Sorrentine?
What other padrone brings as well-flavored
liquors within the Lido! Quiet thy impatience to
land, daughter of honest old Maso, and traffic with
the padrone, for the comfort of us of the canals.
How! Thou knowest me then?
To be the pretty wine-seller of the Lido. Corpo
di Bacco! Thou art as well known as the sea-wall
itself, to us gondoliers.
Why art thou masked? thou canst not be
Luigi!
It is little matter whether I am called Luigi, or
Enrico, or GiorgioI am thy customer, and honor
the shortest hair of thy eyebrows. Thou knowest,
Annina, that the young patricians have their frolics,
and they swear us gondoliers to keep secret till all
danger of detection is over; were any impertinent
eyes following me, I might be questioned as to the
manner of having passed the earlier hours.
Methinks it would be better to have given thee
gold, and to have sent thee at once to thy home.
To be followed like a denounced Hebrew to my
door. When I have confounded my boat with a
thousand others, it will be time to uncover. Wilt
thou to the Bella Sorrentina?
Nay, 'tis not necessary to ask, since thou takest
the direction of thine own will!
The gondolier laughed and nodded his head, as
if he would give his companion to understand that
he was master of her secret wishes. Annina was
hesitating in what manner she should make him
change his purpose, when the gondola touched the
felucca's side.
We will go up and speak to the padrone,
whispered Jacopo.
It is of no avail; he is without liquors.
Trust him notI know the man and his
pretences
.
Thou forgettest my cousin.
She is an innocent and unsuspecting child.
Jacopo lifted Annina, as he spoke, on the deck
of the Bella Sorrentina, in a manner between
gallantry
and force, and leaped after her. Without
pausing, or suffering her to rally her thoughts, he
led her to the cabin stairs, which she descended,
wondering at his conduct, but determined not to
betray her own secret wrongs on the customs to a
stranger.
Stefano Milano was asleep, in a sail, on deck. A
touch aroused him, and a sign gave him to
understand
that the imaginary Roderigo stood before
him.
A thousand pardons, Signore, said the gaping
mariner; is the freight come?
In part only. I have brought thee a certain
Annina Torti, the daughter of old Tommaso Torti,
a wine-seller of the Lido.
Santa Madre! does the senate think it
necessary
to send one like her from the city in secret?
It doesand it lays great stress on her
detention
.
I have come hither with her, without
suspicion
of my object, and she has been prevailed on to
enter thy cabin, under a pretence of some secret
dealings in wines. According to our former
understanding
,
it will be thy business to make sure of her
presence.
That is easily done, returned Stefano, stepping
forward and closing the cabin-door, which he
secured
by a bolt. She is alone, now, with the
image of our Lady, and a better occasion to repeat
her aves cannot offer.
This is well, if thou canst keep her so. It is
now time to lift thy anchors, and to go beyond the
tiers of the vessels with the felucca.
Signore, there wants but five minutes for that
duty, since we are ready.
Then perform it, in all speed, for much depends
on the management of this delicate duty. I will be
with thee, anon. Hearkee, Master Stefano; take
heed of thy prisoner, for the senate makes great
account of her security.
The Calabrian made such a gesture, as one
initiated
uses, when he would express a confidence in
his own shrewdness. While the pretended Roderigo
re-entered his gondola, Stefano began to awaken
his people. As the gondola entered the canal of
San Marco, the sails of the felucca fell, and the low
Calabrian vessel stole along the tiers towards the
clear water beyond.
The boat quickly touched the steps of the
water-gate
of the palace. Gelsomina entered the arch,
and glided up the Giant's Stairway, the route by
which she had quitted the palace. The halberdier
was the same that watched as she went out. He
spoke to her, in gallantry, but offered no
impediment
to her entrance.
Haste, noble ladies, hasten for the love of the
Holy Virgin! exclaimed Gelsomina, as she burst
into the room in which Donna Violetta and her
companion awaited her appearance. I have
endangered
your liberty by my weakness, and there
is not a moment to lose. Follow while you may,
nor stop to whisper even a prayer.
Thou art hurried and breathless, returned
Donna Florinda; hast thou seen the Duca di
Sant' Agata?
Nay, question me not, but follow, noble dames.
Gelsomina seized the lamp, and casting a glance
that appealed strongly to her visitors for tacit
compliance
,
she led the way into the corridors. It is
scarcely necessary to say that she was followed.
The prison was left in safety, the Bridge of
Sighs was passed, for it will be remembered that
Gelsomina was still mistress of the keys, and the
party went swiftly by the great stairs of the palace
into the open gallery. No obstruction was offered to
their progress, and they all descended to the court,
with the quiet demeanor of females who went out
on their ordinary affairs.
Jacopo awaited at the water-gate. In less than a
minute he was driving his gondola across the port,
following the course of the felucca, whose white
sail was visible in the moonlight, now bellying in
the breeze, and now flapping as the mariners
checked her speed. Gelsomina watched their
progress
for a moment in breathless interest, and then
she crossed the bridge of the quay, and entered the
prison by its public gate.
Hast thou made sure of the old 'Maso's
daughter
?
demanded Jacopo, on reaching the deck of
the Bella Sorrentina again.
She is like shifting ballast, Master Roderigo;
first on one side of the cabin, and then on the
other; but you see the bolt is undrawn.
'Tis well: here is more of thy freightthou
hast the proper passes for the galley of the guard?
All is in excellent order, Signore; when was
Stefano Milano out of rule in a matter of haste?
Diamine! let the breeze come, and though the
senate should wish us back again, it might send all
its spirri after us in vain.
Excellent Stefano! fill thy sails, then, for our
masters watch your movements, and set a value on
your diligence.
While the Calabrian complied, Jacopo assisted
N 2
the females to come up out of the gondola. In a
moment the heavy yards swung off, wing and wing,
and the bubbles that appeared to glance past the
sides of the Bella Sorrentina, denoted her speed.
Thou hast noble ladies in thy passengers, said
Jacopo to the padrone, when the latter was released
from the active duties of getting his vessel in
motion
;
and though policy requires that they should
quit the city for a time, thou wilt gain favor by
consulting
their pleasures.
Doubt me not, Master Roderigo; but thou
forgettest
that I have not yet received my sailing
instructions
;
a felucca without a course, is as badly
off as an owl in the sun.
That in good time; there will come an officer
of the republic to settle this matter with thee. I
would not have these noble ladies know, that one
like Annina is to be their fellow-passenger, while
they are near the port; for they might complain of
disrespect. Thou understandest, Stefano?
Cospetto! am I a fool? a blunderer? if so, why
does the senate employ me? the girl is out of
hearing
,
and there let her stay. As long as the noble
dames are willing to breathe the night air, they
shall have none of her company.
No fear of them. The dwellers of the land
little relish the pent air of thy cabin. Thou wilt go
without the Lido, Stefano, and await my coming.
If thou should'st not see me before the hour of one,
bear away for the port of Ancona, where thou wilt
get further tidings.
Stefano, who had often previously received his
instructions from the imaginary Roderigo, nodded
assent, and they parted. It is scarcely necessary
to add, that the fugitives had been fully instructed in
the conduct they were to maintain.
The gondola of Jacopo never flew faster, than
he now urged it towards the land. In the constant
passage of the boats, the movements of one were
not likely to be remarked; and he found, when he
reached the quay of the square, that his passing and
repassing had not been observed. He boldly
unmasked
and landed. It was near the hour when
he had given Don Camillo a rendezvous in the
piazza, and he walked slowly up the smaller square,
towards the appointed place of meeting.
Jacopo, as has been seen in an earlier chapter,
had a practice of walking near the columns of
granite in the first hours of the night. It was the
vulgar impression that he waited there for custom
in his bloody calling, as men of more innocent lives
take their stands in places of mark. When seen on
his customary stand, he was avoided by all who
were chary of their character, or scrupulous of
appearances
.
The persecuted and yet singularly tolerated
Bravo, was slowly pacing the flags on his way to
the appointed place, unwilling to anticipate the
moment
,
when a laquais thrust a paper into his hand,
and disappeared as fast as legs would carry him.
It has been seen that Jacopo could not read, for
that was an age when men of his class were
studiously
kept in ignorance. He turned to the first
passenger
who had the appearance of being likely to
satisfy his wishes, and desired him to do the office
of interpreter.
He had addressed an honest shop-keeper of a
distant quarter. The man took the scroll, and
good-naturedly
commenced reading its contents aloud.
I am called away, and cannot meet thee, Jacopo!
At the name of Jacopo, the tradesman dropped the
paper and fled.
The Bravo walked slowly back again, towards
the quay, ruminating on the awkward accident
which had crossed his plans; his elbow was
touched
,
and a masker confronted him when he turned.
Thou art Jacopo Frontoni? said the stranger.
None else.
Thou hast a hand to serve an employer,
faithfully
?
I keep my faith.
'Tis well,thou wilt find a hundred sequins in
this sack.
Whose life is set against this gold? asked
Jacopo
,
in an under tone.
Don Camillo Monforte.
Don Camillo Monforte!
The same: dost thou know the rich noble?
You have well described him, Signore. He
would pay his barber this for letting blood.
Do thy job thoroughly, and the price shall be
doubled.
I want the security of a name. I know you not,
Signore.
The stranger looked cautiously around him, and
raising his mask for an instant, he showed the
countenance
of Giacomo Gradenigo.
Is the pledge sufficient?
Signore, it is. When must this deed be done?
This night.Nay, this hour, even.
Shall I strike a noble of his rank in his palace
in his very pleasures?
Come hither, Jacopo, and thou shalt know more.
Hast thou a mask?
The Bravo signified his assent.
Then keep thy face behind a cloud, for it is
not in favor here, and seek thy boat. I will join
thee.
The young patrician, whose form was effectually
concealed by his attire, quitted his companion, with
a view of rejoining him anew, where his person
should not be known. Jacopo forced his boat from
among the crowd at the quay, and having entered
the open space, between the tiers, he lay on his oar,
well knowing that he was watched, and that he
would soon be followed. His conjecture was right,
for in a few moments a gondola pulled swiftly to
the side of his own, and two men in masks passed
from the strange boat into that of the Bravo,
without
speaking.
To the Lido, said a voice, which Jacopo knew
to be that of his new employer.
He was obeyed, the boat of Giacomo Gradenigo
following at a little distance. When they were
without
the tiers, and consequently beyond the danger
of being overheard, the two passengers came out of
the pavilion, and made a sign to the Bravo to cease
rowing.
Thou wilt accept the service, Jacopo
Frontoni
?
demanded the profligate heir of the old senator.
Shall I strike the noble in his pleasures,
Signore
?
It is not necessary. We have found means to
lure him from his palace, and he is now in thy
power
,
with no other hope than that which may come
from his single arm and courage. Wilt thou take
the service?
Gladly, SignoreIt is my humor to encounter
the brave.
Thou wilt be gratified. The Neapolitan has
thwarted me in myshall I call it love, Hosea; or
hast thou a better name?
Just Daniel! Signor Giacomo, you have no
respect
for reputations and surety! I see no necessity
for a home thrust, Master Jacopo; but a smart
wound, that may put matrimony out of the head of
the Duca for a time at least, and penitence into its
place, would be better
Strike to the heart! interrupted Giacomo. It
is the certainty of thy blow which has caused me
to seek thee.
This is usurious vengeance, Signor Giacomo,
returned the less resolute Jew. 'Twill be more than
sufficient for our purposes, if we cause the
Neapolitan
to keep house for a month.
Send him to his grave. Harkee, Jacopo, a
hundred for thy blowa second for insurance of
its deptha third, if the body shall be buried in the
Orfano, so that the water will never give back the
secret.
If the two first must be performed, the last will
be prudent caution, muttered the Jew, who was a
wary villain, and who greatly preferred such
secondary
expedients, as might lighten the load on his
conscience. You will not trust, young Signore, to
a smart wound?
Not a sequin. 'Twill be heating the fancy of
the girl with hopes and pity. Dost thou accept the
terms, Jacopo?
I do.
Then row to the Lido. Among the graves of
Hosea's peoplewhy dost thou pull at my skirts,
Jew! would'st thou hope to deceive a man of this
character with a flimsy lieamong the graves of
Hosea's people thou wilt meet Don Camillo, within
the hour. He is deluded by a pretended letter from
the lady of our common pursuit, and will be alone,
in the hopes of flight; I trust to thee to hasten the
latter, so far as the Neapolitan is concerned. Dost
take my meaning?
Signore, it is plain.
'Tis enough. Thou knowest me, and can take
the steps necessary for thy reward, as thou shalt
serve me. Hosea, our affair is ended.
Giacomo Gradenigo made a sign for his gondola
to approach, and dropping a sack which contained
the retainer in this bloody business, he passed into it,
with the indifference of one, who had been
accustomed
to consider such means of attaining his object
lawful. Not so Hoseahe was a rogue, rather than
a villain. The preservation of his money, with the
temptation of a large sum which had been promised
him, by both father and son, in the event of the
latter's success with Violetta, were irresistible
temptations
to one who had lived contemned by those
around him, and he found his solace for the
ruthless
attempt in the acquisition of those means of
enjoyment, which are sought equally by Christian
and Jew. Still his blood curdled, at the extremity
to which Giacomo would push the affair, and he
lingered to utter a parting word to the Bravo.
Thou art said to carry a sure stiletto, honest
Jacopo, he whispered. A hand of thy practice
must know how to maim, as well as to slay.Strike
the Neapolitan smartly, but spare his life. Even the
bearer of a public dagger like thine, may not fare
the worse, at the coming of Shilo, for having been
tender of his strength, on occasion.
Thou forgettest the gold, Hosea!
Father Abraham! what a memory am I getting,
in my years! Thou sayest truth, mindful Jacopo;
the gold shall be forthcoming, in any event
always
provided that the affair is so managed as to
leave my young friend, a successful adventurer with
the heiress.
Jacopo made an impatient gesture, for at that
moment
he saw a gondolier pulling rapidly towards a
private part of the Lido. The Hebrew joined his
companion, and the boat of the Bravo darted ahead.
It was not long ere it lay on the strand of the Lido.
The steps of Jacopo were rapid, as he moved
towards
those proscribed graves, among which he had
made his confession to the very man he was now
sent to slay.
Art thou sent to meet me? demanded one, who
started from behind a rising in the sands, but who
took the precaution to bare his rapier as he appeared.
Signor Duca, I am, returned the Bravo,
un-masking
.
Jacopo!This is even better than I had hoped!
Hast thou tidings from my bride?
Follow, Don Camillo, and you shall quickly
meet her.
Words were unnecessary to persuade, when there
was such a promise. They were both in the
gondola
of Jacopo, and on their way to one of the
passages
through the Lido, which conducts to the gulf,
before the Bravo commenced his explanation. This,
however, was quickly made, not forgetting the design
of Giacomo Gradenigo on the life of his auditor.
The felucca, which had been previously provided
with the necessary pass, by the agents of the police,
itself, had quitted the port under easy sail, by the
very inlet, through which the gondola made its way
into the Adriatic. The water was smooth, the
breeze fresh from the land, and in short all things
were favorable to the fugitives. Donna Violetta and
her governess were leaning against a mast,
watching
with impatient eyes the distant domes, and the
midnight beauty of Venice. Occasionally, strains
of music came to their ears from the canals, and
then a touch of natural melancholy crossed the
feelings
of the former, as she feared they might be the
last sounds of that nature, she should ever hear from
her native town. But unalloyed pleasure drove
every regret from her mind when Don Camillo
leaped from the gondola, and folded her in triumph
to his heart.
There was little difficulty in persuading Stefano
Milano to abandon, for ever, the service of the
senate
,
for that of his feudal lord. The promises and
commands of the latter were sufficient of themselves
to reconcile him to the change, and all were
convinced
there was no time to lose. The felucca soon
spread her canvas to the wind, and slid away from
the beach. Jacopo permitted his gondola to be
towed a league to sea, before he prepared to
reenter
it.
You will steer for Ancona, Signor Don Camillo,
said the Bravo, leaning on the felucca's side, still
unwilling to depart, and throw yourself, at once,
under the protection of the Cardinal Secretary. If
Stefano keep the sea, he may chance meet the galleys
of the senate.
Distrust us notbut thou, my excellent Jacopo
what wilt thou become, in their hands?
Fear not for me, Signore. God disposes of all,
as he sees fit. I have told your eccellenza that I
cannot yet quit Venice. If fortune favor me, I may
still see your stout castle of Sant' Agata.
And none will be more welcome, within its secure
walls; I have much fear for thee, Jacopo!
Signore, think not of it. I am used to danger
and to miseryand to hopelessness. I have known
a pleasure, this night, in witnessing the happiness of
two young hearts, that God, in his anger, has long
denied me. Lady, the Saints keep you, and God,
who is above all, shield you from harm!
He kissed the hand of Donna Violetta, who, half
ignorant still of his services, listened to his words,
in wonder.
Don Camillo Monforte, he continued, distrust
Venice to your dying day. Let no promisesno
hopesno desire of increasing your honors, or your
riches, ever tempt you to put yourself in her power.
None know the falsehood of the state, better than I,
and with my parting words I warn you to be wary!
Thou speakest as if we were to meet no more,
worthy Jacopo!
The Bravo turned, and the action brought his
features to the moon. There was a melancholy
smile, in which deep satisfaction at the success of
Vol. II. O
the lovers was mingled with serious forebodings for
himself.
We are certain only of the past, he said, in a
low voice.
Touching the hand of Don Camillo, he kissed his
own and leaped hastily into his gondola. The fast
was thrown loose, and the felucca glided away,
leaving
this extraordinary being, alone, in the waters.
The Neapolitan ran to the taffrail, and the last he
saw of Jacopo, the Bravo was rowing leisurely back
towards that scene of violence and deception, from
which he himself was so glad to have escaped.
CHAPTER X.
My limbs are bow'd, though not with toil,
But rusted with a vile repose,
For they have been a dungeon's spoil,
And mine hath been the fate of those
To whom the goodly earth and air
Are bann'd, and barr'dforbidden fare.
Prisoner of Chillon
.
When
the day dawned on the following morning,
the square of St. Mark was empty. The priests still
chanted their prayers for the dead, near the body
of old Antonio, and a few fishermen still lingered
in and near the cathedral but half persuaded of the
manner in which their companion had come to his
end. But, as was usual at that hour of the day, the
city appeared tranquil, for though a slight alarm had
passed through the canals, at the movement of the
rioters, it had subsided in that specious and
distrustful
quiet, which is, more or less, the unavoidable
consequence of a system that is not substantially
based on the willing support of the mass.
Jacopo was again in the attic of the doge's
palace, accompanied by the gentle Gelsomina. As
they threaded the windings of the building, he
recounted
to the eager ear of his companion, all the
details connected with the escape of the lovers;
omitting, as a matter of prudence, the attempt of
Giacomo Gradenigo on the life of Don Camillo.
The unpractised and single-hearted girl heard him
in breathless attention, the color of her cheek, and
the changeful eye, betraying the force of her
sympathies
,
at each turn in their hazardous adventure.
And dost thou think they can yet escape from
those up above? murmured Gelsomina, for few in
Venice would trust their voices, by putting such a
question aloud. Thou knowest the republic hath,
at all times, its galleys in the Adriatic!
We have had thought of that, and the Calabrian
is advised to steer for the mole of Ancona. Once
within the States of the Church, the influence of
Don Camillo and the rights of his noble wife will
protect them. Is there a place here, whence we
can look out upon the sea?
Gelsomina led the Bravo into an empty room of
the attic which commanded a view of the port, the
Lido, and the waste of water beyond. The breeze
came in strong currents, over the roofs of the
town, and causing the masts of the port to rock, it
lighted on the Lagunes, without the tiers of the
shipping. From this point, to the barrier of sand,
it was apparent, by the stooping sails and the
struggles
of the gondoliers who pulled towards the quay,
that the air was swift. Without the Lido, itself, the
element was shadowed and fitful, while farther in
the distance, the troubled waters, with their crests
of foam, sufficiently proved its power.
Santa Maria be praised! exclaimed Jacopo,
when his understanding eye had run over the near
and distant viewthey are already far down the
coast, and with a wind like this they cannot fail to
reach their haven, in a few hours.Let us go to
the cell.
Gelsomina smiled, when he assured her of the
safety of the fugitives, but her look saddened when
he changed the discourse. Without reply,
however
,
she did as he desired, and in a very few
moments
they were standing by the side of the
prisoner's
pallet. The latter did not appear to observe
their entrance, and Jacopo was obliged to announce
himself.
Father! he said, with that melancholy pathos
which always crept into his voice when he
addressed
the old man, it is I.
The prisoner turned, and though evidently much
enfeebled, since the last visit, a wan smile gleamed
on his wasted features.
And thy mother, boy? he asked, so eagerly as
to cause Gelsomina to turn hastily aside.
Happy, fatherhappy!
Happy without me?
She is ever with thee, in spirit, father. She
thinks of thee in her prayers. Thou hast a saint
for an intercessor, in my motherfather.
And thy good sister?
Happy toodoubt it not, father. They are
both patient and resigned.
The senate, boy?
Is the same: soulless, selfish, and pretending!
answered Jacopo sternly; then turning away his
face, in bitterness of heart, though without
permitting
the words to be audible, he cursed them.
The noble Signori were deceived in believing
me concerned in the attempt to rob their revenues,
returned the patient old man; one day they will
see and acknowledge their error.
Jacopo made no answer, for, unlettered as he
was, and curtailed of that knowledge which should
be, and is, bestowed on all, by every paternal
government
,
the natural strength of his mind had
enabled
him to understand, that a system, which on its
face professed to be founded on the superior
acquirements
of a privileged few, would be the least
likely to admit the fallacy of its theories, by
confessing
it could err.
Thou dost the nobles injustice, son; they are
illustrious
patricians, and have no motive in
oppressing
one like me.
None, father, but the necessity of maintaining
the severity of the laws, which make them senators
and you a prisoner.
Nay, boy, I have known worthy gentlemen of
the senate! There was the late signor Tiepolo,
who did me much favor in my youth. But for this
false accusation, I might now have been one of
the most thriving of my craft in Venice.
Father, we will pray for the soul of the
Tiepolo
.
Is the senator dead?
So says a gorgeous tomb in the church of the
Redentore.
We must all die at last, whispered the old man,
crossing himself. Doge as well as patrician
patrician as well as gondolier.Jaco
Father! exclaimed the Bravo, so suddenly as
to interrupt the coming word, then kneeling by the
pallet of the prisoner he whispered in his ear, thou
forgettest there is reason why thou should'st not
call me by that name. I have told thee, often, that
if thus called, my visits must stop.
The prisoner looked bewildered, for the failing
of nature rendered that obscure which was once so
evident to his mind. After gazing long at his son,
O 2
his eye wandered between him and the wall, and
he smiled childishly.
Wilt thou look, good boy, if the spider is come
back?
Jacopo groaned, but he rose to comply.
I do not see it, father; the season is not yet
warm.
Not warm! my veins feel heated to bursting.
Thou forgettest this is the attic, and that these are
the leads, and then the sunoh! the sun! The
illustrious
senators do not bethink them of the pain
of passing the bleak winter below the canals, and
the burning summers beneath hot metal.
They think of nothing but their power,
murmured
Jacopothat which is wrongfully
obtained
,
must be maintained by merciless injusticebut
why should we speak of this, father; hast thou all
thy body needs?
Airson, air!give me of that air, which God
has made for the meanest living thing.
The Bravo rushed towards those fissures in the
venerable but polluted pile, he had already striven
to open, and with frantic force he endeavored to
widen them with his hands. The material resisted,
though blood flowed from the ends of his fingers, in
the desperate effort.
The door, Gelsomina, open wide the door! he
cried, turning away from the spot, exhausted with
his fruitless exertions.
Nay, I do not suffer now, my childit is when
thou hast left me, and when I am alone with my
own thoughts, when I see thy weeping mother and
neglected sister, that I most feel the want of air
are we not in the fervid month of August, son?
Father, it is not yet June.
I shall then have more heat to bear! God's will
be done, and blessed Santa Maria, his mother
undefiled
!give
me strength to endure it.
The eye of Jacopo gleamed with a wildness,
scarcely less frightful than the ghastly look of the
old man, his chest heaved, his fingers were
clenched
,
and his breathing was audible.
No, he said, in a low, but in so determined a
voice, as to prove how fiercely his resolution was
set, thou shalt not await their torments: arise,
father, and go with me. The doors are open, the
ways of the palace are known to me, in the darkest
night, and the keys are at hand. I will find means
to conceal thee until dark, and we will quit the
accursed
republic for ever.
Hope gleamed in the eye of the old captive, as
he listened to this frantic proposal, but distrust of
the means immediately altered its expression.
Thou forgettest those up above, son.
I think only of One truly above, father.
And this girlhow canst thou hope to deceive
her?
She will take thy placeshe is with us in heart,
and will lend herself to a seeming violence. I do
not promise for thee, idly, kindest Gelsomina?
The frightened girl, who had never before
witnessed
so plain evidence of desperation in her
companion
,
had sunk upon an article of furniture,
speechless
.
The look of the prisoner changed from one
to the other, and he made an effort to rise, but
debility
caused him to fall backward, and not till then,
did Jacopo perceive the impracticability, on many
accounts, of what, in a moment of excitement, he
had proposed. A long silence followed. The hard
breathing of Jacopo gradually subsided, and the
expression
of his face changed to its customary,
settled
,
and collected look.
Father, he said, I must quit thee; our misery
draws near a close.
Thou wilt come to me soon again?
If the saints permitthy blessing, father.
The old man folded his hands above the head
of Jacopo, and murmured a prayer. When this
pious duty was performed, both the Bravo and
Gelsomina
busied themselves, a little time, in
contributing
to the bodily comforts of the prisoner, and
then they departed in company.
Jacopo appeared unwilling to quit the vicinity of
the cell. A melancholy presentiment seemed to
possess his mind, that these stolen visits were soon
to cease. After a little delay, however, they
descended
to the apartments below, and as Jacopo
desired to quit the palace, without re-entering the
prisons, Gelsomina prepared to let him out by the
principal corridor.
Thou art sadder than common, Carlo, she
observed
,
watching with feminine assiduity his
averted
eye. Methinks thou should'st rejoice in the
fortunes of the Neapolitan, and of the lady of the
Tiepolo.
That escape is like a gleam of sunshine, in a
wintry day. Good girlbut we are observed!
why is yon spy on our movements?
'Tis a menial of the palace; they constantly
cross us in this part of the building: come hither, if
thou art weary. The room is little used, and we
may again look out upon the sea.
Jacopo followed his mild conductor into one of
the neglected closets of the second floor, where, in
truth, he was glad to catch a glimpse of the state
of things in the piazza, before he left the palace.
His first look was at the water, which was still
rolling southward, before the gale from the Alps.
Satisfied with this prospect, he bent his eye beneath.
At the instant, an officer of the republic issued from
the palace gate, preceded by a trumpeter, as was
usual, when there was occasion to make public
proclamation
of the senate's will. Gelsomina opened
the casement, and both leaned forward to listen.
When the little procession had reached the front of
the cathedral, the trumpet sounded, and the voice of
the officer was heard.
Whereas many wicked and ruthless
assassinations
have of late been committed on the persons of
divers good citizens of Venice,he proclaimed
the senate, in its fatherly care of all whom it is
charged to protect, has found reason to resort to
extraordinary means of preventing the repetition of
crimes so contrary to the laws of God and the
security
of society. The Illustrious Ten therefore offer,
thus publicly, a reward of one hundred sequins to
him who shall discover the perpetrator of any of
these most horrible assassinations; and, whereas,
during the past night, the body of a certain Antonio,
a well-known fisherman, and a worthy citizen, much
esteemed by the patricians, has been found in the
Lagunes, and, whereas, there is but too much reason
to believe that he has come to his death by the hands
of a certain Jacopo Frontoni, who has the reputation
of a common Bravo, but who has been long
watched
,
in vain, by the authorities, with the hope of
detecting
him in the commission of some one of the
aforesaid horrible assassinations; now, all good and
honest citizens of the republic are enjoined to assist
the authorities in seizing the person of the said
Jacopo
Frontoni, even though he should take
sanctuary
:
for Venice can no longer endure the presence
of one of his sanguinary habits, and for the
encouragement
of the same, the senate, in its paternal care,
offers the reward of three hundred sequins. The
usual words of prayer and sovereignty closed the
proclamation.
As it was not usual for those who ruled so much
in the dark, to make their intentions public, all near
listened, with wonder and awe, to the novel
procedure
.
Some trembled, lest the mysterious and
much-dreaded power was about to exhibit itself;
while most found means of making their admiration
of the fatherly interest of their rulers audible.
None heard the words of the officer with more
feeling than Gelsomina. She bent her body far
from the window, in order that not a syllable should
escape her.
Did'st thou hear, Carlo? demanded the eager
girl, as she drew back her head; they proclaim, at
last, money for the monster who has committed so
many murders!
Jacopo laughed; but to the ears of his startled
companion the sounds were unnatural.
The patricians are just, and what they do is
right, he said. They are of illustrious birth, and
cannot err! They will do their duty.
But here is no other duty than that they owe to
God, and to the people.
I have heard of the duty of the people, but little
is said of the senate's.
Nay, Carlo, we will not refuse them credit when
in truth they seek to keep the citizens from harm.
This Jacopo is a monster, detested by all, and his
bloody deeds have too long been a reproach to
Venice. Thou hearest that the patricians are not
niggard of their gold, when there is hope of his being
taken.Listen! they proclaim again!
The trumpet sounded, and the proclamation was
repeated between the granite columns of the Piazzetta,
and quite near to the window occupied by Gelsomina
and her unmoved companion.
Why dost thou mask, Carlo? she asked, when
the officer had done; it is not usual to be disguised,
in the palace, at this hour.
They will believe it the doge, blushing to be an
auditor of his own liberal justice, or they may
mistake
me for one of the Three, itself.
They go by the quay to the arsenal; thence they
will take boat, as is customary, for the Rialto.
Thereby giving this redoubtable Jacopo timely
notice to secrete himself! Your judges up above are
mysterious when they should be open, and open when
they should be secret. I must quit thee, Gelsomina;
go, then, back to the room of thy father, and leave
me to pass out by the court of the palace.
It may not be, Carlothou knowest the
permission
of the authoritiesI have exceededwhy should
I wish to conceal it from theebut, it was not
permitted
to thee to enter at this hour.
And thou hast had the courage to transgress the
leave, for my sake, Gelsomina?
The abashed girl hung her head, and the color
which glowed about her temples was like the rosy
light of her own Italy.
Thou would'st have it so, she said.
A thousand thanks, dearest, kindest, truest
Gelsomina
;
but doubt not my being able to leave the
palace unseen. The danger was in entering. They
who go forth, do it with the air of having authority.
None pass the halberdiers masked by day, Carlo,
but they who have the secret word.
The Bravo appeared struck with this truth, and
there was great embarrassment expressed in his
manner. The terms of his admittance were so well
understood to himself, that he distrusted the
expediency
of attempting to get upon the quays by the
prison, the way he had entered, since he had little
doubt that his retreat would be intercepted by those
who kept the outer gate, and who were probably, by
this time, in the secret of his true character. It now
appeared that egress by the other route was equally
hazardous. He had not been surprised so much by
the substance of the proclamation, as by the publicity
the senate had seen fit to give to its policy,and he
had heard himself denounced, with a severe pang,
it is true, but without terror. Still he had so many
means of disguise, and the practice of personal
concealment
was so general in Venice, that he had
entertained
no great distrust of the result until he now
found himself in this awkward dilemma. Gelsomina
read his indecision in his eye, and regretted that she
should have caused him so much uneasiness.
It is not so bad as thou seemest to think, Carlo,
she observed; they have permitted thee to visit thy
father, at stated hours, and the permission is a proof
that the senate is not without pity. Now that I, to
oblige thy wishes, have forgotten one of their
injunctions
,
they will not be so hard of heart as to
visit the fault as a crime.
Jacopo gazed at her with pity, for well did he
understand how little she knew of the real nature
and wily policy of the state.
It is time that we should part, he said, lest
thy innocence should be made to pay the price of
my mistake. I am now near the public corridor,
and must trust to my fortune to gain the quay.
Gelsomina hung upon his arm, unwilling to trust
him to his own guidance in that fearful building.
It will not do, Carlo; thou wilt stumble on a
soldier, and thy fault will be known; perhaps they
will refuse to let thee come again; perhaps
altogether
shut the door of thy poor father's cell.
Jacopo made a gesture for her to lead the way,
and followed. With a beating but still lightened
heart, Gelsomina glided along the passages,
carefully
locking each door, as of wont, behind her,
when she had passed through it. At length they
reached the well-known Bridge of Sighs. The
anxious girl went on with a lighter step, when she
found herself approaching her own abode, for she
was busy in planning the means of concealing her
companion in her father's rooms, should there be
hazard in his passing out of the prison during the
day.
But a single minute, Carlo, she whispered,
applying
the key to the door which opened into the
latter buildingthe lock yielded, but the hinges
refused
to turn. Gelsomina paled as she added
They have drawn the bolts within!
No matter; I will go down by the court of the
palace, and boldly pass the halberdier unmasked.
Gelsomina, after all, saw but little risk of his
being
known by the mercenaries who served the doge,
and, anxious to relieve him from so awkward a
position
,
she flew back to the other end of the
gallery
.
Another key was applied to the door by which
they had just entered, with the same result.
Gelsomina
staggered back, and sought support against
the wall.
We can neither return nor proceed! she
exclaimed
,
frightened she knew not why.
I see it all, answered Jacopo, we are
prisoners
on the fatal bridge.
As he spoke, the Bravo calmly removed his mask,
and showed the countenance of a man whose
resolution
was at its height.
Santa Madre di Dio! what can it mean?
That we have passed here once too often, love.
The council is tender of these visits.
The bolts of both doors grated, and the hinges
creaked at the same instant. An officer of the
inquisition
entered armed, and bearing manacles.
Gelsomina
shrieked, but Jacopo moved not limb or
muscle, while he was fettered and chained.
I too! cried his frantic companion. I am the
most guiltybind mecast me into a cell, but let
poor Carlo go.
Carlo! echoed an officer, laughing unfeelingly.
Is it such a crime to seek a father in his prison!
They knew of his visitsthey permitted themhe
has only mistaken the hour.
Girl, dost thou know for whom thou pleadest?
For the kindest heartthe most faithful son in
Vol. II. P
Venice! Oh! if ye had seen him weep as I have
done, over the sufferings of the old captiveif ye
had seen his very form shivering in agony, ye would
have pity on him!
Listen; returned the officer, raising a finger
for attention.
The trumpeter sounded on the bridge of St.
Mark, immediately beneath them, and proclamation
was again made, offering gold for the arrest of the
Bravo.
'Tis the officer of the republic, bidding for the
head of one who carries a common stiletto, cried
the half-breathless Gelsomina, who little heeded the
ceremony at that instant; he merits his fate.
Then why resist it?
Ye speak without meaning!
Doting girl, this is Jacopo Frontoni!
Gelsomina would have disbelieved her ears, but
for the anguished expression of Jacopo's eye. The
horrible truth burst upon her mind, and she fell
lifeless
.
At that moment the Bravo was hurried from
the bridge.
CHAPTER XI.
Let us lift up the curtain, and observe
What passes in that chamber.
Rogers
.
There
were many rumors, uttered in the fearful
and secret manner which characterized the
manners
of the town, in the streets of Venice that day.
Hundreds passed near the granite columns, as if
they expected to see the Bravo occupying his
accustomed
stand, in audacious defiance of the
proclamation
,
for so long and so mysteriously, had he
been permitted to appear in public, that men had
difficulty in persuading themselves he would quit
his habits so easily. It is needless to say that the
vague expectation was disappointed. Much was
also said, vauntingly, in behalf of the republic's
justice
,
for the humbled are bold enough in praising
their superiors; and he, who had been dumb for
years, on subjects of a public nature, now found his
voice like a fearless freeman.
But the day passed away without any new
occurrence
to call the citizens from their pursuits.
The prayers for the dead were continued, with
little
intermission, and masses were said before the
altars of half the churches, for the repose of the
fisherman's soul. His comrades, a little distrustful,
but greatly gratified, watched the ceremonies with
jealousy and exultation singularly blended. Ere
the night set in, again, they were among the most
obedient of those the oligarchy habitually trod upon;
for such is the effect of this species of domination,
that it acquires a power to appease, by its flattery,
the very discontents, created by its injustice. Such
is the human mind: a factitious but deeply-seated
sentiment of respect is created by the habit of
submission
,
which gives the subject of its influence a
feeling of atonement, when he who has long played
the superior comes down from his stilts, and
confesses
the community of human frailties!
The square of St. Mark filled at the usual hour,
the patricians deserted the Broglio as of wont, and
the gaities of the place were again uppermost,
before
the clock had struck the second hour of the
night. Gondolas, filled with noble dames, appeared
on the canals; the blinds of the palaces were raised
for the admission of the sea-breeze;and music
began to be heard in the port, on the bridges, and
under the balconies of the fair. The course of
society
was not to be arrested, merely because the
wronged were unavenged, or the innocent suffered.
There stood, then, on the grand canal, as there
stand now, many palaces of scarcely less than royal
magnificence. The reader has had occasion to
become
acquainted with one or two of these splendid
edifices, and it has now become our duty to convey
him, in imagination, to another.
The peculiarity of construction, which is a
consequence
of the watery site of Venice, gives the
same general character to all the superior dwellings
of that remarkable town. The house to which the
thread of the narrative now leads us, had its
water-gate
,
its vestibule, its massive marble stairs, its
inner court, its magnificent suites of rooms above,
its pictures, its lustres, and its floors of precious
stones embedded in composition, like all those which
we have already found it necessary to describe.
The hour was ten, according to our own manner
of computing time. A small, but lovely family
picture
presented itself, deep within the walls of the
patrician abode, to which we have alluded. There
was a father, a gentleman who had scarce attained
the middle age, with an eye in which spirit,
intelligence
,
philanthropy, and, at that moment, paternal
fondness were equally glowing. He tossed in his
arms, with parental pride, a laughing urchin of
some three or four years, who rioted in the
amusement
which brought him, and the author of his
being
,
for a time, seemingly on a level. A fair
Venetian
dame, with golden locks, and glowing cheeks,
such as Titian loved to paint her sex, reclined on a
couch nigh by, following the movements of both,
with the joint feelings of mother and wife, and
laughing in pure sympathy with the noisy
merriment
of her young hope. A girl, who was the
youthful image of herself, with tresses that fell to
her waist, romped with a crowing infant, whose
age was so tender as scarcely to admit the
uncertain
evidence of its intelligence. Such was the
scene as the clock of the piazza told the hour.
Struck with the sound, the father set down the boy,
and consulted his watch.
Dost thou use thy gondola to-night, love? he
demanded.
With thee, Paolo?
Not with me, dearest; I have affairs which will
employ me until twelve!
Nay, thou art given to cast me off, when thy
caprices are wayward.
Say not so. I have named to-night for an
interview
with my agent, and I know thy maternal
heart too well, to doubt thy being willing to spare
me for that time, while I look to the interests of
these dear ones.
The Donna Giulietta rang for her mantle and
attendants
.
The crowing infant and the noisy boy
were dismissed to their beds, while the lady and the
eldest child descended to the gondola. Donna
Giulietta
was not permitted to go unattended to her
boat, for this was a family in which the inclinations
had fortunately seconded the ordinary calculations
of interest, when the nuptial knot was tied. Her
husband kissed her hand, fondly, as he assisted her
into the gondola, and the boat had glided some
distance
from the palace, ere he quitted the moist
stones of the water-gate.
Hast thou prepared the cabinet for my friends?
demanded the Signor Soranzo, for it was the same
senator who had been in company with the doge,
when the latter went to meet the fishermen.
Signore, si.
And the quiet, and the lightsas ordered?
Eccellenza, all will be done.
Thou hast placed seats for sixwe shall be
six.
Signore, there are six armed chairs.
'Tis well: when the first of my friends arrive,
I will join them
Eccellenza, there are already two cavaliers in
masks, within.
The Signor Soranzo started, again consulted his
watch, and went hastily towards a distant, and very
silent, part of the palace. He reached a small door
unattended, and, closing it, found himself at once
in the presence of those who evidently awaited his
appearance.
A thousand pardons, Signori, cried the master
of the house; this is novel duty to me, at least
I know not what may be your honorable
experience
and
the time stole upon me unmarked. I
pray for grace, Messires; future diligence shall
repair
the present neglect.
Both the visitors were older men than their host,
and it was quite evident by their hardened visages
they were of much longer practice in the world.
His excuses were received with courtesy, and, for
a little time, the discourse was entirely of usage and
convention.
We are in secret here, Signore? asked one of
the guests, after some little time had been wasted in
this manner.
As the tomb. None enter here unbidden, but
for my wife, and she has, this moment, taken boat, for
better enjoyment of the evening.
The world gives you credit, Signor Soranzo,
for a happy mnage. I hope you have duly
considered
the necessity of shutting the door, even against
the Donna Giulietta to-night?
Doubt me not, Signore; the affairs of St. Mark
are paramount.
I feel myself thrice happy, Signori, that in
drawing
a lot for the secret council, my good fortune
hath given me so excellent colleagues. Believe me,
I have discharged this awful trust, in my day, in
less agreeable company.
This flattering speech, which the wily old senator
had made regularly to all with whom chance had
associated him in the inquisition, during a long life,
was well received, and it was returned with equal
compliments.
It would appear that the worthy Signor
Alessandro
Gradenigo was one of our predecessors, he
continued, looking at some papers; for though the
actual three were unknown, at the time being, to all,
but a few secretaries and officers of the state,
Venetian
policy transmitted their names to their
successors
,
as a matter of course,a noble
gentleman
,
and one of great devotion to the state!
The others assented, like men accustomed to speak
with caution.
We were about to have entered on our duties
at a troublesome moment, Signori, observed
another
.
But it would seem that this tumult of the
fishermen has already subsided. I understand the
knaves had some reason for their distrust of the
state!
It is an affair happily settled, answered the
senior of the three, who was long practised in the
expediency of forgetting all that policy required
should cease to be remembered, after the object was
attained. The galleys must be manned, else would
St. Mark quickly hang his head in shame.
The Signor Soranzo, who had received some
previous instruction in his new duties, looked
melancholy
;
but he, too, was merely the creature of a
system.
Is there matter of pressing import for our
reflection
?
he demanded.
Signori, there is every reason to believe that the
state has just sustained a grievous loss. Ye both
well know the heiress of Tiepolo, by reputation at
least, though her retired manner of life may have
kept you from her company.
Donna Giulietta is eloquent in praise of her
beauty
;
said the young husband.
We had not a better fortune in Venice, rejoined
the third inquisitor.
Excellent in qualities, and better in riches, as
she is, I fear we have lost her, Signori! Don
Camillo
Monforte, whom God protect until we have no
future use for his influence! had come near to
prevail
against us; but just as the state baffled his
well-laid
schemes, the lady has been thrown by hazard
into the hands of the rioters, since which time there
is no account of her movements!
Paolo Soranzo secretly hoped she was in the
arms of the Neapolitan.
A secretary has communicated to me the
disappearance
of the Duca di Sant' Agata, also,
observed
the third,nor is the felucca, usually
employed
in distant and delicate missions, any longer
at her anchors.
The two old men regarded each other, as if the
truth was beginning to dawn upon their suspicions.
They saw that the case was hopeless, and as theirs
was altogether a practical duty, no time was lost in
useless regrets.
We have two affairs which press, observed the
elder.The body of the old fisherman must be
laid quietly in the earth, with as little risk of future
tumult, as may beand we have this notorious
Jacopo
to dispose of.
The latter must first be taken; said the Signor
Soranzo.
That has been done already. Would you think
it, Sirs! he was seized in the very palace of the
doge!
To the block with him, without delay!
The old men again looked at each other, and it
was quite apparent that, as both of them had been
in previous councils, they had a secret intelligence,
to which their companion was yet a stranger.
There was also visible in their glances, something
like a design to manage his feelings, before they
came more openly to the graver practices of their
duties.
For the sake of blessed St. Mark, Signori, let
justice be done openly in this instance! continued
the unsuspecting member of the Three. What
pity can the bearer of a common stiletto claim? and
what more lovely exercise of our authority than to
make public an act of severe and much-required
justice?
The old senators bowed to this sentiment of their
colleague, which was uttered with the fervor of
young experience, and the frankness of an upright
mind; for there is a conventional acquiescence in
received morals, which is permitted, in semblance at
least, to adorn the most tortuous.
It may be well, Signore Soranzo, to do this
homage to the right, returned the elder. Here
have been sundry charges found in different lions'
mouths, against the Neapolitan, Signor Don Camillo
Monforte. I leave it to your wisdom, my illustrious
colleagues, to decide on their character.
An excess of malice betrays its own origin,
exclaimed the least-practised member of the
Inquisition
.
My life on it, Signori, these accusations
come of private spleen, and are unworthy of the
state's attention. I have consorted much with the
young lord of Sant' Agata, and a more worthy
gentleman
does not dwell among us.
Still hath he designs on the hand of old Tiepolo's
daughter!
Is it a crime in youth to seek beauty? He did
great service to the lady, in her need, and that youth
should feel these sympathies is nothing strange.
Venice hath her sympathies, as well as the
youngest of us all, Signore.
But Venice cannot wed the heiress!
True. St. Mark must be satisfied with playing
the prudent father's part. You are yet young,
Signore
Soranzo, and the Donna Giulietta is of rare
beauty! As life wears upon ye both, ye will see the
fortunes of kingdoms, as well as families, differently.
But we waste our breath uselessly in this matter,
since our agents have not yet reported their success
in the pursuit. The most pressing affair, just now,
is the disposition of the Bravo. Hath his highness
shown you the letter of the sovereign pontiff, in the
question of the intercepted dispatches, Signore?
He hath. A fair answer was returned by our
predecessors, and it must rest there.
We will then look freely into the matter of
Jacopo Frontoni. There will be necessity of our
assembling in the chamber of the Inquisition, that
we may have the prisoner confronted to his accusers.
'Tis a grave trial, Signori, and Venice would lose in
men's estimation, were not the highest tribunal to
take an interest in its decision.
To the block with the villain! again exclaimed
the Signor Soranzo.
He may haply meet with that fate, or even with
the punishment of the wheel. A mature
examination
will enlighten us much on the course, which
policy may dictate.
There can be but one policy when the protection
of the lives of our citizens is in question. I have
never before felt impatience to shorten the life of
man, but in this trial I can scarce brook delay.
Your honorable impatience shall be gratified,
Signor Soranzo; for, foreseeing the urgency of the
case, my colleague, the worthy senator, who is
joined
with us in this high duty, and myself, have already
issued the commands necessary to that object. The
hour is near, and we will repair to the chamber of
the Inquisition in time to our duty.
The discourse then turned on subjects of a more
general concern. This secret and extraordinary
tribunal, which was obliged to confine its meetings
to no particular place, which could decide on its
decrees equally in the Piazza, or the palace, amidst
the revelries of the masquerade, or before the altar;
in the assemblies of the gay, or in their own closets,
had of necessity much ordinary matter submitted to
its inspection. As the chances of birth entered into
its original composition,and God hath not made
all alike fit for so heartless a duty,it sometimes
happened, as in the present instance, that the more
worldly of its members had to overcome the
generous
disposition of a colleague, before the action of
the terrible machine could go on.
It is worthy of remark, that communities always
establish a higher standard of justice and truth, than
is exercised by their individual members. The
reason
is not to be sought for, since nature hath left to
all a perception of that right, which is abandoned
only under the stronger impulses of personal
temptation
.
We commend the virtue we cannot imitate.
Thus it is that those countries, in which public opinion
has most influence, are always of the purest public
practice. It follows as a corollary from this
proposition
,
that a representation should be as real as
possible
,
for its tendency will be inevitably to elevate
national morals. Miserable, indeed, is the condition
of that people, whose maxims and measures of public
policy are below the standard of its private
integrity
,
for the fact not only proves it is not the master
of its own destinies, but the still more dangerous
truth, that the collective power is employed in the
fatal service of undermining those very qualities
which are necessary to virtue, and which have
enough to do, at all times, in resisting the attacks of
immediate selfishness. A strict legal representation
of all its interests is far more necessary to a worldly
than to a simple people, since responsibility, which
is the essence of a free government, is more likely
to keep the agents of a nation near to its own
standard
of virtue than any other means. The common
opinion that a republic cannot exist, without an
extraordinary
degree of virtue in its citizens, is so
flattering
to our own actual condition, that we seldom
take the trouble to inquire into its truth; but, to us,
it seems quite apparent that effect is here mistaken
for the cause. It is said, as the people are virtually
masters in a republic, that the people ought to be
virtuous to rule well. So far as this proposition is
confined to degrees, it is just as true of a republic as
of any other form of government. But kings do
rule, and surely all have not been virtuous; and that
aristocracies have ruled with the very minimum of
that quality, the subject of our tale sufficiently shows.
That, other things being equal, the citizens of a
republic
will have a higher standard of private virtue
than the subjects of any other form of government,
is true as an effect, we can readily believe, for
responsibility
to public opinion existing in all the
branches of its administration, that conventional
morality, which characterizes the common
sentiment
,
will be left to act on the mass, and will not be
perverted into a terrible engine of corruption, as is
the case when factitious institutions give a false
direction to its influence.
The case before us was in proof of the truth of
what has here been said. The Signor Soranzo
was a man of great natural excellence of
character
,
and the charities of his domestic circle had
assisted
in confirming his original dispositions. Like
others of his rank and expectations, he had, from
time to time, made the history and polity of the
self-styled republic his study, and the power of
collective
interests and specious necessities had made
him admit sundry theories, which, presented in
another
form, he would have repulsed with
indignation
.
Still the Signor Soranzo was far from
understanding
the full effects of that system, which he
was born to uphold. Even Venice paid that homage
to public opinion, of which there has just been
question
,
and held forth to the world but a false picture
of her true state maxims. Still many of those which
were too apparent to be concealed were difficult
of acceptance, with one whose mind was yet
untainted
with practice; and the young senator rather
shut his eyes on their tendency, or, as he felt their
influence in every interest which environed him,
but that of poor, neglected, abstract virtue, whose
rewards were so remote, he was fain to seek out
some palliative, or some specious and indirect good
as the excuse for his acquiescence.
In this state of mind the Signor Soranzo was
unexpectedly
admitted a member of the Council of
Three. Often, in the day-dreams of his youth, had
he contemplated the possession of this very
irresponsible
power as the consummation of his wishes.
A thousand pictures of the good he would perform
had crossed his brain, and it was only as he
advanced
in life, and came to have a near view of the
wiles which beset the best-intentioned, that he could
bring himself to believe most of that which he
meditated
was impracticable. As it was, he entered
into the council with doubts and misgivings. Had
he lived in a later age, under his own system
modified
by the knowledge which has been a
consequence
of the art of printing, it is probable that the
Signor Soranzo would have been a noble in
opposition
,
now supporting with ardor some measure of
public benevolence, and now yielding, gracefully, to
the suggestions of a sterner policy, and always
influenced
by the positive advantages he was born to
Vol. II. Q
possess, though scarcely conscious himself he was
not all he professed to be. The fault, however, was
not so much that of the patrician as that of
circumstances
,
which, by placing interest in opposition to
duty, lures many a benevolent mind into still greater
weaknesses.
The companions of the Signor Soranzo,
however
,
had a more difficult task to prepare him for
the duties of the statesman, which were so very
different from those he was accustomed to perform
as a man, than they had anticipated. They were
like two trained elephants of the east, possessing
themselves all the finer instincts and generous
qualities
of the noble animal, but disciplined by a force
quite foreign to their natural condition into
creatures
of mere convention, placed one on each side
of a younger brother, fresh from the plains, and
whom it was their duty to teach new services for
the trunk, new affections, and haply the manner in
which to carry, with dignity, the howdah of a
Rajah.
With many allusions to their policy, but with no
direct intimation of their own intention, the seniors
of the council continued the conversation, until the
hour for the meeting in the doge's palace drew
nigh. They then separated, as privately as they
had come together, in order that no vulgar eye
might penetrate the mystery of their official
character
.
The most practised of the three appeared in an
assembly of the patricians, which noble and
beautiful
dames graced with their presence, from which
he disappeared in a manner to leave no clue to his
motions. The other visited the death-bed of a
friend, where he discoursed long and well, with a
friar, of the immortality of the soul and the hopes
of a Christian: when he departed, the godly man
bestowing his blessing, and the family he left being
loud and eloquent in his praise.
The Signor Soranzo clung to the enjoyments of
his own family circle until the last moment. The
Donna Giulietta had returned, fresher and more
lovely than ever, from the invigorating sea-breeze,
and her soft voice, with the melodious laugh of his
first-born, the blooming, ringlet-covered girl
described
,
still rang in his ears, when his gondolier
landed him beneath the bridge of the Rialto. Here
he masked, and drawing his cloak about him, he
moved with the current towards the square of St.
Mark, by means of the narrow streets. Once in
the crowd, there was little danger of impertinent
observation. Disguise was as often useful to the
oligarchy of Venice, as it was absolutely necessary
to elude its despotism, and to render the town
tolerable
to the citizen. Paolo saw swarthy,
bare-legged
men of the Lagunes entering occasionally
into the cathedral. He followed, and found
himself
standing near the dimly-lighted altar, at which
masses were still saying for the soul of Antonio.
This is one of thy fellows? he asked of a
fisherman
,
whose dark eye glittered in that light, like
the organ of a basilisk.
Signore, he wasa more honest, or a more
just man, did not cast his net in the gulf.
He has fallen a victim to his craft?
Cospetto di Bacco! none know in what manner
he came by his end. Some say St. Mark was
impatient
to see him in paradise, and some pretend,
he has fallen by the hand of a common Bravo,
named Jacopo Frontoni.
Why should a Bravo take the life of one like
this?
By having the goodness to answer your own
question, Signore, you will spare me some trouble.
Why should he, sure enough? They say Jacopo is
revengeful, and that shame and anger at his defeat
in the late regatta by one old as this, was the
reason
.
Is he so jealous of his honor with the oar?
Diamine! I have seen the time when Jacopo
would sooner die, than lose a race; but that was
before he carried a stiletto. Had he kept to his
oar, the thing might have happened, but once known
for the hired blow, it seems unreasonable he should
set his heart so strongly on the prizes of the canals.
May not the man have fallen into the Lagunes,
by accident?
No doubt, Signore. This happens to some of
us daily; but then we think it wiser to swim to the
boat, than to sink. Old Antonio had an arm in
youth, to carry him from the quay to the Lido.
But he may have been struck in falling, and
rendered unable to do himself this good office.
There would be marks to show this, were it
true, Signore!
Would not Jacopo have used the stiletto?
Perhaps not, on one like Antonio. The gondola
of the old man was found in the mouth of the
Grand Canal, half a league from the body, and
against the wind! we note these things, Signore,
for they are within our knowledge.
A happy night to thee, fisherman.
A most happy night, eccellenza; said the
laborer
of the Lagunes, gratified with having so long
occupied the attention of one he rightly believed so
much his superior. The disguised senator passed
on. He had no difficulty in quitting the cathedral
unobserved, and he had his private means of
entering
the palace, without attracting any impertinent
eye to his movements. Here he quickly joined his
colleagues of the fearful tribunal.
CHAPTER XII.
There
the prisoners rest together; they hear not the voice of
the oppressor.
Job
.
The
manner in which the Council of Three held
its more public meetings, if aught connected with
that mysterious body could be called public, has
already
been seen. On the present occasion, there
were the same robes, the same disguises, and the
same officers of the inquisition, as in the scene
related
in a previous chapter. The only change was
in the character of the judges, and in that of the
accused. By a peculiar arrangement of the lamp,
too, most of the light was thrown upon the spot it
was intended the prisoner should occupy, while the
side of the apartment on which the inquisitors sate,
was left in a dimness that well accorded with their
gloomy and secret duties. Previously to the
opening
of the door, by which the person to be
examined
was to appear, there was audible the clanking
of chains, the certain evidence that the affair in
hand was considered serious. The hinges turned,
and the Bravo stood in presence of those unknown
men who were to decide on his fate.
As Jacopo had often been before the council,
though not as a prisoner, he betrayed neither
surprise
nor alarm at the black aspect of all his eye
beheld. His features were composed though pale,
his limbs immovable, and his mien decent. When
the little bustle of his entrance had subsided, there
reigned a stillness in the room.
Thou art called Jacopo Frontoni? said the
secretary, who acted as the mouth-piece of the
Three, on this occasion.
I am.
Q 2
Thou art the son of a certain Ricardo
Frontoni
,
a man well known as having been concerned in
robbing the republic's customs, and who is thought
to have been banished to the distant islands, or to
be otherwise punished?
Signoreor otherwise punished.
Thou wert a gondolier in thy youth?
I was a gondolier.
Thy mother is
Dead; said Jacopo, perceiving the other
paused
to examine his notes.
The depth of the tone, in which this word was
uttered, caused a silence, that the secretary did not
interrupt, until he had thrown a glance backward
at the judges.
She was not accused of thy father's crime?
Had she been, Signore, she is long since beyond
the power of the republic.
Shortly after thy father fell under the
displeasure
of the state, thou quittedst thy business of a
gondolier?
Signore, I did.
Thou art accused, Jacopo, of having laid aside
the oar for the stiletto?
Signore, I am.
For several years, the rumors of thy bloody
deeds have been growing in Venice, until, of late,
none have met with an untimely fate, that the blow
has not been attributed to thy hand?
This is too true, Signor SegretarioI would it
were not!
The ears of his highness, and of the Councils,
have not been closed to these reports, but they have
long attended to the rumors with the earnestness
which becomes a paternal and careful government.
If they have suffered thee to go at large, it hath
only been that there might be no hazard of sullying
the ermine of justice, with a premature and not
sufficiently
supported judgment.
Jacopo bent his head, but without speaking. A
smile so wild and meaning, however, gleamed on
his face at this declaration, that the permanent
officer
of the secret tribunal, he who served as its
organ
of communication, bowed nearly to the paper
he held, as it might be to look deeper into his
documents
.
Let not the reader turn back to this page
in surprise, when he shall have reached the
explanation
of the tale, for mysticisms quite as palpable,
if not of so ruthless a character, have been publicly
acted by political bodies in his own times.
There is now a specific and a frightful charge
brought against thee, Jacopo Frontoni, continued
the secretary; and, in tenderness of the citizen's
life, the dreaded council itself hath taken the matter
in hand. Didst thou know a certain Antonio
Vecchio
,
a fisherman here in our Lagunes?
Signore, I knew him well of late, and much
regret
that it was only of late.
Thou knowest, too, that his body hath been
found, drowned in the bay?
Jacopo shuddered, signifying his assent merely
by a sign. The effect of this tacit
acknowledgment
on the youngest of the three was apparent,
for he turned to his companions, like one struck by
the confession it implied. His colleagues made
dignified
inclinations in return, and the silent
communication
ceased.
His death has excited discontent among his
fellows
,
and its cause has become a serious subject of
inquiry for the illustrious Council.
The death of the meanest man in Venice should
call forth the care of the patricians, Signore.
Dost thou know, Jacopo, that thou art accused
of being his murderer?
Signore, I do.
It is said that thou camest among the
gondoliers
in the late regatta, and that, but for this aged
fisherman, thou would'st have been winner of the
prize?
In that, rumor hath not lied, Signore.
Thou dost not, then, deny the charge! said the
examiner, in evident surprise.
It is certain that but for the fisherman, I should
have been the winner.
And thou wished it, Jacopo?
Signore, greatly; returned the accused, with a
show of emotion, that had not hitherto escaped
him. I was a man condemned of his fellows, and
the oar had been my pride, from childhood to that
hour.
Another movement of the third inquisitor
betrayed
,
equally, his interest and his surprise.
Dost thou confess the crime?
Jacopo smiled, but more in derision than with any
other feeling.
If the illustrious senators here present will
unmask
,
I may answer that question, haply, with greater
confidence; he said.
Thy request is bold and out of rule. None
know the persons of the patricians who preside over
the destinies of the state. Dost thou confess the
crime?
The entrance of an officer, in some haste,
prevented
a reply. The man placed a written report
in the hands of the inquisitor in red, and withdrew.
After a short pause, the guards were ordered to
retire
with their prisoner.
Great senators! said Jacopo, advancing
earnestly
towards the table, as if he would seize the
moment to urge what he was about to say;
Mercy! grant me your authority to visit one in
the prisons, beneath the leads!I have weighty
reasons
for the wish, and I pray you, as men and
fathers
,
to grant it!
The interest of the two, who were consulting
apart on the new intelligence, prevented them from
listening to what he urged. The other inquisitor,
who was the Signor Soranzo, had drawn near the
lamp, anxious to read the lineaments of one so
notorious
,
and was gazing at his striking countenance.
Touched by the pathos of his voice, and agreeably
disappointed in the lineaments he studied, he took
upon himself the power to grant the request.
Humor his wish, he said to the halberdiers;
but have him in readiness to reappear.
Jacopo looked his gratitude, but fearful that the
others might still interfere to prevent his wish, he
hurried from the room.
The march of the little procession, which
proceeded
from the chamber of the inquisition to the
summer cells of its victims, was sadly characteristic
of the place and the government.
It went through gloomy and secret corridors,
that were hid from the vulgar eye, while thin
partitions
only separated it from the apartments of
the doge, which, like the specious aspect of the
state, concealed the nakedness and misery within,
by their gorgeousness and splendor! On
reaching
the attic, Jacopo stopped, and turned to his
conductors
.
If you are beings of God's forming, he said,
take off these clanking chains, though it be but for
a moment.
The keepers regarded each other in surprise,
neither
offering to do the charitable office.
I go to visit, probably for the last time,
continued
the prisoner, a bed-riddenI may saya
dying father, who knows nothing of my situation,
will ye that he should see me thus?
The appeal which was made, more with the voice
and manner, than in the words, had its effect. A
keeper removed the chains, and bade him proceed.
With a cautious tread, Jacopo advanced, and when
the door was opened he entered the room alone,
for none there had sufficient interest in an
interview
between a common Bravo and his father, to
endure the glowing warmth of the place, the while.
The door was closed after him, and the room
became
dark.
Notwithstanding his assumed firmness, Jacopo
hesitated, when he found himself so suddenly
introduced
to the silent misery of the forlorn captive.
A hard breathing told him the situation of the
pallet, but the walls, which were solid on the side
of the corridor, effectually prevented the admission
of light.
Father! said Jacopo, with gentleness.
He got no answer.
Father! he repeated in a stronger voice.
The breathing became more audible, and then the
captive spoke.
Holy Maria hears my prayers! he said feebly.
God hath sent thee, son, to close my eyes!
Doth thy strength fail thee, father?
Greatlymy time is comeI had hoped to see
the light of the day again; to bless thy dear mother
and sisterGod's will be done!
They pray for us both, father. They are
beyond
the power of the senate.
Jacopo,I do not understand thee!
My mother and sister are dead; they are saints
in Heaven, father.
The old man groaned, for the tie of earth had
not yet been entirely severed. Jacopo heard him
murmuring a prayer, and he knelt by the side of his
pallet.
This is a sudden blow! whispered the old
man. We depart together.
They are long dead, father.
Why hast thou not told me this before,
Jacopo
?
Hadst thou not sorrows enough without this!
now that thou art about to join them, it will be
pleasant to know, that they have so long been
happy.
And thou?thou wilt be alonegive me thy
hand,poor Jacopo!
The Bravo reached forth, and took the feeble
member of his parent; it was clammy and cold.
Jacopo, continued the captive, whose mind still
sustained the body, I have prayed thrice within
the houronce for my own soulonce for the
peace of thy motherlastly, for thee!
Bless thee, father!bless thee!I have need
of prayer!
I have asked of Godfavor in thy behalf. I
have bethought meof all thy love and careof
all thy devotion to my age and sufferings. When
thou wert a child, Jacopotenderness for thee
tempted me to acts of weakness,I trembled lest
thy manhood might bring upon mepain and
repentance
.
Thou hast not known the yearningsof
a parent for his offspringbut thou hast well
requited
them. Kneel, Jacopothat I may ask of God
once more, to remember thee.
I am at thy side, father.
The old man raised his feeble arms, and with a
voice, whose force appeared reviving, he
pronounced
a fervent and solemn benediction.
The blessing of a dying parent will sweeten
thy lifeJacopo, he added, after a pause, and
give peace to thy last moments.
It will do the latter, father.
A rude summons at the door interrupted them.
Come forth Jacopo, said a keeper;the
Council seeks thee!
Jacopo felt the convulsive start of his father, but
he did not answer.
Will they not leave theea few minutes
longer
?
whispered the old manI shall not keep
thee long!
The door opened, and a gleam from the lamp fell
on the group in the cell. The keeper had the
humanity
to shut it again, leaving all in obscurity.
The glance which Jacopo obtained, by that passing
light, was the last look he had of his father's
countenance
.
Death was fearfully on it, but the eyes
were turned in unutterable affection on his own.
The man is mercifulhe will not shut thee
out! murmured the parent.
They cannot leave thee to die alone, father!
Son, I am with my Godyet I would gladly
have thee by my side!Didst thou saythy
mother
and thy sister were dead?
Dead!
Thy young sister, too?
Father, both. They are saints in Heaven.
The old man breathed thick, and there was
silence
.
Jacopo felt a hand moving in the darkness,
as if in quest of him. He aided the effort, and laid
the member in reverence on his own head.
Maria undefiled, and her son, who is God!
bless thee, Jacopo! whispered a voice, that to the
excited imagination of the kneeling Bravo, appeared
to hover in the air. The solemn words were
followed
by a quivering sigh. Jacopo hid his face in
the blanket, and prayed. After which there was
deep quiet.
Father! he asked, trembling at his own
smothered voice.
He was unanswered. Stretching out a hand, it
touched the features of a corpse. With a firmness,
that had the quality of desperation, he again bowed
his head, and uttered, fervently, a prayer for the
dead.
When the door of the cell opened, Jacopo
appeared
to the keepers, with a dignity of air that
belongs only to character, and which was
heightened
by the scene, in which he had just been an
actor. He raised his hands, and stood immovable,
while the manacles were replaced. This office
done, they walked away together, in the direction
of the secret chamber. It was not long ere all
were again in their places, before the Council of
Three.
Jacopo Frontoni, resumed the secretary,
thou art suspected of being privy to another dark
deed, that hath had place of late, within our city.
Hast thou any knowledge of a noble Calabrian,
who hath high claim to the senate's honors, and
who hath long had his abode in Venice?
Signore, I have.
Hast thou had aught of concern with him?
Signore, yes.
A movement of common interest made itself
apparent
among the auditors.
Dost thou know where the Don Camillo
Monforte
is, at present?
Jacopo hesitated. He so well understood the
means of intelligence possessed by the Council, that
he doubted how far it might be prudent to deny his
connexion with the flight of the lovers. Besides,
at that moment his mind was deeply impressed with
a holy sentiment of truth.
Canst thou say, why the young duca is not to
be found in his palace? repeated the secretary.
Illustrissimo, he hath quitted Venice for ever.
How canst thou know this?Would he make
a confidant of a common Bravo?
The smile which crossed the features of Jacopo
was full of superiority; it caused the conscious
Vol. II. R
agent of the Secret Tribunal to look closely at his
papers, like one who felt its power.
Art thou his confidantI ask again?
Signore, in this, I am.I have the assurance
from the mouth of Don Camillo Monforte himself,
that he will not return.
This is impossible, since it would involve a loss
of all his fair hopes and illustrious fortunes.
He consoled himself, Signore, with the
possession
of the heiress of Tiepolo's love, and with her
riches.
Again there was a movement among the Three,
which all their practised restraint, and the
conventional
dignity of their mysterious functions, could
not prevent.
Let the keepers withdraw; said the inquisitor
of the scarlet robe. So soon as the prisoner was
alone with the Three, and their permanent officer,
the examination continued; the senators themselves,
trusting to the effect produced by their masks, and
some feints, speaking as occasion offered.
This is important intelligence that thou hast
communicated, Jacopo, continued he of the robe
of flame. It may yet redeem thy life, wert thou
wise enough to turn it to account.
What would your eccellenza, at my hands? It
is plain that the Council know of the flight of Don
Camillo, nor will I believe, that eyes, which so
seldom
are closed, have not yet missed the daughter
of the Tiepolo.
Both are true, Jacopo; but what hast thou to
say of the means? Remember, that as thou
findest
favor with the Council, thine own fate will be
decided.
The prisoner suffered another of those freezing
gleams to cross his face, which invariably caused
his examiners to bend their looks aside.
The means of escape cannot be wanting to a
bold lover, Signore; he replied. Don Camillo is
rich, and might employ a thousand agents, had he
need of them.
Thou art equivocating; 't will be the worse for
thee, that thou triflest with the Councilwho are
these agents?
He had a generous household, eccellenza;
many hardy gondoliers, and servitors of all
conditions
.
Of these we have nothing to learn. He hath
escaped by other meansor art thou sure he hath
escaped at all?
Signore, is he in Venice?
Nay, that we ask of thee. Here is an
accusation
,
found in the lion's mouth, which charges thee
with his assassination.
And the Donna Violetta's too, eccellenza?
Of her, we have heard nothing. What answer
dost make to the charge?
Signore, why should I betray my own secrets?
Ha! art thou equivocating and faithless?
Remember
that we have a prisoner beneath the leads,
who can extract the truth from thee.
Jacopo raised his form to such an altitude, as one
might fancy to express the mounting of a liberated
spirit. Still his eye was sad, and spite of an effort
to the contrary, his voice melancholy.
Senators, he said, your prisoner beneath the
leads, is free.
How! thou art trifling, in thy despair!
I speak truth. The liberation, so long delayed,
hath come at last!
Thy father
Is dead; interrupted Jacopo, solemnly.
The two elder members of the Council looked at
each other, in surprise, while their junior colleague
listened with the interest of one, who was just
entering
on a noviciate of secret and embarrassing
duties. The former consulted together, and then
they communicated as much of their opinions to the
Signor Soranzo, as they deemed necessary to the
occasion.
Wilt thou consult thine own safety, Jacopo, and
reveal all thou knowest of this affair of the
Neapolitan
?
continued the inquisitor, when this by-play
was ended.
Jacopo betrayed no weakness at the menace
implied
by the words of the senator; but, after a
moment's
reflection, he answered with as much
frankness
as he could have used at the confessional.
It is known to you, illustrious senator, he said,
that the state had a desire to match the heiress of
Tiepolo, to its own advantage; that she was
beloved
of the Neapolitan noble; and that, as is wont,
between young and virtuous hearts, she returned
his love, as became a maiden of her high condition,
and tender years. Is there any thing extraordinary
in the circumstance, that two of so illustrious hopes
should struggle to prevent their own misery?
Signori
,
the night that old Antonio died, I was alone,
among the graves of the Lido, with many
melancholy
and bitter thoughts, and life had become a
burthen to me. Had the evil spirit which was then
uppermost maintained its mastery, I might have
died the death of a hopeless suicide. God sent Don
Camillo Monforte, to my succorpraised be the
immaculate Maria, and her blessed Son, for the
mercy! it was there, I learned the wishes of the
Neapolitan, and enlisted myself in his service. I
swore to him, senators of Venice, to be true; to die
in his cause, should it be necessary; and to help
him to his bride. This pledge have I redeemed.
The happy lovers are now in the states of the
Church, and under the puissant protection of the
cardinal secretary, Don Camillo's mother's brother.
Fool! why didst thou this? Hadst thou no
thought for thyself?
Eccellenza, but little; I thought more of
finding
a human bosom to pour out my sufferings to,
than of your high displeasure. I have not known
so sweet a moment in years, as that in which I saw
the lord of Sant' Agata fold his beautiful and
weeping
bride to his heart!
The inquisitors were struck with the quiet
enthusiasm
of the Bravo, and surprise once more held
them in suspense. At length, the elder of the three
resumed the examination.
Wilt thou impart the manner of this escape,
Jacopo? he demanded. Remember thou hast
still a life to redeem!
Signore, it is scarce worth the trouble. But to
do you pleasure, nothing shall be concealed.
Jacopo then recounted, in simple, and undisguised
terms, the entire means employed by Don Camillo,
in effecting his escape; his hopes, his
disappointments
,
and his final success. In this narrative
nothing
was concealed, but the place in which the
ladies had temporarily taken refuge, and the name
of Gelsomina. Even the attempt of Giacomo
Gradenigo
on the life of the Neapolitan, and the agency
of the Hebrew, were fully exposed. None listened
to this explanation so intently as the young husband.
Notwithstanding his public duties, his pulses
quickened
as the prisoner dwelt on the different chances
of the lovers, and when their final union was
proclaimed
,
he felt his heart bound with delight. On
the other hand, his more practised colleagues heard
the detail of the Bravo, with politic coolness. The
effect of all factitious systems is to render the
feelings
subservient to expediency. Convention and
fiction take place of passion and truth, and like the
Mussulman with his doctrine of predestination, there
is no one more acquiescent in defeat, than he who
R 2
has obtained an advantage in the face of nature and
justice; his resignation being, in common, as
perfect
as his previous arrogance was insupportable.
The two old senators perceived at once, that Don
Camillo, and his fair companion, were completely
beyond the reach of their power, and they instantly
admitted the wisdom of making a merit of necessity.
Having no farther occasion for Jacopo, they
summoned
the keepers, and dismissed him to his cell.
It will be seemly to send letters of
congratulation
,
to the cardinal secretary, on the union of his
nephew, with so rich an heiress of our city, said
the Inquisitor of the Ten, as the door closed on the
retiring group. So great an interest as that of the
Neapolitan, should be propitiated.
But should he urge the state's resistance to his
hopes? returned the Signor Soranzo, in feeble
objection
to so bold a scheme.
We will excuse it as the act of a former council.
These misconceptions are the unavoidable
consequences
of the caprices of liberty, Signore. The
steed that ranges the plains, in the freedom of nature,
cannot be held to perfect command, like the dull
beast that draws the car. This is the first of your
sittings, in the Three, but experience will show you,
that excellent as we are in system, we are not quite
perfect in practice. This is grave matter of the
young Gradenigo, Signori!
I have long known his unworthiness, returned
his more aged colleague. It is a thousand pities
that so honorable and so noble a patrician should
have produced so ignoble a child. But neither the
state, nor the city, can tolerate assassination.
Would it were less frequent! exclaimed the
Signore Soranzo, in perfect sincerity.
Would it were, indeed! There are hints in our
secret information, which tend to confirm the charge
of Jacopo. Though long experience has taught us
to put full faith in his reports.
Howis Jacopo, then, an agent of the police?
Of that more at our leisure, Signor Soranzo. At
present we must look to this attempt on the life of
one protected by our laws.
The Three then entered into a serious discussion
of the case of the two delinquents. Venice, like all
despotic governments, had the merit of great
efficiency
in its criminal police, when it was disposed
to exert it. Justice was sure enough in those
instances
,
in which the interests of the government
itself were not involved, or in which bribery could
not well be used. As to the latter, through the
jealousy of the state, and the constant agency of
those who were removed from temptation, by being
already in possession of a monopoly of benefits, it
was by no means as frequent, as in some other
communities
,
in which the affluent were less interested.
The Signor Soranzo had now a fair occasion for the
exercise of his generous feelings. Though related
to the house of Gradenigo, he was not backward in
decrying the conduct of its heir. His first impulses
were to make a terrible example of the accused, and
to show the world that no station brought with it, in
Venice, impunity for crime. From this view of the
case, however, he was gradually enticed by his
companions
,
who reminded him that the law commonly
made a distinction, between the intention and the
execution of an offence. Driven from his first
determination
by the cooler heads of his colleagues,
the young inquisitor next proposed that the case
should be sent to the ordinary tribunals, for judgment.
Instances had not been wanting, in which the
aristocracy
of Venice sacrificed one of its body to the
seemliness of Justice; for when such cases were
managed with discretion, they rather strengthened,
than weakened their ascendency. But the present
crime was known to be too common, to permit so
lavish an expenditure of their immunities, and the
old inquisitors opposed the wish of their younger
colleague, with great plausibility, and with some
show of reason. It was finally resolved that they
should themselves decide on the case.
The next question was the degree of punishment.
The wily senior of the council began by proposing
a banishment for a few months, for Giacomo
Gradenigo
was already obnoxious to the anger of the
state, on more accounts than one. But this
punishment
was resisted, by the Signor Soranzo, with the
ardor of an uncorrupted and generous mind. The
latter gradually prevailed, his companions taking
care that their compliance should have the air of a
concession to his arguments. The result of all this
management was, that the heir of Gradenigo was
condemned to ten years' retirement in the provinces,
and Hosea to banishment for life. Should the reader
be of opinion that strict justice was not meted out to
the offenders, he should remember, that the Hebrew
ought to be glad to have escaped as he did.
We must not conceal this judgment, nor its
motive, observed the Inquisitor of the Ten, when
the affair was concluded. The state is never a
loser for letting its justice be known.
Nor for its exercise, I should hope; returned
the Signor Soranzo. As our affairs are ended for
the night, is it your pleasures, Signori, that we
return
to our palaces?
Nay, we have this matter of Jacopo.
Him may we, now, surely, turn over to the
ordinary
tribunals!
As you may decide, Signori; is this your
pleasure
?
Both the others bowed assent, and the usual
preparations
were made for departure.
Ere the two seniors of the Council left the palace,
however, they held a long and secret conference
together. The result was a private order to the
criminal judge, and then they returned, each to his
own abode, like men who had the approbation of
their own consciences.
On the other hand, the Signor Soranzo hastened
to his own luxurious and happy dwelling. For the
first time, in his life, he entered it with a distrust of
himself. Without being conscious of the reason,
he felt sad, for he had taken the first step in that
tortuous and corrupting path, which eventually
leads to the destruction of all those generous and
noble sentiments, which can only flourish apart
from the sophistry and fictions of selfishness. He
would have rejoiced to have been as light of heart
as at the moment he handed his fair-haired partner
into the gondola that night; but his head had
pressed
the pillow for many hours, before sleep drew a
veil over the solemn trifling with the most serious
of our duties, in which he had been an actor.
CHAPTER XIII.
Art thou not guilty! No, indeed, I am not.
Rogers.
The
following morning brought the funeral of
Antonio. The agents of the police took the
precaution
to circulate in the city, that the senate
permitted
this honor to the memory of the old
fisherman
,
on account of his success in the regatta, and
as some atonement for his unmerited and
mysterious
death. All the men of the Lagunes were
assembled
in the square at the appointed hour, in
decent
guise, flattered with the notice that their craft
received, and more than half disposed to forget
their former anger in the present favor. Thus easy
is it for those who are elevated above their
fellow-creatures
by the accident of birth, or by the
opinions
of a factitious social organization, to repair the
wrongs they do in deeds, by small concessions of
their conventional superiority.
Masses were still chanted for the soul of old
Antonio before the altar of St. Mark. Foremost
among the priests was the good Carmelite, who
had scarce known hunger or fatigue, in his pious
desire to do the offices of the church, in behalf of
one, whose fate he might be said to have witnessed.
His zeal, however, in that moment of excitement
passed unnoticed by all, but those whose business it
was to suffer no unusual display of character, nor
any unwonted circumstance to have place, without
attracting their suspicion. As the Carmelite finally
withdrew from the altar, previously to the removal
of the body, he felt the sleeve of his robe slightly
drawn aside, and yielding to the impulse, he quickly
found himself among the columns of that gloomy
church, alone with a stranger.
Father, thou hast shrived many a parting soul?
observed, rather than asked, the other.
It is the duty of my holy office, son.
The state will note thy services; there will be
need of thee when the body of this fisherman is
committed to the earth.
The monk shuddered, but making the sign of the
cross, he bowed his pale face, in signification of his
readiness to discharge the duty. At that moment
the bearers lifted the body, and the procession
issued
upon the great square. First marched the
usual lay underlings of the cathedral, who were
followed by those who chanted the offices of the
occasion. Among the latter the Carmelite hastened
to take his station. Next came the corpse, without
a coffin, for that is a luxury of the grave, even now
unknown to the Italians of old Antonio's degree.
The body was clad in the holiday vestments of a
fisherman, the hands and feet being naked. A cross
lay on the breast; the gray hairs were blowing
about in the air, and, in frightful adornment of the
ghastliness of death, a bouquet of flowers was
placed upon the mouth. The bier was rich in
gilding
and carving, another melancholy evidence of
the lingering wishes and false direction of human
vanity.
Next to this characteristic equipage of the dead
walked a lad, whose brown cheek, half-naked body,
and dark, roving, eye, announced the grandson of
the fisherman. Venice knew when to yield
gracefully
,
and the boy was liberated, unconditionally,
from the galleys, in pity, as it was whispered, for
the untimely fate of his parent. There was the
aspiring
look, the dauntless spirit, and the rigid
honesty
of Antonio, in the bearing of the lad; but these
qualities were now smothered by a natural grief;
and, as in the case of him, whose funeral escort he
followed, something obscured by the rude chances
of his lot. From time to time the bosom of the
generous boy heaved, as they marched along the
quay, taking the route of the arsenal; and there
were moments that his lips quivered; grief
threatening
to overcome his manhood.
Still not a tear wetted his cheek, until the body
disappeared from his view. Then nature triumphed,
and straying from out the circle, he took a seat apart
and wept, as one of his years and simplicity would
be apt to weep, at finding himself a solitary
wanderer
in the wilderness of the world.
Thus terminated the incident of Antonio Vecchio,
the fisherman, whose name soon ceased to be
mentioned
in that city of mysteries, except on the
Lagunes
,
where the men of his craft long vaunted his
merit with the net, and the manner in which he bore
away the prize from the best oars of Venice. His
descendant lived and toiled, like others of his
condition
,
and we will here dismiss him, by saying, that
he so far inherited the native qualities of his
ancestor
,
that he forbore to appear, a few hours later, in
the crowd, which curiosity and vengeance drew
into the Piazzetta.
Father Anselmo took boat to return to the canals,
and when he landed at the quay of the smaller
square, it was with the hope that he would now be
permitted to seek those of whose fate he was still
ignorant, but in whom he felt so deep an interest.
Not so, however. The individual who had
addressed
him in the cathedral was, apparently, in waiting,
and knowing the uselessness, as well as the danger
of remonstrance, where the state was concerned,
the Carmelite permitted himself to be conducted
whither his guide pleased. They took a devious
route, but it led them to the public prisons. Here
the priest was shown into the keeper's apartment,
where he was desired to wait a summons from his
companion.
Our business now leads us to the cell of Jacopo.
On quitting the presence of the Three, he had been
remanded to his gloomy room, where he passed the
night like others similarly situated. With the
appearance
of the dawn the Bravo had been led
before
those who ostensibly discharged the duties of
his judges. We say ostensibly, for justice never
was yet pure under a system in which the
governors
have an interest, in the least separated from that
of the governed; for in all cases which involve the
ascendency of the existing authorities, the instinct
of self-preservation is as certain to bias their
decision
,
as that of life is to cause man to shun danger.
If such is the fact in countries of milder sway, the
reader will easily believe in its existence in a state
like that of Venice. As may have been anticipated,
those who sat in judgment on Jacopo had their
instructions
,
and the trial that he sustained was
rather
a concession to appearances than an homage to
the laws. All the records were duly made,
witnesses
were examined, or said to be examined, and
care was had to spread the rumor in the city, that
the tribunals were at length occupied in deciding on
the case of the extraordinary man, who had so
long been permitted to exercise his bloody
profession
with impunity, even in the centre of the canals.
During the morning, the credulous tradesmen were
much engaged in recounting to each other the
different
flagrant deeds that, in the course of the last
three or four years, had been imputed to his hand.
One spoke of the body of a stranger that had been
found near the gaming-houses, frequented by those
who visited Venice. Another recalled the fate of
the young noble, who had fallen by the assassin's
blow even on the Rialto, and another went into the
details of a murder, which had deprived a mother
of her only son, and the daughter of a patrician of
her love. In this manner, as one after another
contributed
to the list, a little group, assembled on the
quay, enumerated no less than five-and-twenty lives,
which were believed to have been taken, by the
hand of Jacopo, without including the vindictive
and useless assassination of him whose funeral rites
had just been celebrated. Happily, perhaps, for his
peace of mind, the subject of all these rumors, and
of the maledictions which they drew upon his head,
knew nothing of either. Before his judges he had
made no defence whatever, firmly refusing to
answer
their interrogatories.
Ye know what I have done, Messires, he said,
haughtily. And what I have not done, ye know.
As for yourselves, look to your own interests.
When again in his cell, he demanded food, and
Vol. II. S
ate tranquilly, though with moderation. Every
instrument
which could possibly be used against his
life, was then removed, his irons were finally and
carefully examined, and he was left to his thoughts.
It was in this situation that the prisoner heard the
approach of footsteps to his cell. The bolts turned,
and the door opened. The form of a priest
appeared
between him and the day. The latter, however,
held a lamp, which, as the cell was again shut and
secured, he placed on the low shelf that held the
jug and loaf of the prisoner.
Jacopo received his visitor calmly, but with the
deep respect of one who reverenced his holy office.
He arose, crossed himself, and advanced as far as
the chains permitted, to do him honor.
Thou art welcome, father, he said; in cutting
me off from earth, the Council, I see, does not wish
to cut me off from God.
That would exceed their power, son. He who
died for them, shed his blood for thee, if thou wilt
not reject his grace. ButHeaven knows I say it
with reluctance! thou art not to think that one of
thy sins, Jacopo, can have hope without deep and
heartfelt repentance!
Father, have any?
The Carmelite started, for the point of the
question
,
and the tranquil tones of the speaker, had a
strange effect in such an interview.
Thou art not what I had supposed thee,
Jacopo
!
he answered. Thy mind is not altogether
obscured in darkness, and thy crimes have been
committed against the consciousness of their
enormity
.
I fear this is true, reverend monk.
Thou must feel their weight in the poignancy of
griefin the Father Anselmo stopped, for a sob
at that moment, apprized them that they were
not alone. Moving aside, in a little alarm, the
action
discovered the figure of the shrinking
Gelsomina
,
who had entered the cell, favored by the
keepers, and concealed by the robes of the
Carmelite
.
Jacopo groaned, when he beheld her form,
and turning away, he leaned against the wall.
Daughter, why art thou hereand who art
thou? demanded the monk.
'Tis the child of the principal keeper, said
Jacopo
,
perceiving that she was unable to answer,
one known to me, in my frequent adventures in
this prison.
The eye of father Anselmo wandered from one
to the other. At first its expression was severe,
and then, as it saw each countenance in turn, it
became
less unkind, until it softened, at the exhibition
of their mutual agony.
This comes of human passions! he said, in a
tone between consolation and reproof. Such are
ever the fruits of crime.
Father, said Jacopo, with earnestness, I may
deserve the word; but the angels in Heaven are
scarce purer than this weeping girl!
I rejoice to hear it. I will believe thee,
unfortunate
man, and glad am I, that thy soul is relieved
from the sin of having corrupted one so youthful.
The bosom of the prisoner heaved, while
Gelsomina
shuddered.
Why hast thou yielded to the weakness of
nature
,
and entered the cell? asked the good
Carmelite
,
endeavoring to throw into his eye a reproof,
that the pathos and kindness of his tones
contradicted
.
Didst thou know the character of the man
thou loved?
Immaculate Maria! exclaimed the girlno
nono!
And now that thou hast learned the truth,
surely
thou art no longer the victim of wayward
fancies
!
The gaze of Gelsomina was bewildered, but
anguish
prevailed over all other expression. She
bowed her head, partly in shame, but more in
sorrow
,
without answering.
I know not, children, what end this interview
can answer, continued the monkI am sent
hither to receive the last confession of a Bravo, and
surely, one who has so much cause to condemn the
deception he has practised, would not wish to hear
the details of such a life?
Nonono murmured Gelsomina again,
enforcing her words with a wild gesture of the
hand.
It is better, father, that she should believe me
all that her fancy can imagine as monstrous, said
Jacopo, in a thick voice: she will then learn to
hate my memory.
Gelsomina did not speak, but the negative gesture
was repeated franticly.
The heart of the poor child hath been sorely
touched, said the Carmelite, with concern. We
must not treat so tender a flower rudely. Hearken
to me, daughter, and consult thy reason, more than
thy weakness.
Question her not, father;let her curse me,
and depart.
Carlo! shrieked Gelsomina.
A long pause succeeded. The monk perceived
that human passion was superior to his art, and
that the case must be left to time; while the prisoner
maintained within himself, a struggle more fierce
than any which it had yet been his fate to endure.
The lingering desires of the world conquered, and
he broke silence.
Father, he said, advancing to the length of his
chain, and speaking both solemnly, and with dignity,
I had hopedI had prayed that this unhappy but
innocent creature might have turned from her own
weakness with lothing, when she came to know
that the man she loved was a Bravo.But I did
injustice to the heart of woman!Tell me,
Gelsomina
,
and as thou valuest thy salvation, deceive me
notcanst thou look at me without horror?
Gelsomina trembled, but she raised her eyes, and
smiled on him as the weeping infant returns the
earnest and tender regard of its mother. The effect
of that glance on Jacopo was so powerful, that his
sinewy frame shook, until the wondering Carmelite
heard the clanking of his chains.
'Tis enough, he said, struggling to command
himself, Gelsomina, thou shalt hear my confession.
Thou hast long been mistress of one great secret,
none other shall be hid from thee.
Antonio? gasped the girl,Carlo! Carlo!
what had that aged fisherman done, that thy hand
should seek his life?
Antonio! echoed the monk; dost thou stand
charged with his death, my son?
It is the crime for which I am condemned to
die.
The Carmelite sank upon the stool of the
prisoner
,
and sat motionless, looking with an eye of
horror
,
from the countenance of the unmoved Jacopo,
to that of his trembling companion. The truth
began
to dawn upon him, though his mind was still
enveloped in the web of Venetian mystery.
Here is some horrible mistake! he whispered.
I will hasten to thy judges and undeceive them.
The prisoner smiled calmly, as he reached out a
hand to arrest the zealous movement of the simple
Carmelite.
'T will be useless, he said; it is the pleasure
of the Three, that I should suffer for old Antonio's
death.
Then wilt thou die unjustly!I am a witness
that he fell by other hands.
S 2
Father! shrieked Gelsomina, oh! repeat the
wordssay that Carlo could not do the cruel deed!
Of that murder, at least, is he innocent.
Gelsomina! said Jacopo, struggling to stretch
forth his arms towards her, and yielding to a full
heart, and of every other!
A cry of wild delight burst from the lips of the
girl, who in the next instant lay senseless on his
bosom.
We draw the veil before the scene that followed.
Near an hour must pass before we can again remove
it. The cell then exhibited a group in its centre,
over which the lamp shed its feeble light, marking
the countenances of the different personages with
strong tints and deep shadows, in a manner to bring
forth all the force of Italian expression. The
Carmelite
was seated on the stool, while Jacopo and
Gelsomina knelt beside him. The former of the two
last was speaking earnestly, while his auditors
caught each syllable that issued from his lips, as
if interest in his innocence were still stronger than
curiosity.
I have told you, father, he continued, that a
false accusation of having wronged the customs,
brought my unhappy parent under the senate's
displeasure
,
and that he was many years an innocent
inhabitant of one of these accursed cells, while we
believed him in exile, among the islands. At length
we succeeded in getting such proof before the
Council
,
as ought to have satisfied the patricians of their
own injustice. I am afraid that when men pretend
that the chosen of the earth exercise authority, they
are not ready to admit their errors, for it would be
proof against the merit of their system. The
Council
delayed a weary time to do us justiceso long,
that my poor mother sank under her sufferings. My
sister, a girl of Gelsomina's years, followed her
soonfor the only reason given by the state, when
pressed for proof, was the suspicion, that one who
sought her love, was guilty of the crime for which
my unhappy father perished.
And did they refuse to repair their injustice?
exclaimed the Carmelite.
They could not do it, father, without publishing
their fallibility. The credit of certain great
patricians
was concerned, and I fear there is a morality
in these Councils, which separates the deed of the
man from those of the senators, putting policy before
justice.
This may be true, son; for when a community
is grounded on false principles, its interests must, of
necessity, be maintained by sophisms. God will
view this act with a different eye!
Else would the world be hopeless, father! After
years of prayers and interest, I was, under a solemn
oath of secrecy, admitted to my father's cell. There
was happiness in being able to administer to his
wantsin hearing his voicein kneeling for his
blessing. Gelsomina was then a child approaching
womanhood. I knew not their motive, though after
thoughts left it no secret, and I was permitted to see
my father through her means. When they believed
that I was sufficiently caught in their toils, I was led
into that fatal error which has destroyed my hopes,
and brought me to this condition.
Thou hast affirmed thy innocence, my son!
Innocent of shedding blood, father, but not of
lending myself to their artifices. I will not weary
you, holy monk, with the history of the means by
which they worked upon my nature. I was sworn
to serve the state, as its secret agent, for a certain
time. The reward was to be my father's freedom.
Had they taken me in the world, and in my senses,
their arts would not have triumphed; but a daily
witness of the sufferings of him who had given me
life, and who was now all that was left me in the
world, they were too strong for my weakness. They
whispered to me of racks and wheels, and I was
shown paintings of dying martyrs, that I might
understand
the agony they could inflict.
Assassinations
were frequent, and called for the care of the
policein short, fatherJacopo hid his face in the
dress of Gelsomina,I consented to let them
circulate
such tales as might draw the eye of the public
on me. I need not add, that he who lends himself to
his own infamy, will soon attain his object.
With what end was this miserable falsehood
invented?
Father, I was applied to as to a public Bravo,
and my reports, in more ways than one, answered
their designs. That I saved some lives is at least
a consolation for the error, or crime, into which
I fell!
I understand thee, Jacopo. I have heard that
Venice did not hesitate to use the ardent, and brave,
in this manner. Holy St. Mark! can deceit like
this be practised under the sanction of thy blessed
name!
Father, it is, and more. I had other duties,
connected
with the interests of the republic, and of
course I was practised in their discharge. The
citizens marvelled that one like me should go at
large, while the vindictive and revengeful took the
circumstance as a proof of address. When rumor
grew too strong for appearances, the Three took
measures to direct it to other things; and when it
grew too faint for their wishes, it was fanned. In
short, for three long and bitter years did I pass the
life of the damnedsustained only by the hope of
liberating my father, and cheered by the love of this
innocent!
Poor Jacopo, thou art to be pitied! I will
remember
thee in my prayers.
And thou, Gelsomina?
The keeper's daughter did not answer. Her ears
had drunk in each syllable that fell from his lips, and
now that the whole truth began to dawn on her
mind, there was a bright radiance in her eye, that
appeared almost supernatural to those who
witnessed
it.
If I have failed in convincing thee, Gelsomina,
continued Jacopo, that I am not the wretch I
seemed, would that I had been dumb!
She stretched a hand towards him, and dropping
her head on his bosom, wept.
I see all thy temptations, poor Carlo, she said,
softly; I know how strong was thy love for thy
father.
Dost thou forgive me, dearest Gelsomina, for the
deception on thy innocence?
There was no deceptionI believed thee a son
ready to die for his father, and I find thee what I
thought thee.
The good Carmelite regarded this scene with
eyes of interest and indulgence.Tears wetted his
cheeks.
Thy affection for each other, children, he said,
is such as angels might indulge.Has thy
intercourse
been of long date?
It has lasted years, father.
And thou, daughter, hast been with Jacopo in
the cell of his parent?
I was his constant guide, on these holy errands,
father.
The monk mused deeply. After a silence of
several minutes, he proceeded to the duties of his
holy office. Receiving the spiritual confession of
the prisoner, he gave the absolution, with a fervor,
which proved how deeply his sympathies were
enlisted
in behalf of the youthful pair. This duty
done, he gave Gelsomina his hand, and there was a
mild confidence in his countenance, as he took leave
of Jacopo.
We quit thee, he said; but be of heart, son.
I cannot think that even Venice will be deaf to a
tale like thine! Trust first to thy Godand, believe
that neither this faithful girl nor I will abandon thee,
without an effort.
Jacopo received this assurance like one
accustomed
to exist in extreme jeopardy. The smile which
accompanied his own adieux, had in it as much of
incredulity, as of melancholy. It was, however,
full of the joy of a lightened heart.
CHAPTER XIV.
Your heart
Is free, and quick with virtuous wrath to accuse
Appearances; and views a criminal
In innocence's shadow.
Werner
.
The
Carmelite and Gelsomina found the keepers
in waiting, and when they quitted the cell, its door
was secured for the night. As they had no farther
concerns with the jailers, they passed on
unquestioned
.
But when the end of the corridor, which led
towards the apartments of the keeper, was reached,
the monk stopped.
Art thou equal to a great effort, in order that
the innocent shall not die? he suddenly asked,
though with a solemnity that denoted the influence
of a high and absorbing motive.
Father!
I would know if thy love for the youth can
sustain
thee in a trying scene; for without this effort
he will surely perish!
I would die to save Jacopo a pang!
Deceive not thyself, daughter!Canst thou
forget
thy habits, overstep the diffidence of thy years
and condition; stand and speak fearlessly, in the
presence of the great and dreaded?
Reverend Carmelite, I speak daily, without fear,
though not without awe, to one more to be dreaded
than any in Venice.
The monk looked in admiration at the gentle
being
,
whose countenance was glowing with the mild
resolution of innocence and affection, and he
motioned
for her to follow.
We will go, then, before the proudest and the
most fearful of earth, should there be occasion, he
resumed. We will do our duty to both parties; to
the oppressor and the oppressed, that the sin of
omission lie not on our souls.
Father Anselmo, without further explanation, led
the obedient girl into that part of the palace, which
was known to be appropriated to the private uses of
the titular head of the republic.
The jealousy of the Venetian patricians, on the
subject of their doge, is matter of history. He
was, by situation, a puppet in the hands of the
nobles
,
who only tolerated his existence, because the
theory of their government required a seeming agent
in the imposing ceremonies that formed part of their
specious system, and in their intercourse with other
states. He dwelt, in his palace, like the queen-bee
in the hive, pampered and honored to the eye, but
in truth devoted to the objects of those who alone
possess the power to injure, and perhaps we might
add, like the insect named, known for consuming
more than a usual portion of the fruits of the
common
industry.
Father Anselmo was indebted to his own
decision
,
and to the confidence of his manner, in
reaching
the private apartments of a prince, thus
secluded
and watched. He was permitted to pass by
various sentinels, who imagined, from his holy
calling
and calm step, that he was some friar employed
in his usual and privileged office. By this easy,
quiet, method did the Carmelite and his companion
penetrate to the very antechamber of the sovereign,
a spot that thousands had been defeated in
attempting
to reach, by means more elaborate.
There were merely two or three drowsy inferior
officers of the household in waiting. One arose,
quickly, at the unexpected appearance of these
unknown
visitors, expressing, by the surprise and the
confusion of his eye, the wonder into which he was
thrown by so unlooked-for guests.
His highness waits for us, I fear? simply
observed
father Anselmo, who had known how to
quiet his concern, in a look of passive courtesy.
Santa Maria! holy father, you should know
best, but
We will not lose more time in idle words, son,
when there has already been this delayshow us
to the closet of his highness.
It is forbidden to usher any, unannounced, into
the presence
Thou seest this is not an ordinary visit.Go,
inform the doge that the Carmelite he expects, and
the youthful maiden, in whom his princely bosom
feels so parental an interest, await his pleasure.
His highness has then commanded
Tell him, moreover, that time presses; for the
hour is near when innocence is condemned to
suffer
.
The usher was deceived by the gravity and
assurance
of the monk. He hesitated, and then
throwing
open a door, he showed the visitors into an
inner room, where he requested them to await his
return. After this, he went on the desired
commission
,
to the closet of his master.
It has already been shown that the reigning doge,
if such a title can be used of a prince who was
merely a tool of the aristocracy, was a man
advanced
in years. He had thrown aside the cares
of the day, and, in the retirement of his privacy,
was endeavoring to indulge those human
sympathies
that had so little play in the ordinary duties
of his factitious condition, by holding intercourse with
the mind of one of the classics of his country. His
state was laid aside for lighter ease and personal
freedom. The monk could not have chosen a
happier
moment for his object, since the man was
undefended
by the usual appliances of his rank, and
he was softened by communion with one who had
known how to mould and temper the feelings of his
readers at will. So entire was the abstraction of
the doge, at the moment, that the usher entered
unheeded
,
and had stood in respectful attention to his
sovereign's pleasure, near a minute before he was
seen.
What would'st thou, Marco? demanded the
prince, when his eye rose from the page.
Signore, returned the officer, using the
familiar
manner in which those nearest to the persons
of princes are permitted to indulgehere are the
reverend Carmelite, and the young girl, in waiting.
How sayest thou?a Carmelite, and a girl!
Signore, the same. Those whom your highness
expects.
What bold pretence is this!
Signore, I do but repeat the words of the monk.
`Tell his highness,' said the father, `that the
Carmelite
he wishes to see, and the young girl, in
whose happiness his princely bosom feels so parental
an interest, await his pleasure.'
There passed a glow, in which indignation was
Vol. II. T
brighter than shame, over the wasted cheek of the
old prince, and his eye kindled.
And this to meeven in my palace!
Pardon, Signore.This is no shameless priest,
like so many that disgrace the tonsure. Both monk
and girl have innocent and harmless looks, and I
do suspect your highness may have forgotten.
The bright spots disappeared from the prince's
cheeks, and his eye regained its paternal
expression
.
But age, and experience in his delicate
duties
,
had taught the Doge of Venice caution. He
well knew that memory had not failed him, and he
at once saw that a hidden meaning lay concealed
beneath an application so unusual. There might be
a device of his enemies, who were numerous and
active, or, in truth, there might be some justifiable
motive to warrant the applicant in resorting to a
measure so hardy.
Did the Carmelite say more, good Marco? he
asked, after deep reflection.
Signore, he said there was great urgency, as
the hour was near when the innocent might suffer.
I doubt not that he comes with a petition in behalf
of some young indiscreet, for there are said to be
several young nobles arrested for their follies in the
carnival. The female may be a sister disguised.
Bid one of thy companions come hither; and,
when I touch my bell, do thou usher these
visitors
to my presence.
The attendant withdrew, taking care to pass into
the antechamber, by doors that rendered it
unnecessary
to show himself, too soon, to those who
expected
his return. The second usher quickly made
his appearance, and was immediately dispatched in
quest of one of the Three, who was occupied with
important papers, in an adjoining closet. The
senator
was not slow to obey the summons, for he
appeared
there as a friend of the prince, having been
admitted publicly, and with the customary honors.
Here are visitors of an unusual character,
Signore
,
said the doge, rising to receive him whom
he had summoned in precaution to himself, and I
would have a witness of their requests.
Your highness does well to make us of the
senate
share your labors; though if any mistaken
opinion
of the necessity has led you to conceive it
important
to call a counsellor each time a guest enters
the palace
It is well, Signore, mildly interrupted the
prince, touching the bell. I hope my importunity
has not deranged you. But here come those I
expect
.
Father Anselmo and Gelsomina entered the closet
together. The first glance convinced the doge that
he received strangers. He exchanged looks with
the member of the secret council, and each saw in
the other's eye, that the surprise was mutual.
When fairly in the presence, the Carmelite threw
back his cowl, entirely exposing the whole of his
ascetic features, while Gelsomina, awed by the rank
of him who received them, shrunk abashed, partly
concealed by his robes.
What means this visit? demanded the prince,
whose finger pointed to the shrinking form of the
girl, while his eye rested steadily on that of the
monk, and that unusual companion? Neither the
hour, nor the mode, is customary.
Father Anselmo stood before the Venetian
sovereign
for the first time. Accustomed, like all of
that region, and more especially in that age, to
calculate
his chances of success warily, before
venturing
to disburthen his mind, the monk fastened a
penetrating look on his interrogator.
Illustrious prince, he said, we come petitioners
for justice. They who are thus commissioned had
need be bold, lest they do their own character, and
their righteous office, discredit.
Justice is the glory of St. Mark, and the
happiness
of his subjects. Thy course, father, is not
according
to established rules, and wholesome
restraints
,
but it may have its apologyname thy
errand
.
There is one in the cells, condemned of the
public
tribunals, and he must die with the return of
day, unless your princely authority interfere to save
him.
One condemned of the tribunals may merit his
fate.
I am the ghostly adviser of the unhappy youth,
and in the execution of my sacred office, I have
learned that he is innocent.
Didst thou say, condemned of the common
judges, father?
Sentenced to die, highness, by a decree of the
criminal tribunals.
The prince appeared relieved. So long as the
affair had been public, there was at least reason to
believe he might indulge his love of the species, by
listening farther, without offence to the tortuous
policy of the state. Glancing his eye at the
motionless
inquisitor, as if to seek approbation, he advanced
a step nearer to the Carmelite, with increasing
interest in the application.
By what authority, reverend priest, dost thou
impeach the decision of the judges? he demanded.
Signore, as I have just said, in virtue of
knowledge
gained in the exercise of my holy office. He has
laid bare his soul to me, as one whose feet were in
the grave; and, though offending, like all born of
woman, towards his God, he is guiltless as respects
the state.
Thinkest thou, father, that the law would ever
reach its victim, were we to listen only to
self-accusations
?
I am old, monk, and have long worn that
troublesome cap, pointing to the horned bonnet,
which lay near his hand, the symbol of his state,
and in my day, I do not recall the criminal that
has not fancied himself the victim of untoward
circumstances
.
That men apply this treacherous solace to their
consciences, one of my vocation has not to learn.
Our chief task is to show the delusion of those,
who, while condemning their own sins, by words
of confession and self-abasement, make a merit of
humility; but, Doge of Venice, there is still a virtue
in the sacred rite I have this evening been required
to perform, which can overcome the mounting of
the most exalted spirit. Many attempt to deceive
themselves, at the confessional, while, by the power
of God, few succeed.
Praised be the blessed mother and the incarnate
son, that it is so! returned the prince, struck by
the mild faith of the monk, and crossing himself,
reverently. Father, thou hast forgotten to name
the condemned?
It is a certain Jacopo Frontoni;a reputed
bravo.
The start, the changing color, and the glance of
the prince of Venice, were full of natural surprise.
Callest thou the bloodiest stiletto that ever
disgraced
the city, the weapon of a reputed bravo!
The arts of the monster have prevailed over thy
experience
,
monk!the true confession of such a
wretch, would be but a history of bloody and
revolting
crimes.
I entered his cell with this opinion, but I left it
convinced that the public sentiment has done him
wrong. If your highness will deign hear his tale,
you will think him a fit subject for your pity, rather
than for punishment.
Of all the criminals of my reign, this is the
T2
last, in whose favor I could have imagined there
was aught to be said!Speak, freely, Carmelite;
for curiosity is as strong as wonder.
So truly did the Doge give utterance to his
feelings
,
that he momentarily forgot the presence of
the inquisitor, whose countenance might have
shown him that the subject was getting to be grave.
The monk ejaculated a thanksgiving, for it was
not always easy, in that city of mystery, to bring truth
to the ears of the great. When men live under a
system of duplicity, more or less of the quality gets
interwoven with the habits of the most ingenuous,
although they may remain, themselves, unconscious
of the taint. Thus father Anselmo, as he
proceeded
with the desired explanation, touched more
tenderly
on the practices of the state, and used more
of reserve in alluding to those usages and opinions,
which one of his holy calling and honest nature,
under other circumstances, would have fearlessly
condemned.
It may not be known to one of your high
condition
,
sovereign prince, resumed the Carmelite,
that an humble, but laborious mechanic of this city,
a certain Francesco Frontoni, was long since
condemned
for frauds against the republic's revenue.
This is a crime St. Mark never fails to visit with
his heavy displeasure, for when men place the
goods of the world before all other considerations,
they mistake the objects which have brought them
together in social union.
Father, thou wert speaking of a certain
Francesco
Frontoni?
Highness, such was his name. The unhappy
man had taken into his confidence and friendship,
one, who, pretending to his daughter's love, might
appear to be the master of his secrets. When this
false suitor stood on the verge of detection, for
offences
against the customs, he laid a snare of
deception
,
which, while he was permitted to escape,
drew the anger of the state on his too confiding
friend. Francesco was condemned to the cells,
until
he might reveal facts which never had an
existence
.
This is a hard fate, reverend friar, could it be
but proved!
'Tis the evil of secrecy and intrigue, great doge,
in managing the common interests!
Hast thou more of this Francesco, monk?
His history is short, Signore; for at the age when
most men are active in looking to their welfare, he
was pining in a prison.
I remember to have heard of some such
accusation
but
it occurred in the reign of the last doge
did it not, father?
And he has endured to near the close of the
reign of this, highness!
How! The senate, when apprized of the error
of its judgment, was not slow to repair the wrong!
The monk regarded the prince earnestly, as if he
would make certain whether the surprise he
witnessed
was not a piece of consummate acting. He felt
convinced that the affair was one of that class of
acts, which, however oppressive, unjust, and
destructive
of personal happiness, had not sufficient
importance to come before them, who govern under
systems which care more for their own
preservation
,
than for the good of the ruled. Signor
Doge, he said, the state is discreet in matters that
touch its own reputation. There are reasons that I
shall not presume to examine, why the cell of poor
Francesco was kept closed, long after the death and
confession of his accuser left his innocence beyond
dispute.
The prince mused, and then he bethought him to
consult the countenance of his companion. The
marble of the pilaster, against which he leaned, was
not more cold and unmoved than the face of the
inquisitor
.
The man had learned to smother every
natural impulse in the assumed and factitious duties
of his office.
And what has this case of Francesco to do with
the execution of the Bravo? demanded the doge,
after a pause, in which he had in vain struggled to
assume the indifference of his counsellor.
That I shall leave this prison-keeper's daughter
to explainstand forth, child, and relate what you
know, remembering, if you speak before the prince
of Venice, that you also speak before the King of
Heaven!
Gelsomina trembled, for one of her habits,
however
supported by her motives, could not overcome
a nature so retiring without a struggle. But faithful
to her promise, and sustained by her affection for
the condemned, she advanced a step, and stood no
longer concealed by the robes of the Carmelite.
Thou art the daughter of the prison-keeper?
asked the prince mildly, though surprise was strongly
painted in his eye.
Highness, we are poor, and we are unfortunate;
we serve the state for bread.
Ye serve a noble master, child. Dost thou know
aught of this Bravo?
Dread sovereign, they that call him thus, know
not his heart! One more true to his friends, more
faithful to his word, or more suppliant with the saints,
than Jacopo Frontoni, is not in Venice!
This is a character which art might appropriate,
even to a bravo. But we waste the moments.
What have these Frontoni, in common?
Highness, they are father and son. When Jacopo
came to be of an age to understand the misfortunes
of his family, he wearied the senators with
applications
in his father's behalf, until they commanded the
door of the cell to be secretly opened to a child so
pious. I well know, great prince, that they who rule
cannot have all-seeing eyes, else could this wrong
never have happened. But Francesco wasted years
in cells, chill and damp in winter, and scorching in
summer, before the falsehood of the accusation was
known. Then, as some relief to sufferings so little
merited, Jacopo was admitted.
With what object, girl?
Highness, was it not in pity? They promised
too, that in good time, the service of the son should
buy the father's liberty. The patricians were slow
to be convinced, and they made terms with poor
Jacopo, who agreed to undergo a hard service, that
his father might breathe free air, before he died.
Thou dealest in enigmas.
I am little used, great doge, to speak in such a
presence, or on such subjects. But this I know, that
for three weary years hath Jacopo been admitted to
his father's cell, and that those up above consented
to the visits; else would my father have denied them.
I was his companion in the holy act, and will call
the blessed Maria and the saints
Girl, didst thou know him for a bravo?
Oh! Highness, no. To me he seemed a dutiful
child, fearing God and honoring his parent. I hope
never to feel another pang, like that which chilled
my heart, when they said, he I had known as the
kind Carlo, was hunted in Venice as the abhorred
Jacopo! But it is passed, the Mother of God be
praised!
Thou art betrothed to this condemned man?
The color did not deepen on the cheek of
Gelsomina
,
at this abrupt question, for the tie between her
and Jacopo had become too sacred, for the ordinary
weaknesses of her sex.
Highness, yes; we were to be married, should
it have pleased God, and those great senators who
have so much influence over the happiness of the
poor, to permit it.
And thou art still willing, knowing the man, to
pledge thy vows to one like Jacopo!
It is because I do know him to be as he is, that
I most reverence him, great doge. He has sold his
time and his good name to the state, in order to
save his imprisoned father, and in that I see nothing
to frighten one he loves.
This affair needs explanation, Carmelite. The
girl has a heated fancy, and she renders that obscure
she should explain.
Illustrious prince, she would say that the
republic
was content to grant the son the indulgence
of visiting the captive, with some encouragement
of his release, on condition that the youth might
serve the police by bearing a bravo's reputation.
And for this incredible tale, father, you have the
word of a condemned criminal!
With the near view of death before his eyes.
There are means of rendering truth evident,
familiar
to those who are often near the dying
penitents
,
that are unknown to those of the world.
In any case, Signore, the matter is worthy of
investigation
.
In that thou art right. Is the hour named for
the execution?
With the morning light, prince.
And the father?
Is dead.
A prisoner, Carmelite!
A prisoner, Prince of Venice.
There was a pause.
Hast thou heard of the death of one named
Antonio?
Signore, yes. By the sacred nature of my holy
office, do I affirm that of this crime is Jacopo
innocent
!
I shrived the fisherman.
The doge turned away, for the truth began to
dawn upon him, and the flush which glowed on his
aged cheek, contained a confession that might not
be observed by every eye. He sought the glance
of his companion, but his own expression of
human
feeling was met by the disciplined features of
the other, as light is coldly repelled from polished
stone.
Highness! added a tremulous voice.
What would'st thou, child?
There is a God for the republic, as well as for
the gondolier! Your highness will turn this great
crime from Venice?
Thou art of plain speech, girl!
The danger of Carlo has made me bold. You
are much beloved by the people, and none speak
of you, that they do not speak of your goodness,
and of your desire to serve the poor. You are the
root of a rich and happy family, and you will not
nay, you cannot if you would, think it a crime
for a son to devote all to a father. You are our
father, and we have a right to come to you, even
for mercybut, highness, I ask only for justice.
Justice is the motto of Venice.
They who live in the high favor of providence
do not always know what the unhappy undergo.
It has pleased God to afflict my own poor mother,
who has griefs that, but for her patience and
Christian
faith, would have been hard to bear. The
little care I had it in my power to show, first caught
Jacopo's eye, for his heart was then full of the duty
of the child. Would your highness consent to see
poor Carlo, or to command him to be brought hither,
his simple tale would give the lie to every foul
slander
they have dared to say against him.
It is unnecessaryit is unnecessary. Thy faith
in his innocence, girl, is more eloquent than any
words of his can prove.
A gleam of joy irradiated the face of Gelsomina,
who turned eagerly to the listening monk, as she
continued
His highness listens, she said, and we shall
prevail! Father, they menace in Venice, and
alarm the timid, but they will never do the deed we
feared. Is not the God of Jacopo my God, and
your God?the God of the senate, and of the doge?
of the Council, and of the republic? I would the
secret members of the Three could have seen poor
Jacopo, as I have seen him, coming from his toil,
weary with labor, and heart-broken with delay, enter
the winter or the summer cellchilling or scorching
as the season might beand struggling to be
cheerful
,
that the falsely accused might not feel a greater
weight of misery.Oh! venerable and kind prince,
you little know the burthen that the feeble are often
made to carry, for to you life has been sunshine;
but there are millions who are condemned to do
that they lothe, that they may not do that they
dread.
Child, thou tell'st me nothing new.
Except in convincing you, highness, that
Jacopo
is not the monster they would have him. I do
not know the secret reasons of the councils for
wishing the youth to lend himself to a deception
that had nigh proved so fatal; but all is explained,
we have naught now to fear. Come, father; we
will leave the good and just doge to go to rest, as
suits his years, and we will return to gladden the
heart of Jacopo with our success, and thank the
blessed Maria for her favor.
Stay! exclaimed the half-stifled old man. Is
this true that thou tellest me, girl:Father, can it
be so!
Signore, I have said all that truth and my
conscience
have prompted.
The prince seemed bewildered, turning his look
from the motionless girl to the equally immovable
member of the Three.
Come hither, child, he said, his voice trembling
as he spoke. Come hither, that I may bless thee.
Gelsomina sprang forward, and knelt at the feet of
her sovereign. Father Anselmo never uttered a
clearer or more fervent benediction than that which
fell from the lips of the prince of Venice. He
raised the daughter of the prison-keeper, and
motioned
for both his visitors to withdraw.
Gelsomina
willingly complied, for her heart was already in
the cell of Jacopo, in the eagerness to communicate
her success; but the Carmelite lingered to cast a
look behind, like one better acquainted with the
effects of worldly policy, when connected with the
interests of those who pervert governments to the
advantage of the privileged. As he passed through
the door, however, he felt his hopes revive, for he
saw the aged prince, unable any longer to suppress
his feelings, hastening towards his still silent
companion
,
with both hands extended, eyes moistening
with tears, and a look that betrayed the emotions
of one anxious to find relief in human sympathies.
CHAPTER XVI.
Onon
It is our knell, or that of Venice.On.
Marino Faliero
.
Another
morning called the Venetians to their
affairs. Agents of the police had been active in
preparing the public mind, and as the sun rose
above the narrow sea, the squares began to fill.
There were present the curious citizen in his cloak
Vol. II. U
and cap, bare-legged laborers in wondering awe,
the circumspect Hebrew in his gaberdine and
beard, masked gentlemen, and many an attentive
stranger from among the thousands who still
frequented
that declining mart. It was rumored that
an act of retributive justice was about to take place,
for the peace of the town and the protection of the
citizen. It short, curiosity, idleness, and revenge,
with all the usual train of human feelings, had
drawn together a multitude eager to witness the
agonies of a fellow-creature.
The Dalmatians were drawn up, near the sea, in
a manner to inclose the two granite columns of the
Piazzetta. Their grave and disciplined faces fronted
inwards, towards the African pillars, those
well-known
land-marks of death. A few grim warriors,
of higher rank, paced the flags before the troops,
while a dense crowd filled the exterior space. By
special favor, more than a hundred fishermen were
grouped within the armed men, witnesses that their
class had revenge. Between the lofty pedestals of
St. Theodore and the winged lion lay the block and
ax, the basket and the saw-dust; the usual
accompaniments
of justice in that day. By their side,
stood the executioner.
At length a movement in the living mass drew
every eye towards the gate of the palace. A
murmur
arose, the multitude waved, and a small body
of the Sbirri came into view. Their steps were
swift, like the march of destiny. The Dalmatians
opened to receive these ministers of fate into their
bosom, and closing their ranks again appeared to
preclude the world, with its hopes, from the
condemned
.
On reaching the block between the
columns
,
the Sbirri fell off in files, waiting at a little
distance, while Jacopo was left before the engines
of death, attended by his ghostly counsellor, the
Carmelite. The action left them open to the gaze
of the throng.
Father Anselmo was in the usual attire of a
bare-footed
friar of his order. The cowl of the holy man
was thrown back, exposing his mortified lineaments,
and self-examining eye, to those around. The
expression
of his countenance was that of bewildered
uncertainty, relieved by frequent, but fitful,
glimmerings
of hope. Though his lips moved constantly
in prayer, his looks wandered, by an irrepressible
impulse, from one window of the doge's palace to
another. He took his station near the condemned,
however, and thrice crossed himself, fervently.
Jacopo had tranquilly placed his person before
the block. His head was bare, his cheek colorless,
his throat and neck uncovered to the shoulders, his
body, in its linen, and the rest of his form, was clad
in the ordinary dress of a gondolier. He kneeled,
with his face bowed to the block, repeated a prayer,
and rising he faced the multitude, with dignity and
composure. As his eye moved slowly over the
array of human countenances by which he was
environed
,
a hectic glowed on his features, for not
one of them all betrayed sympathy in his sufferings.
His breast heaved, and those nearest to his person
thought the self-command of the miserable man was
about to fail him. The result disappointed
expectation
.
There was a shudder, and the limbs settled
into repose.
Thou hast looked in vain, among the multitude,
for a friendly eye? said the Carmelite, whose
attention
had been drawn to the convulsive
movement
.
None here have pity for an assassin.
Remember thy Redeemer, son. He suffered
ignominy and death, for a race that denied his
God-head
,
and derided his sorrows.
Jacopo crossed himself, and bowed his head, in
reverence.
Hast thou more prayers to repeat, father?
demanded
the chief of the Sbirri; he who was
particularly
charged with the duty of the hour.
Though the illustrious councils are so sure in
justice
,
they are merciful to the souls of sinners.
Are thy orders peremptory? asked the monk,
unconsciously fixing his eye, again, on the windows
of the palace. Is it certain that the prisoner is to
die?
The officer smiled at the simplicity of the
question
,
but with the apathy of one too much
familiarized
with human suffering, to admit of compassion.
Do any doubt it? he rejoined. It is the lot
of man, reverend monk; and more especially is it
the lot of those on whom the judgment of St. Mark
has alighted. It were better that your penitent
looked
to his soul.
Surely thou hast thy private and express
commands
!
They have named a minute, when this
bloody work is to be performed?
Holy Carmelite, I have. The time will not be
weary, and you will do well to make the most of it,
unless you have faith, already, in the prisoner's
condition
.
As he spoke, the officer threw a glance at the
dial of the square, and walked coolly away. The
action left the priest and the prisoner again alone,
between the columns. It was evident that the
former
could not yet believe in the reality of the
execution
.
Hast thou no hope, Jacopo? he asked.
Carmelite, in my God.
They cannot commit this wrong! I shrived
AntonioI witnessed his fate, and the prince knows
it!
What is a prince and his justice, where the
selfishness
of a few rules! Father, thou art new in the
senate's service.
I shall not presume to say that God will blast
those who do this deed, for we cannot trace the
mysteries of his wisdom. This life, and all this
world can offer, are but specks in his omniscient
eye, and what to us seems evil, may be pregnant
with good.Hast thou faith in thy Redeemer,
Jacopo
?
The prisoner laid his hand upon his heart, and
smiled, with the calm assurance that none but those
who are thus sustained can feel.
We will again pray, my son.
The Carmelite and Jacopo kneeled, side by side,
the latter bowing his head to the block, while the
monk uttered a final appeal to the mercy of the
Deity. The former arose, but the latter continued
in the suppliant attitude. The monk was so full of
holy thoughts, that, forgetting his former wishes, he
was nearly content the prisoner should pass into the
fruition of that hope which elevated his own mind.
The officer and executioner drew near, the former
touching the arm of Father Anselmo, and pointing
towards the distant dial.
The moment is near; he whispered, more
from habit, than in any tenderness to the prisoner.
The Carmelite turned instinctively towards the
palace, forgetting, in the sudden impulse, all but his
sense of earthly justice. There were forms at the
windows, and he fancied a signal, to stay the
impending
blow, was about to be given.
Hold! he exclaimed. For the love of Maria
of most pure memory, be not too hasty!
The exclamation was repeated by a shrill female
voice, and then Gelsomina, eluding every effort to
arrest her, rushed through the Dalmatians, and
reached the group between the granite columns.
U 2
Wonder and curiosity agitated the multitude, and a
deep murmur ran through the square.
'Tis a maniac! cried one.
'Tis a victim of his arts! said another, for
when men have a reputation for any particular vice,
the world seldom fails to attribute all the rest.
Gelsomina seized the bonds of Jacopo, and
endeavored
,
frantically, to release his arms.
I had hoped thou would'st have been spared
this sight, poor Gessina! said the condemned.
Be not alarmed! she answered, gasping for
breath. They do it in mockery'tis one of their
wiles to misleadbut they cannotno, they dare
not harm a hair of thy head, Carlo!
Dearest Gelsomina!
Nay, do not hold me.I will speak to the
citizens
,
and tell them all. They are angry now, but
when they know the truth they will love thee, Carlo,
as I do.
Bless theebless thee!I would thou hadst
not come!
Fear not for me! I am little used to such a
crowd, but thou wilt see that I shall dare to speak
them fair, and to make known the truth boldly. I
want but breath.
Dearest! Thou hast a mothera father to
share thy tenderness. Duty to them will make thee
happy!
Now, I can speak, and thou shalt see how I
will vindicate thy name.
She arose from the arms of her lover, who,
notwithstanding
his bonds, released his hold of her
slight form with a reluctance greater than that with
which he parted with life. The struggle in the
mind of Jacopo seemed over. He bowed his head,
passively, to the block, before which he was
kneeling
,
and it is probable, by the manner in which his
hands were clasped, that he prayed for her who
left him. Not so Gelsomina. Parting her hair, over
her spotless forehead, with both hands, she advanced
towards the fishermen, who were familiar to her eye,
by their red caps and bare limbs. Her smile was
like that which the imagination would bestow on the
blessed, in their intercourse of love.
Venetians! she said, I cannot blame you; ye
are here to witness the death of one whom ye
believe
unfit to live
The murderer of old Antonio! muttered several
of the group.
Ay, even the murderer of that aged and
excellent
man. But, when you hear the truth, when you
come to know that he, whom you have believed an
assassin, was a pious child, a faithful servant of the
republic, a gentle gondolier, and a true heart, you
will change your bloody purpose, for a wish for
justice.
A common murmur drowned her voice, which
was so trembling and low, as to need deep stillness
to render the words audible. The Carmelite had
advanced to her side, and he motioned earnestly for
silence.
Hear her, men of the Lagunes! he said; she
utters holy truth.
This reverend and pious monk, with Heaven, is
my witness. When you shall know Carlo better,
and have heard his tale, ye will be the first to cry
out for his release. I tell you this, that when the
doge shall appear at yon window and make the
signal
of mercy, you need not be angry, and believe
that your class has been wronged. Poor Carlo
The girl raves! interrupted the moody
fishermen
.
Here is no Carlo, but Jacopo Frontoni, a
common bravo.
Gelsomina smiled, in the security of the innocent,
and, regaining her breath, which nervous agitation
still disturbed, she resumed.
Carlo, or JacopoJacopo, or Carloit matters
little.
Ha! There is a sign from the palace! shouted
the Carmelite, stretching both his arms in that
direction
,
as if to grasp a boon. The clarions
sounded
,
and another wave stirred the multitude.
Gelsomina
uttered a cry of delight, and turned to throw
herself upon the bosom of the reprieved. The ax
glittered before her eyes, and the head of Jacopo
rolled upon the stones, as if to meet her. A general
movement in the living mass denoted the end.
The Dalmatians wheeled into column, the Sbirri
pushed aside the throng, on their way to their
haunts, the water of the bay was dashed upon the
flags, the clotted saw-dust was gathered, the head
and trunk, block, basket, ax, and executioner,
disappeared
,
and the crowd circulated around the
fatal spot.
During this horrible and brief moment, neither
Father Anselmo nor Gelsomina moved. All was
over, and still the entire scene appeared to be
delusion
.
Take away this maniac! said an officer of the
police, pointing to Gelsomina as he spoke.
He was obeyed with Venetian readiness, but his
words proved prophetic, before his servitors had
quitted the square. The Carmelite scarce breathed.
He gazed at the moving multitude, at the windows
of the palace, and at the sun which shone so
gloriously
in the heavens
Thou art lost in this crowd! whispered one at
his elbow. Reverend Carmelite, you will do well
to follow me.
The monk was too much subdued to hesitate. His
conductor led him, by many secret ways, to a quay,
where he instantly embarked, in a gondola, for the
main. Before the sun reached the meridian, the
thoughtful and trembling monk was on his journey
towards the states of the Church: and ere long he
became established in the castle of Sant' Agata.
At the usual hour the sun fell behind the
mountains
of the Tyrol, and the moon reappeared above
the Lido. The narrow streets of Venice, again,
poured out their thousands upon the squares. The
mild light fell athwart the quaint architecture, and
the giddy tower, throwing a deceptive glory on the
city of islands.
The porticoes became brilliant with lamps, the
gay laughed, the reckless trifled, the masker pursued
his hidden purpose, the cantatrice and the grotesque
acted their parts, and the million existed in that
vacant
enjoyment which distinguishes the pleasures of
the thoughtless and the idle. Each lived for himself,
while the state of Venice held its vicious sway,
corrupting
alike the ruler and the ruled, by its mockery
of those sacred principles which are alone founded
in truth and natural justice.
THE END.